CHAPTER I.
When
the soldier recovered his senses, it was
to wonder again at the change that had come over
the scene. The loud yells, the bitter taunts, the
mocking laughs, were heard no more; and nothing
broke the silence of the wilderness, save the stir
of the leaf in the breeze, and the ripple of the
river against its pebbly banks below. He glanced
a moment from the bush in which he was lying,
in search of the barbarians who had lately
covered
the slope of the hill, but all had vanished;
captor
and captive had alike fled; and the sparrow
twittering among the stunted bushes, and the
grasshopper singing in the grass, were the only
living objects to be seen. The thong was still
upon his wrists, and as he felt it rankling in his
flesh, he almost believed that his savage captors,
with a refinement in cruelty the more remarkable
as it must have robbed them of the sight of his
dying agonies, had left him thus bound and
wounded
,
to perish miserably in the wilderness alone.
This suspicion was, however, soon driven from
his mind; for making an effort to rise from his
feet, he found himself suddenly withheld by a
powerful
grasp, while a guttural voice muttered in his
ear from behind, with accents half angry, half
exultant
,Long-knife
no move;see how
Piankeshaw
kill Long-knife's brudders!Piankeshaw
great fighting-man! He turned his face with
difficulty, and saw, crouching among the leaves
behind him, a grim old warrior plentifully
bedaubed
over head and breast with the scarlet clay of
his native Wabash, his dark shining eyes bent now
upon the rifle which he held extended over
Roland's
body, now turned upon Roland himself,
whom he seemed to watch over with a miser's,
or a wildcat's, affection, and now wandering
away up the stony path along the hill-side, as if
in expectation of the coming of an object dearer
even than rifle or captive to his imagination.
In the confused and distracted state of his mind,
Roland was as little able to understand the
expressions
of the warrior, as to account for the
disappearance
of his murderous associates; and he
would have marvelled for what purpose he was
thus concealed among the bushes with his grim
companion, had not his whole soul been too busily
and painfully occupied with the thoughts of his
vanished Edith. He strove to ask the wild
barbarian
of her fate, but the latter motioned him
fiercely
to keep silence; and the motion and the savage
look that accompanied it being disregarded, the
Indian drew a long knife from his belt, and
pressing
the point on Roland's throat, muttered too
sternly and emphatically to be misconceived,
Long-knife speak, Long-knife die! Piankeshaw
fight Long-knife's bruddersPiankeshaw great
fighting-man! from which all that Roland could
understand was that there was mischief of some
kind still in the wind, and that he was commanded
to preserve silence on the peril of his life. What
that mischief could be he was unable to divine;
but he was not kept long in ignorance.
As he lay upon the ground, his cheek pillowed
1*
upon a stone which accident or perhaps the
humanity
of the old warrior, had placed under his head,
he could distinguish a hollow, pattering, distant
sound, in which, at first mistaken for the
murmurring
of the river over some rocky ledge, and then
for the clatter of wild beasts approaching over the
rocky hill, his practised ear soon detected the
trampling of a body of horse, evidently winding
their way along the stony road which had
conducted
him to captivity, and from which he was
but a few paces removed. His heart thrilled
within him. Was it, could it be, a band of gallant
Kentuckians, in pursuit of the bold marauders,
whose presence in the neighbourhood of the
settlements
had been already made known? or
could they be (the thrill of expectation grew to
transport, as he thought it,) his fellow emigrants,
summoned by the faithful Nathan to his assistance,
and now straining every nerve to overtake the
savages, whom they had tracked from the
deserted
ruin? He could now account for the
disappearance
of his captors, and the deathlike silence that
surrounded him. Too vigilant to be taken at
unawares
,
and perhaps long since apprized of the
coming of the band, the Indians had resumed their
hiding-places in the grass and among the bushes,
preparing for the new-comers an ambuscade
similar
to that they had so successfully practised
against Roland's unfortunate party. Let them
hide as they will, detestable miscreants, he
muttered
to himself, with feelings of vindictive
triumph
;
they will not, this time, have frighted
women, and a handful of dispirited fugitives to
deal with!
With these feelings burning in his bosom, he
made an effort to turn his face towards the top of
the hill, that he might catch the first sight of the
friendly band, and glut his eyes with the view of
the anticipated speedy discomfiture and
destruction
of his enemies. In this effort he received
unexpected
aid from the old warrior, who,
perceiving
his intention, pulled him round with his
own hands, telling him, with the grim
complacency
of one who desired a witness to his bravery,
Now, you hold still, you see,you see
Piankeshaw
old Injun,you see Piankeshaw kill man,
take scalp, kill all Long-knife:debbil great
fighting-man
,
old Piankeshaw! which self-admiring
assurance, repeated for the third time, the warrior
pronounced with extreme earnestness and
emphasis
.
It was now that Roland could distinctly
perceive
the nature of the ground on which his
captors
had formed their ambush. The hill along
whose side the bison-path went winding down to
the river with an easy descent, was nearly bare of
trees, its barren soil affording nourishment only
for a coarse grass, enamelled with asters and
other brilliant flowers, and for a few stunted
cedar-bushes, scattered here and there; while, in
many places, the naked rock, broken into ledges
and gullies, the beds of occasional brooks, was seen
gleaming gray and desolate in the sunshine. Its
surface being thus broken, was unfit for the
operations
of cavalry; and the savages being posted, as
Roland judged from the position of the old
Piankeshaw
,
midway along the descent, where were but
few trees of sufficient magnitude to serve as a
cover to assailants, while they themselves were
concealed behind rocks and bushes, there was
little
doubt they could inflict loss upon any advancing
body of footmen of equal numbers, and perhaps
repel them altogether. But, Roland, now
impressed
with the belief that the approaching horsemen,
whose trampling grew heavier each moment, as
if they were advancing at a full trot, composed
the flower of his own band, had little fear of the
result of a contest. He did not doubt they would
outnumber the savages, who, he thought, could
not muster more than fifteen or sixteen guns; and,
coming from a Station, which he had been taught
to believe was of no mean strength, it was more
than probable their numbers had been reinforced
by a detachment from its garrison.
Such were his thoughts, such were his hopes, as
the party drew yet nigher, the sound of their
hoofs clattering at last on the ridge of the hill;
but his disappointment may be imagined, when, as
they burst at last on his sight, emerging from the
woods above, the gallant party dwindled suddenly
into a troop of young men, only eleven in
number
,
who rattled along the path in greater haste
than order, as if dreaming of any thing in the
world but the proximity of an enemy. The leader
he recognized at a glance by his tall figure, as
Tom Bruce the younger, whose feats of
Regulation
the previous day had produced a strong
though indirect influence on his own fortunes;
and the ten lusty youths who followed at his heels,
he doubted not, made up the limbs and body of
that inquisitorial court, which, under him as its
head, had dispensed so liberal allowance of
border
law to honest Ralph Stackpole. That they
were now travelling on duty of a similar kind, he
was strongly inclined to believe; but the
appearance
of their horses, covered with foam, as if they
had ridden far and fast, their rifles held in
readiness
in both hands as if in momentary expectation
of being called on to use them, with an occasional
gesture from the youthful leader, who seemed to
encourage them to greater speed, convinced him
they were bent upon more serious business,
perhaps
in pursuit of the Indians with whose
marauding
visitation some accident had made them
acquainted.
The smallness of the force, and its almost entire
incompetence to yield him any relief, filled the
soldier's breast with despair; but, hopeless as he
was, he could not see the gallant young men
rushing
blindly among the savages, each of whose
rifles was already selecting its victim, without
making an effort to apprize them of their danger.
Forgetting, therefore, his own situation, or
generously
disregarding it, he summoned all his
strength, and, as they began to descend the hill,
shouted aloud, Beware the ambush! Halt
But before the words were all uttered, he was
grasped by the throat with strangling violence,
and the old warrior, whose left hand thus choked
his utterance, drew his knife a second time, with
the other, and seemed for an instant as if he would
have plunged it into the soldier's bosom.
But the cry had not been made in vain, and
although, from the distance, the words had not
been distinguished by the young Kentuckians,
enough was heard to convince them the enemy
was nigh at hand. They came to an immediate
halt, and Roland, whose throat was still held by
the warrior and his bosom threatened by the
vengeful knife, but whose eyes neither the
anguish
of suffocation nor the fear of instant death
could draw from the little band, saw them leap
from their horses, which were given in charge of
one of the number, who immediately retired
beyond
the brow of the hill; while Tom Bruce, a
worthy scion of a warlike stock, brandishing his
rifle in one hand, and with the other pointing
his nine remaining followers down the road, cried,
in tones so clear and manly that they came to
Roland's
ear,Now, boys, the women's down
thar
, and the red-skins with them! Show fight,
for the honour of Kentuck and the love of
woman
.
Every man to his bush, and every bullet to
its Injun! Bring the brutes out of their cover!
This speech, short and homely as it was, was
answered by a loud shout from the nine young
men, who began to divide, with the intention of
obeying its simple final instructions; when the
Indians
,
seeing the design, unwilling to forego the
advantage of the first open shot, and perhaps
hoping by a weak fire to mask their strength, and
decoy the young Kentuckians into closer
quarters
,
let fly a volley of six or seven guns from the
bushes near to where Roland lay, but without
doing much mischief, or even deceiving the
young men, as was expected.
Thar they go, the brutes! roared Tom Bruce,
adding, as he sprang with his followers among
the bushes, show 'em your noses, and keep a
good squint over your elbows.
Long-knife big fool,Piankeshaw eat him
up! cried the old warrior, now releasing the
soldier's throat from durance, but speaking with
tones of ire and indignation: shall see how
great Injun fighting-man eat up white man!
With these words, leaving Roland to endure his
bonds, and solace himself, as he might, he crept
away into the long grass, and was soon entirely
lost to sight.
The combat that now ensued was one so
different
in most of its characteristics from all that
Roland
had ever before witnessed, that he watched
its progress, notwithstanding the tortures of his
bonds and the fever of his mind, with an interest
even apart from that, which he necessarily felt
in it, as one whose all of happiness or misery
depended
upon its issue. In all conflicts in which
he had been engaged, the adverse ranks were
arrayed face to face, looking upon each other as
they fought; but here, no man saw his enemy,
both parties concealing themselves so effectually
in the grass and among the rocks and shrubs, that
there was nothing to indicate even their existence,
save the occasional discharge of a rifle, and the
wreath of white smoke curling up from it into
the air. In the battles of regular soldiers, too,
men fought in masses, the chief strength of either
party arising from the support which
individuals
thus gave to one another, each deriving
additional courage and confidence from the
presence
of his fellows. Here, on the contrary, it
seemed the first object of each individual,
whether
American or Indian, to separate himself as
far from his friends as possible, seeking his own
enemies, trusting to his own resources, carrying
on the war on his own foundation,in short, like
the enthusiastic Jerseyman, who, without
belonging
to either side, was found, at the battle of
Mon-mouth
,
peppering away from behind a fence, at
whatever he fancied a foeman,`fighting on his
own
hook
' entirely.
It did not seem to Roland as if a battle fought
upon such principles, could result in any great
injury
to either party. But he forgot, or rather he
was ignorant, that the separation of the
combatants
,
while effecting the best protection not merely
to any one individual, but to all his comrades, who
must have been endangered, if near him, by every
bullet aimed at himself, did not imply either fear
or hesitation on his part, whose object, next to
that mentioned, was to avoid the shots of the
many, while seeking out and approaching a single
antagonist, whom he was ever ready singly to
encounter.
And thus it happened, that, while Roland
deemed
the antagonists were manuvering over the
hill-side, dragging themselves from bush to bush
and rock to rock, to no profitable purpose, they
were actually creeping nigher and nigher to each
other every moment, the savages crawling
onwards
with the exultation of men who felt their
superior strength, and the Kentuckians advancing
with equal alacrity, as if ignorant of, or bravely
indifferent to their inferiority.
It was not a long time, indeed, before the
Virginian
began to have a better opinion of the
intentions
of the respective parties; for, by and by,
the shots, which were at first fired very
irregularly
and at long intervals, became more
frequent
,
and, as it seemed, more serious; and an
occasional whoop from an Indian, or a wild shout
from a Kentuckian, showed that the excitement of
actual conflict was beginning to be felt on either
side. At the same time, he became sensible, from
the direction of the firing, that both parties had
gradually extended themselves in a line, reaching,
notwithstanding the smallness of their numbers,
from the crest of the hill on the one hand, to the
borders of the river on the other, and thus
perceived
that the gallant Regulators, however
ignorant
of the science of war, and borne by
impetuous
tempers into a contest with a more numerous
foe, were not in the mood to be taken either on
the flank or rear, but were resolved, in true
military
style, to keep their antagonists before them.
In this manner, the conflict continued for many
minutes, the combatants approaching nearer and
nearer, the excitement waxing fiercer every
instant
,
until shots were incessantly exchanged, and,
as it seemed, with occasional effect; for the yells,
which grew louder and more frequent on both
sides, were sometimes mingled with cries of pain
on the one hand, and shouts of triumph on the
other; during all which time, nothing whatever
was seen of the combatants, at least by Roland,
whose mental agonies were not a little increased
by his being a compelled spectator, if such he
could be called, of a battle in which he was so
deeply interested, without possessing the power to
mingle in it, or strike a single blow on his own
behalf
.
His fears of the event had been from the
first, much stronger than his hopes. Aware of
the greatly superior strength of the savages, he
did not doubt that the moment would come,
when he should see them rush in a body upon the
Kentuckians, and overwhelm them with numbers.
But that was a measure into which nothing but an
uncommon pitch of fury could have driven the
barbarians: for with marksmen like those
opposed
to them, who needed but a glance of an
enemy to insure his instant destruction, the first
spring from the grass would have been the signal
of death to all who attempted it, leaving the
survivors
,
no longer superior in numbers, to decide
the contest with men, who were, individually, in
courage, strength, and skill, at least their equals.
Indeed, a bloody proof of the extreme folly of
such a course on the part of the Indians, was
soon shown, when the Regulators, fighting their
way onwards, as if wholly regardless of the
superior
numbers of the foe, had advanced so nigh
the latter as to command (which, from occupying
the highest ground, they were better able to do,)
the hiding-places of some of their opponents.
Three young warriors, yielding to their fury,
ashamed perhaps of being thus bearded by a
VOL. II.2
weaker foe, or inflamed with the hope of securing
a scalp of one young Kentuckian who had crept
dangerously nigh, suddenly sprang from their
lairs, and guided by the smoke of the rifle which
he had just discharged, rushed towards the spot,
yelling with vindictive exultation. They were the
first combatants Roland had yet seen actually
engaged
in the conflict; and he noted their
appearance
and act of daring with a sinking heart, as
the prelude to a charge from the whole body of
Indians upon the devoted Kentuckians. But
scarce were their brown bodies seen to rise from
the grass, before three rifles were fired from as
many points on the hill-side, following each other
in such rapid succession that the ear could scarce
distinguish the different explosions, each of them
telling with fatal effect upon the rash warriors,
two of whom fell dead on the spot, while the
third and foremost, uttering a faint whoop of
defiance
and making an effort to throw the hatchet
he held in his hand, suddenly staggered and fell
in like manner to the earth.
Loud and bold was the shout of the
Kentuckians
at this happy stroke of success, and laughs
of scorn were mingled with their warlike
hurrahs
,
as they prepared to improve the advantage
so fortunately gained. Loudest of all in both
laugh and hurrah, was the young Tom Bruce,
whose voice was heard, scarce sixty yards off,
roaring, Hurrah for old Kentuck! Try 'em
agin, boys! give it to 'em handsome once more!
and then, boys, a rush for the women!
The sound of a friendly voice at so short a
distance fired Roland's heart with hope, and he
shouted aloud himself, no Indian seeming nigh,
for assistance. But his voice was lost in a
tempest
of yells, the utterance of grief and fury,
with which the fall of their three companions
had filled the breasts of the savages. The effect
of this fatal loss, stirring up their passions to a
sudden phrensy, was to goad them into the very
step which they had hitherto so wisely avoided.
All sprang from the ground as with one consent,
and regardless of the exposure and danger,
dashed
,
with hideous shouts, against the Kentuckians.
But the volley with which they were received,
each Kentuckian selecting his man, and firing
with unerring and merciless aim, damped their
short-lived ardour; and quickly dropping again
among the grass and bushes, they were fain to
continue the combat as they had begun it, in a
way, which, if it produced less injury to their
antagonists, was conducive of greater safety to
themselves.
The firing was now hot and incessant on both
sides, but particularly on the part of the
Regulators
,
who, inspired by success, but still
prudently
avoiding all unnecessary exposure of their
persons
,
pressed their enemies with a spirit from
which Roland now for the first time drew the
happiest auguries. Their stirring hurrahs bespoke
a confidence in the result of the fray, infinitely
cheering to his spirits; and he forgot his tortures,
which from the many frantic struggles he had
made to force the thong from his wrists,
drawing
it at each still further into his flesh, were
now almost insupportable, when, amid the din of
firing and yelling, he heard Tom Bruce cry aloud
to his companions, Now, boys! one more crack,
and then for rifle-butt, knife, and hatchet! It
seemed, indeed, as if the heavy losses the Indians
had sustained, had turned the scale of battle
entirely
in favour of the Kentuckians. It was
evident
even to Roland, that the former, although
yelling
and shouting with as much apparent vigour
as ever, were gradually giving ground before the
latter, and retreating towards their former lairs;
while he could as clearly perceive, from Bruce's
expressions, that the intrepid Kentuckian was
actually
preparing to execute the very measure
that had caused such loss to his enemies, and
which, being thus resolved on, showed his
confidence
of victory. Ready, boys! he heard him
shout again, and even nigher than before;
take the shoot with full pieces, and let the
skirmudgeons
have it handsome!
At that conjuncture, and just when Forrester
caught his breath with intense and devouring
expectation
,
an incident occurred which entirely
changed the face of affairs, and snatched the
victory from the hands of the Kentuckians. The
gallant Bruce, thus calling upon his followers to
prepare for the charge, had scarce uttered the
words recorded, before a voice, lustier even than
his own, bellowed from a bush immediately on his
rear,Take it like a butcher's bull-dog, tooth
and nail!knife and skull-splitter, foot and finger,
give it to 'em every way,cock-a-doodle-doo!
At these words, coming from a quarter and
from an ally entirely unexpected, young Bruce
looked behind him and beheld, emerging from a
hazel-bush, through which it had just forced its
way, the visage of Roaring Ralph Stackpole, its
natural ugliness greatly increased by countless
scratches and spots of blood, the result of his
leap down the ledge of rocks, when first set upon
by the Indians, and his eyes squinting daggers
and ratsbane, especially while he was giving
utterance
to that gallinaceous slogan with which he
was wont to express his appetite for conflict, and
with which he now concluded his unceremonious
salutation.
The voice and visage were alike familiar to
Bruce's senses, and neither was so well fitted to
excite alarm as merriment. But, on the present
occasion, they produced an effect upon the young
Regulator's spirits, and through them upon his
actions, the most unfortunate in the world; to
understand
which it must be recollected that the
worthy Kentuckian had, twenty-four hours before,
with his own hands, assisted in gibbeting honest
Ralph on the beech-tree, where, he had every
reason to suppose, his lifeless body was hanging
at that very moment. His astonishment and horror
may therefore be conceived, when, turning in
some perturbation at the well known voice, he
beheld that identical body, the corse of the
executed
horse-thief, crawling after him in the grass,
`winking, and blinking, and squinting,' as he was
used afterwards to say, `as if the devil had him
by the pastern.' It was a spectacle which the
nerves of even Tom Bruce could not stand; it did
what armed Indians could not do,it frightened
him out of his propriety. Forgetting his
situation
,
his comrades, the savages,forgetting every
thing but the fact of his having administered the
last correction of Lynch-law to the object of his
terror, he sprang on his feet, and roaring, By
the etarnal devil, here's Ralph Stackpole! he took
to his heels, running, in his confusion, right in the
direction of the enemy, among whom he would
have presently found himself, but for a shot, by
which, before he had run six yards, the
unfortunate
youth was struck to the earth.
The exclamation, and the sight of Ralph
himself
,
who also rose to follow the young leader
2*
upon what he deemed a rush against the foe,
electrified the whole body of the Regulators, who
were immediately thrown into confusion; of
which the savages took the same advantage they
had taken of Bruce's agitation, firing upon them
as they rose, and then rushing upon them to end
the fray, before they could recover their wits or
spirits. It needed but this, and the fall of their
leader, to render the disorder of the young men
irretrievable; and, accordingly, in less than a
moment they were seen,all, at least, who were
not already disabled,flying in a panic from the
field of battle. It was in vain that the captain of
horse-thieves, divining at last the cause of their
extraordinary flight, roared out that he was a
living
man, with nothing of a ghost about him
whatever; the panic was universal and
irremediable
,
and nothing remained for him to do but
to save his own life as quickly as possible.
'Tarnal death to me! he bellowed, turning to
fly; but a groan from Bruce fell on his ear. He
ran to the side of the fallen youth, and catching
him by the hand, exclaimed, Now for the best
leg, Tom, and a rush up hill to the hosses!
You
ar'n't
hanged then, after all? muttered
the junior; and then fell back as if unable to rise,
adding faintly, Go;rat it, I'm done for.As
for the 'lsavages, what I have to say 'l
'l. But I reckon scalping's not much; 'l'l,
one soon gets used to it!
And thus the young Kentuckian, his blood
oozing fast, his mind wandering, his utterance
failing, muttered, resigning himself to his fate,
ignorant
that even Stackpole was no longer at his
side to hear him. His fate did indeed seem to be
inevitable; for while Stackpole had him by the
hand, vainly tugging to get him on his feet, three
different Indians were seen running with might
and main to quench the last spark of his
existence
,
and to finish Stackpole at the same time.
But in that very emergency, the ill-luck which
seemed to pursue the horse-thief, and all with
whom he was associated, found a change; and
destiny sent them both assistance in a way and by
means as unexpected as they were unhoped for.
The approach of the savages was noticed by
Roaring Ralph, who, not knowing how to save his
young executioner, against whom he seemed to
entertain no feelings of anger whatever, and
whose approaching fate he appeared well
disposed
to revenge beforehand, clapped his rifle to his
shoulder, to make sure of one of the number;
when his eye was attracted by the spectacle of a
horse rushing up the stony road, neighing
furiously
,
and scattering the Indians from before
him. It was the charger Briareus, who had
broken
from the tree where he had been fastened
below, and now came dashing up the hill,
distracted
with terror, or perhaps burning to
mingle
in the battle, which he had heard and snuffed
from afar. He galloped by the three Indians,
who leaped aside in alarm, while Stackpole,
taking
advantage of the moment, ran up and seized
him by the bridle. In another moment, he had
assisted the fainting Kentuckian upon the animal's
back, leaped up behind him, and was dashing with
wild speed up the hill, yelling with triumph, and
laughing to scorn the bullets that were shot vainly
after.
All this the unhappy Roland beheld, and with a
revulsion of feelings that can only be imagined.
He saw, without, indeed, entirely comprehending
the cause, the sudden confusion and final flight of
the little band, at the moment of anticipated victory.
He saw them flying wildly up the hill, in
irretrievable
route, followed by the whooping victors,
who, with the fugitives, soon vanished entirely
from view, leaving the field of battle to the dead,
and to the thrice miserable captives.
CHAPTER II.
The
conflict, though sharp and hot, considering
the insignificant number of combatants on either
side, was of no very long duration, the whole time,
from the appearance of the Kentuckians until the
flight, scarce exceeding half an hour. But the
pursuit, which the victors immediately
commenced
,
lasted a much longer space; and it was
more than an hour,an age of suspense and
suffering
to the soldier,before the sound of
whooping
on the hill apprized him of their return. They
brought with them, as trophies of success, two
horses, on each of which sat three or four different
Indians, as many indeed as could get upon the
animal's back, where they clung together,
shouting
,
laughing, and otherwise diverting themselves,
more like joyous school-boys than stern warriors
who had just fought and won a bloody battle.
But this semblance of mirth and good humour
lasted no longer than while the savages were riding
from the hill-top to the battle-ground; which
having
reached, they sprang upon the ground, and
running wildly about, uttered several cries of the
most mournful character, laments, as Roland
supposed
,
over the bodies of their fallen companions.
But if such was their sorrow, while looking
upon their own dead, the sight of their lifeless
foemen, of whom two, besides the negro
Emperor
,
who had been tomahawked the moment after
he fell, had been unhappily left lying on the field,
soon changed it into a fiercer passion. The
wail became a yell of fury, loud and frightful;
and Roland could see them gathering round each
corse, striking the senseless clay repeatedly with
their knives and hatchets, each seeking to surpass
his fellow in the savage work of mutilation. Such
is the red-man of America, whom courage,an
attribute of all lovers of blood, whether man or
animal; misfortune,the destiny, in every quarter
of the globe, of every barbarous race, which
contact
with a civilized one cannot civilize; and the
dreams of poets and sentimentalists have invested
with a character wholly incompatible with his
condition. Individual virtues may be, and indeed
frequently are, found among men in a natural
state; but honour, justice, and generosity, as
characteristics
of the mass, are refinements belonging
only to an advanced stage of civilization.
In the midst of this barbarous display of
unsatisfied
rage, several of the savages approached the
unfortunate Roland, and among them the old
Piankeshaw
;
who, flourishing his hatchet, already
clotted with blood, and looking more like a demon
than a human being, made an effort to dash out
the soldier's brains; in which, however, he was
restrained by two younger savages, who caught
him in their arms, and muttered somewhat in their
own tongue, which mollified his wrath in a
moment
,
causing him to burst into a roar of
obstreperous
laughter. Ees,good! he cried,
grinning
with apparent benevolence and friendship
over the helpless youth;no hurt Long-knife;
take him Piankeshaw nation; make good friend
squaw, papooseall brudders Long-knife. With
these expressions, of the purport of which Roland
could understand but little, he left him, retiring
with the rest, as Roland soon saw, to conceal or
bury the bodies of his slain comrades, which were
borne in the arms of the survivors to the bottom
of the hill, and there carefully and in silence,
deposited
among thickets, or in crannies of the
rock.
This ceremony completed, Roland was again
visited by his Piankeshaw friend and the two
young warriors who had saved his life before, and
were perhaps still fearful of trusting it entirely to
the tender mercies of the senior. It was fortunate
for Roland that he was thus attended; for the old
warrior had no sooner approached him than he
began
to weep and groan, uttering a harangue, which,
although addressed, as it seemed, entirely to the
prostrate captive, was in the Indian tongue, and
therefore wholly wasted upon his ears.
Nevertheless
,
he could perceive that the Indian was relating
something that weighed very heavily upon his
mind, that he was warming with his subject, and
even working himself up into a passion; and,
indeed
,
he had not spoken very long before his
visage changed from grief to wrath, and from
wrath to the extreme of fury, in which he began
to handle his hatchet as on the previous occasion,
making every demonstration of the best
disposition
in the world to bury it in the prisoner's brain.
He was again arrested by the young savages, who
muttered something in his ear as before; and
again the effect was to convert his anger into
merriment
,
the change being effected with a facility
that might well have amazed the prisoner, had his
despair permitted him to feel any lighter emotion.
Good! cried the old warrior, as if in reply to
what the others had said; Long-knife go
Piankeshaw
nation,make great sight for
Piankeshaw
!
And so saying, he began to dance about,
with many grimaces of visage and contortions of
body, that seemed to have a meaning for his
comrades
,
who fetched a whoop of admiration, though
entirely inexplicable to the soldier. Then seizing
the latter by the arm, and setting him on his feet,
the warrior led, or dragged, him a little way down
the hill, to a place on the road-side, where the
victors
were assembled, deliberating, doubtless, upon
the fate of their prisoners.
They seemed to have suffered a considerable
loss in the battle, twelve being the whole number
now to be seen; and most of these, judging from the
fillets of rags and bundles of green leaves tied
about their limbs, had been wounded, two of them,
to all appearance, very severely, if not mortally,
for they lay upon the earth a little apart from the
rest, in whose motions they seemed to take no
interest
.
As Roland approached, he looked in vain amid
the throng for his kinswoman. Neither she nor
Telie Doe was to be seen. But casting his eye
wildly around, it fell upon a little grove of trees
not many yards off, in which he could perceive
the figures of horses, as well as of a tall barbarian,
who stood on its edge, as if keeping guard,
wrapped
,
notwithstanding the sultriness of the weather,
in a blanket, from chin to foot, while his head was
as warmly invested in the ample folds of a huge
searlet handkerchief. He stood like a statue, his
arms folded on his breast, and lost under the
heavy festoons of the blanket; while his eyes were
fastened upon the group of Indians on the
road-side
,
from which they wandered only to glare a
moment upon the haggard and despairing visage
of the soldier. In that copse, Roland doubted not,
the savages had concealed, a hopeless and
helpless
captive, the being for whom he had struggled
and suffered so long and so vainly, the maid whose
forebodings of evil had been so soon and so
dreadfully
realized.
In the meanwhile, the savages on the road-side
began the business for which they had assembled,
that seemed to be, in the first place, the division of
spoils, consisting of the guns, horses, and clothes
of the dead, with sundry other articles, which, but
for his unhappy condition, Roland would have
wondered to behold: for there were among them
rolls of cloth and calico, heaps of hawks'-bells
and other Indian trinkets, knives, pipes, powder
and ball, and other such articles, even to a keg or
two of the fire-water, enough to stock an Indian
trading-house. These, wherever and however
obtained, were distributed equally among the
Indians
by a man of lighter skin than themselves,
a half-breed, as Roland supposed,who seemed
to exercise some authority among them, though
ever deferring in all things to an old Indian of
exceedingly fierce and malign aspect, though
wasted and withered into the semblance of a
consumptive
wolf, who sat upon a stone, buried in
gloomy abstraction, from which, time by time, he
awoke, to direct the dispersion of the valuables,
through the hands of his deputy, with exceeding
great gravity and state.
The distribution being effected, and evidently to
the satisfaction of all present, the savages turned
their looks upon the prisoner, eyeing him with
mingled triumph and exultation; and the old
presiding
officer, or chief, as he seemed to be, shaking
off his abstraction, got upon his feet and made
him a harangue, imitating therein the ancient
Piankeshaw
;
though with this difference, that,
whereas the latter spoke entirely in his own
tongue, the former thought fit, among abundance
of Indian phrases, to introduce some that were
VOL. II.3
sufficiently English to enable the soldier to guess,
at least, at part of his meaning. His oration,
however
,
as far as Roland could understand it,
consisted
chiefly in informing him, that he was a very
great chief, who had killed abundance of white
people, men, women and children, whose scalps
had for thirty years and more, been hanging in the
smoke of his Shawnee lodge,that he was very
brave, and loved a white man's blood better than
whiskey, and that he never spared it out of pity,
adding as the cause, and seeming well pleased
that he could boast a deficiency so well befitting a
warrior, that he `had
no heart
,'his interior
being
framed of stone as hard as the flinty rock
under
his feet. This exordium finished, he proceeded
to bestow sundry abusive epithets upon the
prisoner
,
charging him with having put his young
men to a great deal of needless trouble, besides
having killed several; for which, he added, the
Long-knife ought to expect nothing better than to
have his face blacked and be burnt alive,a hint
that produced an universal grunt of assent on the
part of the auditors. Having received this
testimony
of approbation, he resumed his discourse,
pursuing it for the space of ten minutes or more
with considerable vigour and eloquence; but as
the whole speech consisted, like most other Indian
speeches, of the same things said over and over
again, those same things being scarce worth the
trouble of utterance, we think it needless to say
any thing further of it; except that, first, as it
seemed to Roland, as far as he could understand
the broken expressions of the chief, he delivered a
very furious tirade against the demon enemy of
his race, the bloody Jibbenainosay, the white
man's War-Manito, whom he declared it was
his purpose to fight and kill, as soon as that
destroyer
should have the courage to face him, the
old Shawnee chief, like a human warrior,and
that it inspired several others to get up and make
speeches likewise. Of all these the burthen seemed
to be the unpardonable crime of killing their
comrades
,
of which the young soldier had been guilty;
and he judged by the fury of their countenances,
that they were only debating whether they should
put him to death on the spot, or carry him to their
country to be tortured.
The last speaker of all was the old Piankeshaw,
whose meaning could be only guessed at from his
countenance and gestures, the one being as angry
and wo-begone as the latter were active and
expressive
.
He pointed, at least a dozen times over,
to two fresh and gory scalps,the most highly
valued trophies of victory,that lay at the feet of
the Shawnee chief, as many times to the horses,
and thrice as often at the person of Roland, who
stood now surveying his dark visage with a look of
sullen despair, now casting his eyes, with a gaze of
inexpressible emotion, towards the little copse, in
which he still sought in vain a glimpse of his
Edith. But if the old warrior's finger was often
bent towards these three attractive objects,
innumerable
were the times it was pointed at the two
or three little whiskey-kegs, which, not having
been yet distributed, lay untouched upon the grass.
The words with which he accompanied these
expressive
gestures seemed to produce a
considerable
effect upon all his hearers, even upon the
ancient
chief; who, at the close of the oration, giving
a sign to one of his young men, the latter ran to
the copse and in an instant returned, bringing with
him one of the horses, which the chief
immediately
handed over, through his deputy, to the orator,
and the orator to one of the two young warriors,
who seemed to be of his own tribe. The chief
then pointed to a keg of the fire-water, and this
was also given to the Piankeshaw, who received
it with a grin of ecstacy, embraced it, snuffed at
its odoriferous contents, and then passed it in like
manner to his second follower. The chief made
yet another signal, and the deputy, taking Roland
by the arm, and giving him a piercing, perhaps
even a pitying, look, delivered him likewise into
the hands of the Piankeshaw; who, as if his
happiness
were now complete, received him with a
yell of joy, that was caught up by his two
companions
,
and finally joined in by all the savages
present.
This shout seemed to be the signal for the
breaking
up of the convention. All rose to their feet,
iterating
and reiterating the savage cry, while the
Piankeshaw
,
clutching his prize, and slipping a noose
around the thong that bound his arms,
endeavoured
to drag him to the horse, on which the young
men had already secured the keg of liquor, and
which they were holding in readiness for the elder
barbarian to mount.
At that conjuncture, and while Roland was
beginning
to suspect that even the wretched
consolation
of remaining in captivity by his kinswoman's
side was about to be denied him, and while the
main body of savages were obviously bidding
farewell to the little band of Piankeshaws, some
shaking them by the hands, while others made
game of the prisoner's distress in sundry Indian
ways, and all uttering yells expressive of their
different
feelings, there appeared rushing from the
copse, and running among the barbarians, the
damsel Telie Doe, who, not a little to the surprise
even of the ill-fated Roland himself, ran to his
side, caught the rope by which he was held, and
endeavoured frantically to snatch it from the
hands of the Piankeshaw.
The act, for one of her peculiarly timorous
spirit
,
was surprising enough; but a great
transformation
seemed to have suddenly taken place in
her character, and even her appearance, which
was less that of a feeble woman engaged in a
work of humanity, than of a tigress infuriated by
the approach of hunters against the lair of her
sleeping young. She grasped the cord with
unexpected
strength, and her eyes flashed fire as
they wandered around, until they met those of the
supposed half-breed, to whom she called with tones
of the most vehement indignation,Oh, father,
father! what are you doing? You won't give him
up to the murderers? You promised, you
promised
,
Peace, fool! interrupted the man thus
addressed
,
taking her by the arm, and endeavouring
to jerk her from the prisoner; away with you to
your place, and be silent.
I will not, father;I will not be silent, I will
not away! cried the girl, resisting his efforts, and
speaking with a voice that mingled the bitterest
reproach with imploring entreaty: you are a
white man, father, and not an Indian; yes, father,
you are
no
Indian; and you promised no harm
should be done,you did, father, you
did
promise
!
Away, gal, I tell you! thundered the
renegade
parent; and he again strove to drag her
from the prisoner. But Telie, as if driven frantic
by the act, flung her arms round Roland's body,
from which she was drawn only by an effort of
strength which her weak powers were unable to
resist. But even then she did not give over her
purpose; but starting from her father's arms, she
3*
ran screaming back to Roland, and would have
again clasped him in her own; when the
renegade
,
driven to fury by her opposition, arrested
her with one hand, and with the other catching up
a knife that lay in the grass, he made as if, in his
fit of passion, he would have actually plunged it
into her breast. His malevolent visage and brutal
threat awoke the terrors of the woman in her
heart, and she sank on her knees, crying with a
piercing voice, Oh father, don't kill me! don't
kill your own daughter!
Kill you, indeed! muttered the outlaw, with
a laugh of scorn; even Injuns don't kill their
own children. And taking advantage of her
terror
,
he beckoned to the Piankeshaw, who, as well
as all the other Indians, seemed greatly astounded
and scandalized at the indecorous interference of
a female in the affairs of warriors, to remove the
prisoner; which he did by immediately beginning
to drag him down the hill. The action was not
unobserved by the girl, whose struggles to escape
from her father's arms, to pursue, as it seemed,
after the soldier, Roland could long see, while her
wild and piteous cries were still longer brought to
his ears.
As for Roland himself, the words and actions of
the girl, though they might have awakened
suspicions
not before experienced, of her good faith,
and even appeared to show that it was less to
unlucky
accident than to foul conspiracy he owed
his misfortunes,did not, and could not, banish
the despair that absorbed his mind, to the
exclusion
of every other feeling. He seemed even to
himself to be in a dream, the sport of an incubus,
that oppressed every faculty and energy of spirit,
while yet presenting the most dreadful phantasms
to his imagination. His tongue had lost its
function
;
he strove several times to speak, but tongue
and spirit were alike paralyzed. The nightmare
oppressed mind and body together.
It was in this unhappy condition, the result of
overwrought feelings and intolerable bodily
suffering
,
that he was led by his Piankeshaw masters
down the hill to the river, which they appeared to
be about to pass; whilst the chief body of
marauders
were left to seek another road from the
field of battle. Here the old warrior descended
from his horse, and leaving Roland in charge of
the two juniors, stepped a little aside to a place
where was a ledge of rocks, in the face of which
seemed to be the entrance to a cavern, although
carefully blocked up by masses of stone, that had
been but recently removed from its foot. The
Piankeshaw, taking post directly in front of the
hole, began to utter many mournful ejaculations,
which were addressed to the insensate rock, or
perhaps to the equally insensate corse of a
comrade
concealed within. He drew also from a little
pouch,his medicine-bag,divers bits of bone,
wood, and feathers, the most valued idols of his
fetich
, which he scattered about the rock, singing
the while, in a highly lugubrious tone, the praises
of the dead, and shedding tears that might have
been supposed the outpourings of genuine sorrow.
But if sorrow it was that thus affected the spirits
of the warrior, as it seemed to have done on several
previous occasions, it proved to be as easily
consolable
as before, as the event showed; for having
finished his lamentations, and left the rock, he
advanced
towards Roland, whom he threatened for
the third time with his knife; when one of the
younger Indians muttering a few words of
remonstrance
,
and pointing at the same time to the keg
of fire-water on the horse's back, his grief and
rage expired together in a haw-haw, ten times
more obstreperous and joyous than any he had
indulged before. Then mounting the horse,
seemingly
in the best humour in the world, and taking
the end of the cord by which Roland was bound,
he rode into the water, dragging the unfortunate
prisoner along at his horse's heels; while the
younger Piankeshaws brought up the rear, ready to
prevent resistance on the soldier's part, should he
prove in any degree refractory.
In this ignominious manner the unhappy
Forrester
passed the river, to do which had, for
twenty-four hours, been the chief object of his
wishes. The ford was wide, deep, and rocky, and
the current strong, so that he was several times
swept from his feet, and, being unable to rise,
would have perished,happy could he have thus
escaped his tormentors,had not the young
warriors
been nigh to give him assistance. Assistance,
in such cases, was indeed always rendered; but
his embarrassments and perils only afforded food
for mirth to his savage attendants, who, at every
fall and dip in the tide, made the hills resound with
their vociferous laughter. It is only among
children
,
(we mean, of course,
bad
ones,) and savages,
who are but grown children, after all, that we find
malice and mirth go hand in hand,the will to
create misery and the power to see it invested in
ludicrous colours.
The river was at last crossed, and the bank
being
ascended, the three warriors paused a moment
to send their last greeting across to their allies,
who were seen climbing the hill, taking their own
departure from the battle-ground. Even Roland
was stirred from his stupefaction, as he beheld the
train, some on foot, some on the captured horses,
winding up the narrow road to the hill-top. He
looked among them for his Edith, and saw her,
or fancied he saw her, for the distance was
considerable
,supported
on one of the animals,
grasped
in the arms of a tall savage, the guard of the
grove, whose scarlet turban glittering in the
sunshine
,
and his ample white blanket flowing over
the flanks of the horse, made the most conspicuous
objects in the train. But while he looked,
barbarian
and captive vanished together behind the hill,
for they were at the head of the train. There
remained
a throng of footmen, who paused an
instant
on the crest of the ridge to return the
farewell
whoop of the three Piankeshaws. This being
done, they likewise vanished; and the Piankeshaws,
turning their faces towards the west, and dragging
the prisoner after them, resumed their journey.
CHAPTER III.
The
agony which Roland suffered from the
thong so tightly secured upon his wrists, was so
far advantageous as it distracted his mind from
the subject which had been at first the chief
source of his distress: for it was impossible to
think long even of his kinswoman, while enduring
tortures that were aggravated by every jerk of
the rope, by which he was dragged along; these
growing more insupportable every moment. His
sufferings, however, seemed to engage little of the
thoughts of his conductors; who, leaving the
buffalo
road, and striking into the pathless forest,
pushed onward at a rapid pace, compelling him to
keep up with them; and it was not until he had
twice fainted from pain and exhaustion, that,
after some discussion, they thought fit to loosen
the thong, which they afterwards removed
altogether
.
Then, whether it was that they were touched
at last with compassion, or afraid that death might
snatch the prisoner from their hands, if too
severely
treated, they proceeded even to take other
measures of a seemingly friendly kind, to allay
his pangs; washing his lacerated wrists in a little
brook, on whose banks they paused to give him
rest, and then binding them up, as well as the two
or three painful, though not dangerous, wounds he
had received, with green leaves, which one of the
juniors plucked, bruized, and applied with every
appearance of the most brotherly interest; while
the other, to equal, or surpass him in benevolence,
took the keg of whiskey from the horse's back,
and filling a little wooden bowl that he drew from
a pack, insisted that the prisoner should swallow
it. In this recommendation the old Piankeshaw
also concurred; but finding that Roland recoiled
with disgust, after an attempt to taste the fiery
liquid, he took the bowl into his own hands, and
despatched its contents at a draught. Good!
great good! he muttered, smacking his lips with
high gusto; white man make good drink!
Piankeshaw
great friend white-man's liquor.
Having thus opened their hearts, nothing could
be, to appearance, more friendly and
affectionate
than the bearing of the savages, at least so
long as they remained at the brook; and even
when the journey was resumed, which it soon
was, their deportment was but little less loving.
It is true, that the senior, before mounting his
horse, proceeded very coolly to clap the noose,
which had previously been placed on Roland's
arms, around his neck, where it bade fair to
strangle
him, at the first false step of the horse; but
the young Indians walked at his side, chattering
in high good-humour; though, as their stock of
English extended only to the single phrase, `
Bozhoo
,
brudder,' which was not in itself very
comprehensible
,
though repeated at least twice every
minute, it may be supposed their conversation had
no very enlivening effect on the prisoner.
Nor was the old Piankeshaw much behind the
juniors in good humour; though, it must be
confessed
,
his feelings were far more capricious and
evanescent. One while he would stop his horse,
and dragging Roland to his side, pat him
affectionately
on the shoulder, and tell him, as well as
his broken language could express his intentions,
that he would take him to the springs of the
Wabash
,
one of the principal seats of his nation, and
make him his son and a great warrior; while at
other times, having indulged in a fit of sighing,
groaning, and crying, he would turn in a towering
rage, and express a resolution to kill him on the
spot,from which bloody disposition, however, he
was always easily turned by the interference of
the young men.
These capricious changes were perhaps owing
in a great measure to the presence of the
whiskey-keg
,
which the old warrior ever and anon
took from its perch among the packs behind him,
and applied to his lips, sorely, as it appeared,
against the will of his companions, who seemed
to remonstrate with him against a practice so
unbecoming a warrior, while in the heart of a
foeman's
country, and not a little also against his
own sense of propriety: for his whole course in
relation to the keg was like that of a fish that
dallies around the angler's worm, uncertain
whether
to bite, now looking and longing, now
suspecting
the hook and retreating, now returning to
look and long again, until, finally, unable to resist
the temptation, it resolves upon a little nibble,
which ends, even against its own will, in a furious
bite.
It was in this manner the Piankeshaw
addressed
himself to his treasure; the effect of which
was to render each returning paroxysm of
affection
and sorrow more energetic than before,
while it gradually robbed of their malignity those
fits of anger with which he was still occasionally
seized. But it added double fluency to his tongue;
and, not content with muttering his griefs in his
own language, addressing them to his own
people
,
he finally began to pronounce them in
English
,
directing them at Roland; whereby the
latter
was made acquainted with the cause of his
sorrow. This, it appeared, was nothing less than
the loss of a son, killed in the battle with the
Kentuckians
,
and left to moulder, with two or three
Shawnee corses, in the cave by the river-side;
which loss he commemorated a dozen times over,
and with a most piteous voice, in a lament that
celebrated the young warrior's virtues: Lost
son, he ejaculated; good huntaw: kill bear,
kill buffalo, catch fish, feed old squaw, and young
squaw, and little papoosegood son! mighty good
son! Good fighting-man: kill man Virginnee, kill
man Kentucky, kill man Injun-man; take scalp,
squaw scalp, papoose scalp, man scalp, all kind
scalpdebbil good fighting-man! No go home
no more Piankeshaw nation; no more kill bear,
no more kill buffalo, no more catch fish, no more
feed old squaw, and young squaw, and little
papoose
;
no more kill man, no more take scalp
lose own scalp, take it Long-knife man Kentucky;
no more see old Piankeshaw son,leave dead,
big hole Kentucky; no more see no more
Piankeshaw
son, Piankeshaw nation!
With such lamentations, running at times into
rage against his prisoner, as the representative
of those who had shed the young warrior's blood,
the old Piankeshaw whiled away the hours of
travel; ceasing them only when seized with a fit
of affection, or when some mis-step of the horse
sent a louder gurgle, with a more delicious odour,
from the cask at his back; which music and
perfume
together were a kind of magic not to be
resisted by one who stood so greatly in need of
consolation.
The effect of such constant and liberal
visitations
VOL. II.4
to the comforter and enemy of his race,
continued for several hours together, was soon
made manifest in the old warrior, who grew more
loquacious, more lachrymose, and more foolish
every moment; until, by and by, having travelled
till towards sunset, a period of six or seven hours
from the time of setting out, he began to betray
the most incontestable evidences of intoxication.
He reeled on the horse's back, and finally,
becoming
tired of the weight of his gun, he extended it
to Roland, with a very magisterial yet friendly
nod, as if bidding him take and carry it. It was
snatched from him, however, by one of the younger
warriors, who was too wise to intrust a loaded
carbine in the arms of a prisoner, and who had
perhaps noted the sudden gleam of fire, the first
which had visited them since the moment of his
capture, that shot into Roland's eyes, as he
stretched forth his hands to take the weapon.
The old Piankeshaw did not seem to notice who
had relieved him of the burthen. He settled
himself
again on the saddle as well as he could, and
jogged onwards, prattling and weeping, according
to the mood of the moment, now droning out an
Indian song, and now nodding with drowsiness;
until at last slumber or stupefaction settled so
heavily upon his senses that he became incapable
of guiding his horse; and the weary animal,
checked by the unconscious rider, or stopping of
his own accord to browse the green cane-leaves
along the path, the Piankeshaw suddenly took a
lurch wider than usual, and fell, like a log, to the
ground.
The younger savages had watched the course
of proceedings on the part of the senior with
ill-concealed
dissatisfaction. The catastrophe
completed
their rage, which, however, was fortunately
expended upon the legitimate cause of
displeasure
.
They tumbled the unlucky cask from its
perch, and assailing it with horrible yells and as
much apparent military zeal as could have been
exercised upon a human enemy lying in like
manner
at their feet, they dashed it to pieces with
their tomahawks, scattering its precious contents
upon the grass.
While they were thus engaged, the senior rose
from the earth, staring about him for a moment
with looks of stupid inquiry; until beginning at
last to comprehend the accident that had
happened
him, and perhaps moved by the fate of his
treasure
,
he also burst into a fury; and snatching up
the nearest gun, he clapped it to the horse's head,
and shot it dead on the spot, roaring out, Cuss'
white-man hoss! throw ole Piankeshaw! No good
nothing! Cuss' debbil hoss!
This act of drunken and misdirected ferocity
seemed vastly to incense the younger warriors;
and the senior waxing as wrathful at the wanton
destruction of his liquor, there immediately
ensued
a battle of tongues betwixt the two parties,
who scolded and berated one another for the
space of ten minutes or more with prodigious
volubility
and energy, the juniors expatiating upon
the murder of the horse as an act of the most
unpardonable folly, while the senior seemed to
insist
that the wasting of so much good liquor was
a felony of equally culpable dye; and it is
probable
he had the better side of the argument, since
he contined to grumble for a long time even
after he had silenced the others.
But peace was at last restored, and the savages
prepared to resume their journey; but not until
they had unanimously resolved that the
consequences
of the quarrel should be visited upon the
head of the captive. Their apparent good-humour
vanished, and the old Piankeshaw, staggering up,
gave Roland to understand, in an oration full of
all the opprobrious epithets he could muster,
either in English or Indian, that he, the
Piankeshaw
,
being a very great warrior, intended to
carry him to his country, to run the gauntlet
through every village of the nation, and then to
burn him alive, for the satisfaction of the women
and children; and while pouring this agreeable
intelligence into the soldier's ears, the juniors took
the opportunity to tie his arms a second time,
heaping on his shoulders their three packs; to
which the old man afterwards insisted on adding
the saddle and bridle of the horse, though for no
very ostensible object, together with a huge mass
of the flesh, dug with his knife from the still
quivering
carcass, which was perhaps designed for
their supper.
Under this heavy load, the unhappy and
degraded
soldier was compelled to stagger along
with his masters; but fortunately for no long
period. The night was fast approaching; and
having soon arrived at a little glade in the forest,
where a spring of sweet water bubbled from the
grass, they signified their intention to make it
their 'camping-ground for the night. A fire was
struck, the horse-flesh stuck upon a fork and
roasted
,
and a share of it tendered to the prisoner; who,
sick at heart, and feverish in body, refused it with
as much disgust as he had shown at the whiskey,
expressing his desire only to drink of the spring,
which he was allowed to do to his liking.
The savages then collected grass and leaves,
with which they spread a couch under a tree
beside
their fire; and here, having compelled the
soldier
to lie down, they proceeded to secure him for
the night with a cruel care, that showed what
value the loss of the horse and fire-water, the only
other trophies of victory, led them to attach to
him. A stake was cut and laid across his breast,
and to the ends of this his out-stretched arms were
bound at both wrist and elbow. A pole was then
laid upon his body, to the extremities of which his
feet and neck were also bound; so that he was
secured as upon, or rather
under
, a cross, without
the power of moving hand or foot. As if even
this were not enough to satisfy his barbarous
companions
,
they attached an additional cord to his
neck; and this, when they lay down beside him
to sleep, one of the young warriors wrapped
several
times round his own arm, so that the slightest
movement of the prisoner, were such a thing
possible
,
must instantly rouse the jealous savage
from his slumbers.
These preparations being completed, the young
men lay down, one on each side of the prisoner,
and were soon fast asleep.
The old Piankeshaw, meanwhile, sat by the fire,
now musing in drunken revelry,`in cogibundity
of cogitation,'now grumbling a lament for his
perished son, which, by a natural license of
affliction
,
he managed to intermingle with regrets for
his lost liquor, and occasionally heaping
maledictions
upon the heads of his wasteful companions,
or soliciting the prisoner's attention to an account
that he gave him at least six times over, of the
peculiar ceremonies which would be observed in
burning him, when once safely bestowed in the
Piankeshaw nation. In this manner, the old
savage
,
often nodding, but always rousing again,
succeeded
in amusing himself nearly half the night
long; and it was not until near midnight that he
thought fit, after stirring up the fire, and adding a
4*
fresh log to it, to stretch himself beside one of the
juniors, and grumble himself to sleep. A few
explosive
and convulsive snorts, such as might have
done honour to the nostrils of a war-horse,
marked
the gradations by which he sank to repose;
then came the deep, long-drawn breath of mental
annihilation, such as distinguished the slumber of
his companions.
To the prisoner alone sleep was wholly denied;
for which the renewed agonies of his bonds, tied
with the supreme contempt for suffering which
always marks the conduct of savages to their
captives, would have been sufficient cause, had
there even been no superior pangs of spirit to
banish
the comforter from his eyelids. Of his feelings
during the journey from the river,which, in
consequence of numberless delays caused by the
old Piankeshaw's drunkenness, could scarce have
been left more than eight or ten miles behind,
we have said but little, since imagination can only
picture them properly to the reader. Grief,
anguish
,
despair, and the sense of degradation
natural
to a man of proud spirit, a slave in the hands
of coarse barbarians, kept his spirit for a long time
wholly subdued and torpid; and it was not until
he perceived the old Piankeshaw's repeated
potations
,
and their effects, that he began to wake
from his lethargy, and question himself whether
he might not yet escape, and, flying to the nearest
settlements for assistance, strike a blow for the
recovery of his kinswoman. Weak from
exhaustion
and wounds, entirely unarmed, and closely
watched, as he perceived he was, by the young
warriors, notwithstanding their affected
friendship
,
it was plain that nothing could be hoped for,
except from caution on his part, and the most
besotted
folly on that of his captors. This folly was
already made perceptible in at least one of the
party; and as he watched the oft-repeated
visitations
of the senior to the little keg, he began to
anticipate the period when the young men should
also betake themselves to the stupifying draught,
and give him the opportunity he longed for with
frantic, though concealed, impatience. This hope
fell when the cask was dashed to pieces: but hope,
once excited, did not easily forsake him. He had
heard, and read, of escapes made by captives like
himself, from Indians, when encamped by night in
the woods,nay, of escapes made when the
number
of captors and the feebleness of the captive,
(for even women and boys had thus obtained their
deliverance,) rendered the condition of the latter
still more wretched than his own. Why might not
he
, a man and soldier, guarded by only three
foemen
,
succeed, as others had succeeded, in freeing
himself?
This question, asked over and over again, and
each time answered with greater hope and
animation
than before, employed his mind until his
wary captors had tied him to the stakes, as has
been mentioned, leaving him as incapable of
motion
as if every limb had been solidified into stone.
Had the barbarians been able to look into his soul
at the moment when he first strove to test the
strength of the ligatures, and found them resisting
his efforts like bands of brass, they would have
beheld deeper and wilder tortures than any they
could hope to inflict, even at the stake. The effort
was repeated once, twice, thricea thousand
times,but always in vain: the cords were too
securely tied, the stakes too carefully placed, to
yield to his puny struggles. He was a prisoner in
reality,without resource, without help, without
hope.
And thus he passed the whole of the bitter night,
watching the slow progress of moments counted
only by the throbbings of his fevered temples, the
deep breathings of the Indians, and the motion of
the stars creeping over the vista opened to the
skies from the little glade, a prey to despair, made
so much more poignant by disappointment and
self-reproach. Why had he not taken advantage
of his temporary release from the cords, to attempt
escape by open flight, when the drunkenness of
the old Piankeshaw would have increased the
chances of success? He had lost his best ally in
the cask of liquor; but he resolved,if the
delirious
plans of a mind tossed by the most phrensied
passions could be called resolutions,a second
day should not pass by without an effort better
becoming a soldier, better becoming the only friend
and natural protector of the hapless Edith.
In the meanwhile, the night passed slowly away;
the moon, diminished to a ghastly crescent, rose
over the woods, looking down with a sickly smile
upon the prisoner,an emblem of his decayed
fortunes and waning hopes; and a pale streak, the
first dull glimmer of dawn, was seen stealing up
the skies. But neither moon nor streak of dawn
yet threw light upon the little glade. The
watch-fire
had burned nearly away, and its flames no
longer illuminated the scene. The crackling of the
embers, with an occasional echo from the wood
hard by, as of the rustling of a rabbit, or other
small animal, drawn by the unusual appearance
of fire near his favourite fountain, to satisfy a
timorous curiosity, was the only sound to be heard;
for the Indians were in the dead sleep of morning,
and their breathing was no longer audible.
The silence and darkness together were doubly
painful to Roland, who had marked the streak of
dawn, and longed with fierce impatience for the
moment when he should be again freed from his
bonds, and left to attempt some of those desperate
expedients which he had been planning all the
night long. In such a frame of mind, even the
accidental falling of a half-consumed brand upon
the embers, and its sudden kindling into flame,
were circumstances of an agreeable nature; and
the ruddy glare thrown over the boughs above his
head was welcomed as the return of a friend,
bringing with it hope, and even a share of his long
lost tranquillity.
But tranquillity was not fated to dwell long in
his bosom. At that very moment, and while the
blaze of the brand was brightest, his ears were
stunned by an explosion bursting like a
thunderbolt
at his very head, but whether coming from
earth or air, from the hands of Heaven or the
fire-lock
of a human being, he knew not; and
immediately
after there sprang a huge dark shadow
over his body, and there was heard the crash as
of an axe falling upon the flesh of the young
Indian
who slept on his right side. A dismal shriek,
the utterance of agony and terror, rose from the
barbarian's lips; and then came the sound of his
footsteps, as he darted, with a cry still wilder,
into the forest, pursued by the sound of other
steps; and then all again was silent,all save
groans, and the rustling in the grass of limbs
convulsed
in the death-throe at the soldier's side.
Astounded, bewildered, and even horror-struck,
by these incomprehensible events, the work of but
an instant, and all unseen by Roland, who, from
his position, could look only upwards towards the
boughs and skies, he would have thought himself
in a dream, but for the agonized struggles of the
young Indian at his side, which he could plainly
feel as well as hear; until by and by they subsided,
as if in sudden death. Was it a rescue? was that
shot fired by a friend? that axe wielded by a
human
auxiliary? those sounds of feet dying away
in the distance, were they the steps of a deliverer?
The thought was ecstasy, and he shouted aloud,
Return, friend, and loose me! return!
No voice replied to the shout; but it roused
from the earth a dark and bloody figure, which
staggering and falling over the body of the young
warrior, crawled like a scotched reptile upon
Roland's
breast; when the light of the fire shining
upon it revealed to his eyes the horrible spectacle
of the old Piankeshaw warrior, the lower part of
his face shot entirely away, and his eyes rolling
hideously, and, as it seemed, sightlessly, in the
pangs of death, his hand clutching the knife with
which he had so often threatened, and with which
he yet seemed destined to take, though in the last
gasp of his own, the soldier's life. With one hand
he felt along the prisoner's body, as if seeking a
vital part, and sustained his own weight, while
with the other he made repeated, though feeble
and ineffectual, strokes with the knife, all the time
rolling, and staggering, and shaking his gory head
in a manner most horrible to behold. But
vengeance
was denied the dying warrior; his blows
were offered impotently, and without aim; and
becoming weaker at every effort, his left arm at
last failed to support him, and he fell across
Roland's
body; in which position he immediately
after expired.
In this frightful condition Roland was left,
shocked, although relieved from fear, by the
savage's
death, crying in vain to his unknown
auxiliary
for assistance. He exerted his voice, until the
woods rang with his shouts; but hollow echoes
were the only replies: neither voice nor returning
footstep was to be heard; and it seemed as if he
had been rescued from the Indians' hands, only to
be left, bound and helpless, to perish piecemeal
among their bodies. The fear of a fate so
dreadful
,
with the weight of the old Piankeshaw, a man
of almost gigantic proportions, lying upon his
bosom, was more than his agonized spirits and
exhausted strength could endure; and his wounds
suddenly bursting out afresh, he lapsed into a state
of insensibility,in which, however, it was
happily
his fate not long to remain.
CHAPTER IV.
When
Roland recovered his consciousness, he
was no longer a prisoner extended beneath the
Indian cross. His limbs were unbound, and he
himself lying across the knees of a man who was
busily engaged sprinkling his head and breast with
water from the little well, to which he had been
borne while still insensible. He stared around him
with eyes yet filmy and vacant. The first objects
they fell on were two lifeless figures, the bodies
of his late savage masters, stretched near the
half-extinguished
fire. He looked up to the face of
his deliverer, which could be readily seen, for it
was now broad day, and beheld, with such a
thrill of pleasure as had not visited his bosom for
many weary days, the features of his trusty guide
and emissary, honest Nathan Slaughter, who was
pursuing the work of resuscitation with great
apparent zeal, while little dog Peter stood by
wagging his tail, as if encouraging him to
perseverance
.
What, Nathan! he cried, grasping at his
hand, and endeavouring, though vainly, to rise
from his knee, do I dream! is it
you?
Verily, thee speaks the truth, replied Nathan;
it is me,me and little Peter; and, truly, it is
nobody else.
And I am free again? free, free!And the
savages? the vile, murdering Piankeshaws? Dead!
surprised, killed,every dog of them!
Thee speaks the truth a second time, said
Nathan Slaughter, snuffling and hesitating in his
speech: thee wicked enemies and captivators
will never trouble thee more.
And who,who was it that rescued me?
Hah! there is blood on your face! your hands
are red with it! It was
you
, then, that saved
me?
you
that killed the accursed cut-throats?
Noble Nathan! brave Nathan! true Nathan!
how shall I ever requite the act? how shall I ever
forget it? And as he spoke, the soldier, yet lying
across Nathan's knees, for his limbs refused to
support him, grasped his preserver's hands with
a fervour of gratitude that gave new life and
vigour
to his exhausted spirits.
And thee does not think then, muttered
Nathan
,
snuffling twice as much as before, but
growing
bolder as Roland's gratitude reassured him,
thee does not think,that is, thee is not of
opinion,that is to say, thee does not
altogether
hold it to be as a blood-guiltiness, and a
wickedness, and a shedding of blood, that I did
take to me the weapon of war, and shoot upon
thee wicked oppressors, to the saving of thee life?
Truly, friend, it was to save thee life,thee must
remember
that;
it was as a thing that was
necessary
,
and not to be helped. Truly, friend, it was
my desire to help thee in peace, and with a
peaceful
hand; but, of a truth, there was thee enemies
at thee side, with their guns and their knives,
ready to start up and knock out thee unfortunate
brains. Truly, friend, thee sees it could n't be
helped; and, truly, I don't think thee conscience
can condemn me.
Condemn you indeed! cried the young man;
VOL. II.5
it was an act to bind my gratitude for ever,
an act to win you the admiration and respect of
the whole world, which I shall take care to make
acquainted with it.
Nay, friend, said Nathan, hastily, the less
thee says of it the better: if thee is theeself
satisfied
in thee conscience of its lawfulness, it is
enough. Do thee therefore hold thee tongue on
this and all other matters wherein thee has seen
me do evil; for, truly, I am a man of a peaceful
faith, and what I have done would be but as a
grief and a scandal to the same.
But my friends,my poor Edith!wretch
that I am to think of myself, or of others, while
she is still a captive! cried Roland, again
endeavouring
to rise. But his limbs, yet paralyzed from
the tightness with which the thongs had been
bound around them, tottered beneath him, and but
for Nathan, he must have fallen to the earth.
The emigrants, he continued with incoherent
haste;you brought them? They are pursuing
the savages? they have rescued her? Speak,
Nathan,tell me all; tell me that my cousin is
free!
Truly, friend, muttered Nathan, his
countenance
losing much of the equanimity that had
begun
to cover it, and assuming a darker and
disturbed
expression, thee doth confuse both
theeself
and me with many questions. Do thee be
content for awhile, till I chafe thee poor legs,
which is like the legs of a dead man, and tie up
thee wounds. When thee can stand up and walk,
thee shall know all I have to tell thee, both good
and bad. It is enough thee is theeself safe.
Alas, I read it all from your looks, cried the
soldier; Edith is still a prisoner: and I lie here
a miserable, crushed worm, incapable of aiding,
unable even to die for her! But the emigrants,
my friends?
they
are at least urging the pursuit?
there is a hope they will retake her?
Truly, friend, said Nathan, thee shall know
all, if thee will but have patience, and hold thee
tongue. Truly, the many things thee says doth
perplex me. If thee loves thee poor kinswoman,
and would save her from cruel bondage and
sorrow
,
thee must be quiet till I have put thee again
upon thee legs; which is the first thing to be
thought about: and after that, thee shall have my
counsel and help to do what is good and proper
for the maiden's redeeming.
With these words, Nathan again addressed
himself
to the task of chafing Roland's half lifeless
limbs, and binding up the several light, though
painful wounds which he had received in the
conflict
:
and the soldier submitting in despair, though
still entreating Nathan to tell him the worst, the
latter began at last to relate his story.
The bold attempt of Nathan to pass the line of
besiegers at the ruin, it seemed, he had
accomplished
without difficulty, though not without risk;
but this part of the narrative he hurried over, as
well as his passage of the river at a solitary and
dangerous ford in the wildest recesses of the
forest. Then striking through the woods, and
aiming for the distant Station, he had arrived
within but a few miles of it, when it was his
fortune to stumble upon the band of
Regulators
,
who, after their memorable exploit at the
beech-tree, had joined the emigrants, then on
their march through the woods, and convoyed
them to the Station. Here passing the night in
mirth and frolic, they were startled at an early
hour, by the alarming intelligence, brought by a
volunteer hunter, who had obtained it none could
tell how, of the presence of the Indian army on
the North side; and leaving their friends to arm
and follow as they could, the visiters immediately
mounted their horses to return to Bruce's Station,
and thence to seek the field of battle. To these
unexpected
friends, thus opportunely met in the
woods, Nathan imparted his story, acquainting
them, in the same words, of the presence of
enemies so much nearer at hand than was
dreamed
,
and of the unfortunate dilemma of Forrester
and his helpless party,an account that fired the
blood of the hot youths as effectually as it could
have done if expressed in the blast of a bugle. A
council of war being called on the spot, it was
resolved to gallop at once to the rescue of the
travellers
,
without wasting time in seeking additional
assistance from the emigrants or their neighbours
of the Station just left; which indeed, as from
Nathan's observations, it did not seem that the
numbers of the foe could be more than double
their own, the heroic youths held to be entirely
needless. Taking Nathan up, therefore, behind
him, and bearing him along, to point out the
position
of the Indians, the gallant Tom Bruce,
followed
by his equally gallant companions, dashed
through the woods, and succeeded by day-break
in reaching the ruin; where, as Nathan averred,
so judiciously had they laid their plans for the
attack, the Indians, if still there, might have been
surprised, entirely worsted, and perhaps the half
of them cut off upon the spot; `which,' as he
rather hastily observed, `would have been a great
comfort to all concerned.' But the ruin was
deserted
,
besiegers and besieged had alike vanished,
as well as the bodies of those assailants who had
fallen in the conflict, to find their graves under
the ruins, among the rocks, or in the whirling
eddies of the river. The tracks of the horses
being
discovered in the ravine and at the water's
edge, it was inferred that the whole party, too
desperate, or too wise, to yield themselves
prisoners
,
had been driven into the river, and there
drowned; and this idea inflaming the fury of the
Kentuckians to the highest pitch, they sought out
and easily discovered among the canes, the fresh
trail of the Indians, which they followed,
resolving
to exact the fullest measure of revenge.
Nathan
,
the man of peace, from whom (for he had
not thought proper to acquaint the young men
with the warlike part he had himself taken in the
battles of the night,) no further services were
expected
,
was now turned adrift, to follow, or
protect
himself as he might; and the young men
betook themselves to the pursuit with as much
speed as the wild character of the woods
permitted
.
But it formed no part of honest Nathan's
designs
to be left behind. His feelings were too
deeply involved in the fate of the unhappy
individuals
,
whose misadventures he could, or thought
he could, so clearly trace to his own indiscretion,
to suffer him to rest, while it was yet wrapped in
obscurity. He had accepted the charge and
responsibility
of extricating them from their perils;
and his conscience could not be appeased, until
he had determined for himself whether in truth
they were yet beyond the reach of assistance.
Making his own observations from the
appearance
of the different tracks in the ravine, and
satisfying himself there was among them one
more christian foot-print than could be accounted
for, he followed after the young men, examining
5*
the Indian trail in places where it had not been
effaced by the Kentuckians, until he became
convinced
that the fugitives had, in some
unaccountable
way, escaped alive from the river, and were
still struggling in retreat, led by some friendly
guide, although closely pursued by the foe. This
discovery, it was also probable, had been made
by the Kentuckians, who had, in consequence,
urged their horses to the utmost, and arriving on
the hill where the savages lay in ambush, rushed
to the attack, and fought and lost the battle, before
Nathan could reach them. He met them, indeed,
retreating in full route before the victors, many
wounded, all overcome by panic, and none
willing
,
or able, to throw any light upon the cause
of defeat. One, indeed, checking his horse a
moment
to bid the man of peace look to himself and
avoid the savages, who were still urging the
pursuit
,
hastily assured him that the defeat was all
owing to Captain Ralph's ghost, which had
suddenly
got among them, yelling for vengeance on
his executioners; for which reason the
conscience-stricken
Regulator called Nathan to witness his
oath, which he now made, `that he would never
Lynch a man again as long as he lived.' And
the worthy warrior, having added, with another
oath, which he called a still superior power to
attest
,
`that he had seen Stackpole fly off with Tom
Bruce's soul on the back of a devil in shape of a
big black horse breathing flames and sulphur,'
struck spur again into his own charger,not,
however, until he had first generously invited
Bloody Nathan to get up behind him, to escape
the savage pursuers, who were now seen close
behind. Declining the heroic offer, and bidding
the youth effect his own escape, Nathan
immediately
dived, with his inseparable friend and
adviser
,
little Peter, among the canes; where he lay
concealed until well assured the victors had
abandoned
the pursuit, and returned to the field of
battle.
Then, friend, said the man of peace, who
may now be permitted to tell his own story, I
took counsel of Peter as to what we should do;
and, truly, it was our opinion we should creep
after the murdering Shawnee creatures, (though,
verily, there was more than Shawnees engaged
in this wicked business,) and see what had become
of thee, and thee poor women; being that we
were in a manner, as I may say, the cause of thee
troubles, in carrying thee to the very place where
we should not, wicked sinners that we arethat
is, wicked sinner that
I
am; for, truly, little Peter
had nothing to do with that matter, having done
his best to keep us from the ruin. Well, friend, as
soon as we thought it safe, we crept to the spot
on the hill-side; and safe enough it was, the
savages
having departed, leaving nothing behind
them, save two young Kentuckians, and the
coloured
person, whom they had prevailed over, and
hewn to pieces with their hatchets; besides four
corpses of their own, which they had stuck in a
cave, where Peter snuffed them outtruly, friend,
thee don't know what a nose little Peter has!
Well, friend, I saw then that thee enemies had
divided, the main body departing one way over
the hill, while a smaller party had crossed the
river with a horse and prisoner. Truly, it was
Peter's opinion that this prisoner was theeself,
thee own very self, (a thing I could not be so
certain
of on my part, seeing that I had never
tracked thee save by thee horse-prints only,) and
that, if we followed thee, we might, in some way,
aid thee to escape, thee captivators being so few
in number. And so, friend, we waded the river,
and followed thee trail until night came; when
little Peter undertook to nose thee on in the dark;
which he did very successfully, until we reached
the place where the savages had killed their
horse, and broken their cask of liquor; when,
truly, the scent of the same did so prevail over
Peter's nose, that I was in fear he never would
smell right again in all his life; which was a
great grief to me; for, truly, Peter's nose is, as I
may say, the staff of my life, my defence, and
my succour(Truly, thee don't know the value
of little Peter's nose!) And, moreover, the
savour
of the dead horse did somewhat captivate
his attention; for, truly, little Peter is but a dog,
and he loves horse flesh. Well, friend, this was
a thing that perplexed me: until, by and by,
having
brought little Peter to reason in the matter of
the horse, and washed his nose in a brook which
it was my fortune to discover, he did bethink him
what he was after, and so straightway hunt for
the track; which being recovered, we went on
our way, until we lighted right on thee
captivators'
camp-fire; and, truly, we lighted upon it
much sooner than we expected. Well, friend,
continued the narrator, having crept up as near
as I durst, I could see how thee was fixed, tied to
the poles so thee could not help theeself, and the
three savages lying beside thee with their guns
in the hollows of their arms, ready to be seized
in a moment. Truly, friend, the sight threw me
into another perplexity; and I lay watching thee
and thee cruel oppressors for more than an
hour, marvelling in what way I could give thee
help.
An hour! cried Roland; a friend lying by
me during that hour, the most wretched and
distracted
of my whole existence? Had you but
cut the rope, and given me the knife to strike a
blow for myself!
Truly, said the man of peace, I did so
desire
to do, seeing that then thee might have killed
the Injuns theeself; which would have been more
seemly, as being a thing thee conscience would
not disapprove of; whereas mine, as thee may
suppose, was quite averse to any such bloody
doings
on my own part. But, truly, I durst not
adventure
upon the thing thee speaks of; for, first,
I saw by the stick on thee breast, thee was tied
so tight and fast, it would be an hour's work to
cut thee loose,thee captivators lying by all the
while; and, secondly, I knew, by the same
reason
,
thee limbs would be so numb thee could
neither stand upon thee legs, nor hold a weapon
in thee hand, for just as long a time; and,
besides
,
I feared, in case thee should discover there
was help nigh at hand, thee might cry out in thee
surprise, and so alarm thee sleeping captivators.
And so, friend, I was in what thee may call a
pucker, not knowing what to do; and so I lay
hard by thee, with Peter at the back of me,
watching and revolving the matter for that whole
hour, as I told thee; when suddenly down fell a
stick into the fire, and the same blazing up
brightly
,
I saw two of the savages lying beside thee,
their heads so close together thee might have
supposed
they both grew from the same pair of
shoulders, and so nigh to me withal, that, verily,
I might have poked them with the muzzle of my
gun. Truly, friend, continued Nathan, looking
both bewildered and animated, as he arrived at
this period of his story, I can't tell thee how it then
happened,whether it was a sort of nervousness
in my fingers' ends, or whether it was all an
accident
;
but, truly, as it happened, my gun went
off in my hands, as it might be of its own accord,
and, truly, it blew the two evil creatures' brains
out! And then, friend, thee sees, there was no
stopping, there being the third of thee
captivators
to look after; and, truly, as I had done so
much, I thought I might as well do all,the
killing
of three men being but a little worse than the
killing of two; and, besides, the creature would
have hurt thee, as thee lay at his mercy. And so,
friend, I did verily spring upon him, sinner that I
am, and strike him a blow with my hatchet,
which I had taken from my belt to be ready;
whereupon he fled, and I after him, being in great
fear lest, if he escaped, he should return upon
thee and kill thee, before I could get back to cut
thee loose. And so, friend, it happened that
that I killed him likewise!for which I don't think
thee can, in thee heart, blame me, seeing that it
was all over and over again on
thee
account, and
nobody else's. Truly, friend, it is quite amazing,
the ill things thee has brought me to!
Had there been twenty of the villains, and
you had killed them all, I should have held it the
noblest and most virtuous act you could have
performed
,
said Roland, too fiercely agitated by his
own contending passions to note the strange
medley
of self-accusing and exculpatory expressions,
the shame-faced, conscience-stricken looks,
alternating
with gleams of military fire and
self-complacency
,
with which the man of peace
recounted
his bloody exploit, or the adroit attempt with
which he concluded it, to shuffle the responsibility
of the crime, if crime it were, from his own to
the young Virginian's shoulders. At another
moment
,
the latter might have speculated with as
much surprise as approval on the extraordinary
metamorphosis of Nathan, the man of amity and
good will, into a slayer of Indians, double-dyed in
gore; but at that juncture, he had little
inclination
to dwell on any thing save his own liberation
and the hapless fate of his cousin.
CHAPTER V.
By
dint of chafing and bathing in the spring,
still foul and red with the blood of the
Piankeshaws
,
the limbs of the soldier soon recovered
their strength, and he was able to rise, to
survey
the scene of his late sufferings and liberation,
and again recur to the harassing subject of his
kinswoman's fate. Again he beset Bloody
Nathan
now
undoubtedly worthy the namewith
questions, which soon recalled the disturbed looks
which his deliverer had worn when first assailed
with interrogatories. He adjured him to complete
the good work he had so bravely begun, by
leaving
himself to his fate, and making his way to the
emigrants, or to the nearest inhabited Station,
whence assistance might be procured to pursue
the savages and their captives, before it might be
too late. Lead the party first to the
battle-ground
,
he said: I am now as a child in
strength, but I can crawl thither to meet you; and
once on a horse again, be assured no one shall
pursue better or faster than I.
If thee thinks of rescuing the maiden, said
Nathan
I will do so, or die, exclaimed Roland,
impetuously
;
and would to Heaven I could die
twice over, so I might snatch her from the
murdering
monsters. Alas! had you but followed
them, instead of these three curs; and done that
service to Edith you have done to me!
Truly, said Nathan, thee talks as if ten
men were as easily knocked on the head as ten
rabbits. But, hearken, friend, and do thee have
patience for a while! There is a thing in this
matter that perplexes me; and, verily, there is two
or three. Why did thee desert the ruin? and who
was it led thee through the canes? Let me know
what it was that happened thee; for, of a truth,
there is more in this same matter than thee
thinks.
Thus called upon, Roland acquainted Nathan
with the events that had succeeded his departure
from the ruin,the appearance of Ralph
Stackpole
,
and the flight of the party by the river,
circumstances that moved the wonder and
admiration
of Nathan,and with all the other
occurrences
up to the moment of the defeat of the
Kentuckians, and the division of the plunder
among the victorious Indians. The mention of
these spoils, the rifles, bolts of cloth, beads, bells,
and other gewgaw trinkets, produced an evident
impression on Nathan's mind; which was greatly
increased when Roland related the scene betwixt
Telie Doe and her reprobate father, and repeated
those expressions which seemed to show that the
attack upon the party was by no means
accidental
,
but the result of a previously formed
design
,
of which she was not ignorant.
Where Abel Doe is, there, thee may be sure,
there is knavery! said Nathan; demanding
earnestly
if Roland had seen no other white man in
the party.
I saw no other, he replied: but there was
a tall man in a blanket, wearing a red turban, who
looked at me from a distance; and I thought he
was a half-breed, like Doe,for so, at first, I
supposed
the latter to be.
VOL. II6
Well, friend! And he seemed to command
the party, did he not? demanded Nathan, with
interest.
The leader, replied Roland, was a vile,
grim old rascal, that they called Kehauga, or
Kenauga, or
Wenonga! cried Nathan, with extraordinary
vivacity, his whole countenance, in fact, lighting
up with the animation of intense interest,an
old man tall and raw-boned, a scar on his nose
and cheek, a halt in his gait, his left middle-finger
short of a joint, and a buzzard's beak and talons
tied to his hair?It is Wenonga, the
Black-Vulture
!Truly,
little Peter! thee is but a dolt and
a dog, that thee told me nothing about it!
The soldier remarked with some surprise, the
change in Nathan's visage, and with still more,
his angry reproaches of the trusty animal, the first
he had heard him utter.
And who then is the old Black-Vulture, he
asked, that he should drive from your mind even
the thought of my poor wretched Edith?
Thee is but a boy in the woods, if thee never
heard of Wenonga, the Shawnee, replied
Nathan
,
hastily,a man that has left the mark of
his axe on many a ruined cabin along the frontier,
from the Bloody Run of Bedford to the Kenhawa
and the Holston. He is the chief that boasts he
has no heart: and, truly, he has none, being a
man that has drunk the blood of women and
childrenFriend! thee kinswoman's scalp is
already
hanging at his girdle!
This horrible announcement, uttered with a
fierce earnestness that proved the sincerity of the
speaker, froze Roland's blood in his veins, and he
stood speechless and gasping; until Nathan,
noting
his agitation, and recovering in part from his
own ferment of spirits, exclaimed, even more
hastily than beforeTruly, I have told thee
what is falseThee kinswoman is safe,a
prisoner
,
but alive and safe.
You have told me she is deadmurdered by
the foul assassins, said Roland; and if it be so,
it avails not to deny it. If it be so, Nathan, he
continued, with a look of desperation, I call
Heaven and earth to witness, that I will pursue
the race of the slayers with thrice the fury of
their own malice,never to pause, never to rest,
never to be satisfied with vengeance, while an
Indian
lives with blood to be shed, and I with
strength to shed it.
Thee speaks like a man! said Nathan,
grasping
the soldier's hand, and fairly crushing it in his
gripe,that is to say, he continued, suddenly
letting go his hold, and seeming somewhat
abashed
at the fervour of his sympathy, like a man,
according to thee own sense of matters and
things. But do thee be content; thee poor
maid is alive, and like to be so; and that thee
may be assured of it, I will soon tell thee the
thing that is on my mind. Friend, do thee
answer
me a questionHas thee any enemy among
the Injuns?that is to say, any reprobate
white-man
like this Abel Doe,who would do thee a
wrong?
The soldier stared with surprise, and replied in
the negative.
Has thee no foe, then, at home, whom thee
has theeself wronged to that point that he would
willingly league with murdering Injuns to take
thee life?
I have my enemies, doubtless, like all other
men, said Roland, but none so basely, so
improbably
malignant.
Verily, then, thee makes me in a perplexity as
before, said Nathan; for as truly as thee stands
before me, so truly did I see, that night when I
left thee at the ruins, and crawled through the
Injun
lines, a white man that sat at a fire with Abel
Doe, the father of the maid Telie, apart from the
rest, and counselled with him how best to sack
the cabin, without killing the two women.Truly,
friend, it was a marvel to myself, there being so
many of the murdering villains, that they did us
so little mischief: but, truly, it was because of the
women.And, truly, there was foul knavery
between
these two men; for I heard high words
and chaffering between them, as concerning a
price or reward which Abel Doe claimed of the
other for the help he was rendering him, in
snapping
thee up, with thee kinswoman. Truly, thee
must not think I was mistaken; for seeing the
man's red shawl round his head gleaming in the
fire, and not knowing there was any one nigh
him, (for Abel Doe lay flat upon the earth,) a
wicked thought came into my head; `for, truly,'
said I, `this man is the chief, and, being alone, a
man might strike him with a knife from behind
the tree he rests against, and being killed, his
people
will fly in fear, without any more bloodshed:'
but creeping nearer, I saw that he was but a
white man in disguise; and so, having listened
awhile, to hear what I could, and hearing what I
have told thee, I crept away on my journey.
The effect of this unexpected revelation upon
the young Virginian was as if an adder had
suddenly
fastened upon his bosom. It awoke a
suspicion
,
involving indeed an improbability such as
his better reason revolted at, but full of pain
and terror. But wild and incredible as it
seemed, it received a kind of confirmation from
what Nathan added.
The rifle-guns, the beads, and the cloth, he
said, that were distributed after the battle,
does thee think they were plunder taken from the
young Kentuckians they had vanquished? Friend,
these things were a price with which the white
man in the red shawl paid the assassin villains
for taking thee prisoner,thee and thee
kinswoman
.
His hirelings were vagabonds of all the
neighbouring tribes, Shawnees, Wyandots,
Delawares
,
and Piankeshaws, as I noted well when I
crept among them; and old Wenonga is the
greatest vagabond of all, having long since been
degraded by his tribe for bad luck, drunkenness,
and other follies, natural to an Injun. My own
idea is, that that white man thirsted for thee blood,
having given thee up to the Piankeshaws, who,
thee says, had lost one of their men in the battle;
for which thee would certainly have been burned
alive at their village: but what was his design in
captivating thee poor kinswoman that thee calls
Edith, truly I cannot divine, not knowing much of
thee history.
You shall hear it, said Roland, with hoarse
accents,at least so much of it as may enable
you to confirm or disprove your suspicions.
There is indeed one man whom I have always
esteemed my enemy, the enemy also of Edith,
a knave capable of any extremity, yet never
could I have dreamed, of a villany so daring, so
transcendant as this!
So saying, Roland, smothering his agitation as
he could, proceeded to acquaint his rude friend,
now necessarily his confidant, with so much of
his history as related to Braxley, his late uncle's
6*
confidential agent and executor;a man whom
Roland's revelations to the gallant and inquisitive
Colonel Bruce, and still more, perhaps, his
conversation
with Edith in the wood, may have
introduced
sufficiently to the reader's acquaintance.
But of Braxley, burning with a hatred he no
longer
chose to subdue, the feeling greatly
exasperated
,
also, by the suspicion Nathan's hints had
infused into his mind, he now spoke without
restraint
;
and assuredly, if one might have judged
by the bitterness of his invectives, the darkness of
the colours with which he traced the detested
portrait, a baser wretch did not exist on the whole
earth. Yet to a dispassionate and judicious hearer
it might have seemed that there was little in the
evidence to bear out an accusation so sweeping
and heavy. Little, indeed, had the soldier to
charge against him save his instrumentality in
defeating hopes and expectations, which had been
too long indulged to be surrendered without
anger
and pain. That this instrumentality,
considering
all the circumstances, was to be attributed
to base and fraudulent motives, it was natural to
suspect; but the proofs were far from being
satisfactory
,
as they rested chiefly on surmises and
assumptions.
It will be recollected, that on the death of
Major
Forrester, Braxley had brought to light a
testament of undoubted authenticity, but of ancient
date, in which the whole estate of the deceased
was bequeathed to his own infant child,an
unfortunate
daughter, who, however, it had never
been doubted, had perished many years before
among the flames of the cabin of her foster-mother,
but who Braxley had made oath, was, to the best
of his knowledge, still alive. His oath was founded,
he averred, upon the declaration of a man, the
husband of the foster-mother, a certain Atkinson,
whom tory principles and practices, and perhaps
crimes and outragesfor such were charged
against himhad long since driven to seek refuge
on the frontier, but who had privily returned to
the major's house, a few weeks before the latter's
death, and made confession that the girl was still
living; but, being recognised by an old
acquaintance
,
and dreading the vengeance of his
countrymen he had immediately fled again to the
frontier, without acquainting any one with the
place of the girl's concealment. The story of
Atkinson's
return was confirmed by the man who
had seen and recognised him, but who knew
nothing of the cause of his visit; and Braxley
declared he had already taken steps to ferret him
out, and had good hopes through his means of
recovering
the lost heiress.
This story Roland affected to believe a vile
fabrication, the result of a deep-laid, and,
unfortunately
,
too successful design on Braxley's part,
to get possession, in the name of an imaginary
heiress, of the rich estates of his patron. The
authenticity of the will, which had been framed at
a period when the dissentions between Major
Forrester
and his brothers were at the highest, Roland
did not doubt; it was the non-existence of the
individual
in whose favour it had been executed, a
circumstance which he devoutly believed, that
gave a fraudulent character to its production. He
even accused Braxley of having destroyed a second
will, (by which the former was of course annulled,
even supposing the heiress were still living,) a
testament framed a few months before his uncle's
death; in which the latter had bequeathed all his
possessions to Edith, the child of his adoption.
That such a second will had been framed,
appeared
from the testator's own admissions; at
least, he had so informed Edith, repeating the fact
on several different occasions. The fact, indeed,
even Braxley did not deny; but he averred, that
the second instrument had been destroyed by the
deceased himself, as soon as the confession of
Atkinson
had acquainted him with the existence of
his own unfortunate daughter. This explanation
Roland rejected entirely, insisting that during the
whole period of Atkinson's visit, and for some
weeks before, his uncle had been in a condition of
mental imbecility and unconsciousness, as
incapable
of receiving and understanding the
supposed
confession as he was of acting on it. The
story was only an additional device of Braxley to
remove from himself the suspicion of having
destroyed
the second will.
But whatever might have been thought of these
imputations, it was evident that the young soldier
had another cause for his enmity,one, indeed,
that seemed more operative on his mind and
feelings
than even the loss of fortune. The robber
and plunderer, for these were the softest epithets
he had for his rival, had added to his crimes the
enormity of aspiring to the affections of his
kinswoman
,
whom the absence of Roland and the
helpless imbecility of her uncle, left exposed to his
presumption and his arts. Had the maiden smiled
upon his suit, this indeed might have seemed a
legitimate cause of hatred on the part of Roland;
but Edith had repelled the lover with firmness,
perhaps even with contempt. The presumption of
such a rival Roland might perhaps have pardoned;
but he saw in the occurrences that followed, a
bitter and malignant revenge of the maiden's
scorn, which none but the basest of villains could
have attempted. It was this consideration which
gave the sharpest edge to the young man's hatred;
and it was his belief that a wretch capable of such
a revenge, was willing to add to it any other
measure
of villany, however daring and fiendish, that
had turned his thoughts upon Braxley, when
Nathan's
words first woke the suspicion of a foeman's
design and agency in the attack on his party.
How Braxley, a white-man and Virginian, and
therefore the foe of every western tribe, could
have so suddenly and easily thrown himself into
the arms of the savages, and brought them to his
own plans, it might have been difficult to say.
But anger is credulous, and fury stops not at
impossibilities
.
It is Braxley himself! he cried, at
the close of his narration; how can it be doubted?
He announced publicly his intention to proceed to
the frontier, to the Kenhawa settlements, in search
of the fabulous heiress, and was gone before our
party had all assembled in Fincastle. Thus, then,
he veiled his designs, thus concealed a meditated
villany. But his objectsIt was not my miserable
life he soughtwhat would that avail him?they
aimed at my cousin,and she is now in his
power!
Truly, then, said Nathan, who listened to the
story with great interest, and now commented on
Roland's agitation with equal composure, thee
doth make a great fuss for nothing; for, truly, the
maid will not be murderedTruly, thee has
greatly relieved my mind. Thee should not think
the man, being a white man, will kill her.
Kill her! cried RolandWould that twenty
bullets had pierced her heart, rather than she
should have fallen alive into the hands of Braxley!
Miserable wretch that I am; what can I do to save
her? We will rescue her, Nathan; we will seek
assistance; we will pursue the ravisher;it is not
yet too late. Speak to meI shall go distracted:
what must we do?what
can
we do?
Truly, said Nathan, I fear me, we can do
nothing.Don't thee look so frantic, friend; I
don't think thee has good sense. Thee talks of
assistancewhat is thee thinking about? where
would thee seek assistance? Has thee forgot the
Injun army is on the north side, and all the
fighting-men
of the Stations gone to meet them? There
is nobody to help thee.
But the emigrants, my friend? they are yet
night at hand
Truly, said Nathan, thee is mistaken. The
news of the Injuns, that brought friend Thomas
the younger into the woods, did greatly dismay
them, as the young men reported; and, truly, they
did resolve to delay their journey no longer, but
start again before the break of day, that they
might the sooner reach the Falls, and be in safety
with their wives and little-ones. There is no help
for thee. Thee and me is alone in the wilderness,
and there is no friend with us. Leave wringing
thee hands, for it can do thee no good.
I am indeed friendless, and there is no hope,
said Roland, with the accents of despair; while
we seek assistance, and seek it vainly, Edith is
lost,lost for ever! Would that we had perished
together! Hapless Edith! wretched Edith!Was
ever wretch so miserable as I?
With such expressions, the young man gave a
loose to his feelings, and Nathan surveyed, first with
surprise and then with a kind of gloomy
indignation
,
but never, as it seemed, with any thing like
sympathy, the extravagance of his grief.
Thee is but a madman! he exclaimed at last,
and with a tone of severity that arrested Roland's
attention: does thee curse thee fate, and the
Providence
that is above thee, because the maid of
thee heart is carried into captivity unharmed? Is
thee wretched, because thee eyes did not see the
Injun axe struck into her brain? Friend, thee
does not know what such a sight is; but
I
do
yes, I have looked upon such a thing, and I will
tell thee what it is; for it is good thee should
know. Look, friend, he continued, grasping
Roland
by the arm, as if to command his attention,
and surveying him with a look both wild and
mournful, thee sees a man before thee who was
once as young and as happy as thee,yea, friend,
happier, for I had many around me to love me,
the children of my body, the wife of my bosom,
the mother that gave me birth. Thee did talk of
such things to me in the wood,thee did mention
them one and all,wife, parent, and child! Such
things had I; and men spoke well of meBut
thee sees what I am! There is none of them
remaining
,none
only but
me;
and thee sees me
what I am! Ten years ago I was another man,
a poor man, friend, but one that was happy. I
dwelt upon the frontiers of Bedfordthee may
not know the place; it is among the mountains of
Pennsylvania, and far away.
There
was the
house that I did build me; and in it there was all
that I held dear, `my gray old mother'(that's
the way thee did call her, when thee spoke of her
in the wood!)`the wife of my bosom,' and `the
child of my heart,'the
children
, friend,for
there was five of them, sons and daughters
together
,little
innocent babes that had done no
wrong; and, truly, I loved them well. Well,
friend, the Injuns came around us: for being bold,
because of my faith that made me a man of peace,
and the friend of all men, I sat me down far on
the border. But the Shawnees came upon me,
and came as men of war, and their hands were
red with the blood of my neighbours, and they
raised them against my little infants. Thee asked
me in the wood, what I would do in such case,
having arms in my hand? Friend, I
had
arms in
my hand, at that moment,a gun that had shot
me the beasts of the mountain for food, and a
knife that had pierced the throats of bears in their
dens. I gave them to the Shawnee chief, that he
might know I was a friend.Friend! if thee
asks me now for my children, I can tell thee
With my own knife he struck down my eldest
boy! with my own gun he slew the mother of my
children!If thee should live till thee is gray,
thee will never see the sight I saw that day!
When thee has children that Injuns murder, as
thee stands by,a wife that clasps thee legs in
the writhing of death,her blood, spouting up to
thee bosom, where she has slept,an old mother
calling thee to help her in the death-struggle:
then, friend,
then
thee may seethen thee may
knowthen thee may feelthen thee may call
theeself wretched, for thee will be so! Here was
my little boy,does thee see? there his two
sisters
thee
understands?thereThee may think
I would have snatched a weapon to help them
then!
Wellthee is right:but it was too late!
All murdered, friend!allall,all cruelly
murdered!
It is impossible to convey an idea of the
extraordinary
vehemence, the wild accents, the frantic
looks, with which Nathan ended the horrid story,
into which he had been betrayed by his repining
companion. His struggles to subdue the passions
that the dreadful recollections of a whole family's
butchery awoke in his bosom, only served to add
double distortion to his changes of countenance,
which, a better index of the convulsion within
than were his broken, incoherent, half-inarticulate
words, assumed at last an appearance so wild, so
hideous, so truly terrific, that Roland was seized
with horror, deeming himself confronted with a
raging maniac. He raised his hand to remove
that of Nathan, which still clutched his arm, and
clutched it with painful force; but while in the
act, the fingers relaxed of themselves, and Nathan
dropped suddenly to the earth, as if struck down
by a thunderbolt, his mouth foaming, his eyes
distorted
,
his hands clenched, his body convulsed,
in short, exhibiting every proof of an epileptic fit,
brought on by overpowering agitation of mind.
As he fell, little Peter sprang to his side, and
throwing his paws on his unconscious
master's
breast, stood over him as if to protect
him, growling at Roland; who, though greatly
shocked at the catastrophe, did not hesitate to
offer such relief as was in his power.
Disregarding
the menace of the dog, which seemed at last
to understand the purpose was friendly, he raised
Nathan's head upon his knee, loosened the
neck-cloth
that bound his throat, and sprinkled his face
with water from the spring. While thus engaged,
the cap of the sufferer fell from his head, and
Roland
saw that Nathan carried with him a better
cause for the affliction than could be referred to
any mere temporary emotion, however
overwhelming
to the mind. A horrible scar disfigured
the top of his head, which seemed to have been,
many years before, crushed by the blows of a
heavy weapon; and it was equally manifest that
the savage scalping-knife had done
its
work on
the mangled head.
VOL. II.7
The soldier had heard that injuries to the head
often resulted in insanity of some species or other;
he could now speculate, on better grounds, and
with better reason, upon some of those singular
points of character which seemed to distinguish
the houseless Nathan from the rest of his
fellowmen
.
CHAPTER VI.
The
convulsion was but momentary, and
departed
with almost the same suddenness that
marked its accession. Nathan started half up,
looked wildly around him, surveying the bodies of
the two Piankeshaws, and the visage of the
sympathizing
soldier. Then snatching up and
replacing
his hat with one hand, and grasping Roland's
with the other, he exclaimed, as if wholly
unconscious
of what had happened him,
Thee has heard it, and thee knows it,thee
knows what the Shawnees have done to me
they have killed them all, all that was of my
blood! Had they done so by thee, friend, he
demanded
with wild eagerness, had they done so
by
thee
, what would thee have done to them?
Declared eternal war upon them and their
accursed
race! cried Roland, greatly excited by
the story; I would have sworn undying
vengeance
,
and I would have sought it,ay, sought
it without ceasing. Day and night, summer and
winter, on the frontier and in their own lands and
villages, I would have pursued the wretches, and
pursued them to the death.
Thee is right! cried Nathan, wringing the
hand he still held, and speaking with a grin of
hideous approval;by night and by day, in
summer and in winter, in the wood and in the
wigwam, thee would seek for their blood, and thee
would shed it;thee would think of thee wife and
thee little babes, and thee heart would be as stone
and fire within theethee would kill, friend, thee
would kill, thee would kill! And the
monosyllable
was breathed over and over again with a
ferocity
of emphasis that showed how deep and
vindictive was the passion in the speaker's mind.
Then,with a transition of feeling as unexpected
as it was abrupt, he added, still wringing
Roland's
hand, as if he had found in him a
sympathizing
friend, whose further kindness he was
resolved
to deserve, and to repay,Thee is right;
I have thought about what thee has saidThee
shall have assistance. Thee is a brave man, and
thee has not mocked at me because of my faith.
Thee enemies shall be pursued, and the maid
thee loves shall be restored to thee arms.
Alas, said Roland, almost fearing from the
impetuosity, as well as confidence, with which
Nathan now spoke, that his wits were in a state of
distraction, where shall we look for help, since
there are none but ourselves in this desert, of
whom to ask it?
From our two selves it must come, and from
none others, said Nathan, briskly. We will
follow
the murdering thieves that have robbed thee
of thee treasure, and we will recover the maid
Edith from their hands.
What! unaided? alone?
Alone, friend, with little Peter to be our guide,
and Providence our hope and our stay. Thee is
a man of courage, and thee heart will not fail
thee, even if thee should find theeself led into the
heart of the Injun nation. I have thought of this
thing, friend, and I perceive there is good hope
we shall prevail, and prevail better than if we had
an hundred men to follow at our backs; unless
we had them ready with us, to march this very
day. Does thee hear me, friend? The Shawnee
fighting-men are now in Kentucky, assembled in
a great army, scalping and murdering as they
come: their villages are left to be guarded by
women and children, and old men no longer fit
for war. Thee understands me? If thee waits
till thee collects friends, thee will have to cut thee
way with them through fighting-men returned to
their villages before thee; if thee proceeds as thee
is, thee has nothing to fear that thee cannot guard
against with thee own cunning,nothing to
oppose
thee that thee cannot conquer with thee own
strength and courage.
And how, cried Roland, too ardent of
temper
,
too ready to snatch at any hope, to refuse his
approbation to the enterprise, though its
difficulties
immediately crowded before his eyes, how
shall we follow a trail so long and cold? where
shall we find arms? where
Friend, said Nathan, interrupting him, thee
speaks without thought. For arms and
ammunition
,
thee has thee choice among the spoils of these
dead villains, thee captivators. For the trail, thee
need think nothing of that: lost or found, thee
may be certain it leads to the old Vulture's town
on the Miami: there thee will find thee cousin, and
thither I can lead thee.
Let us go then, in Heaven's name, cried
Roland, and without further delay; every
moment
is precious.
Thee speaks the truth; and if thee feels thee
limbs strong enough
They are nerved by hope; and while that
remains, I will neither faint nor falter. Edith
rescued
,
and one blowone good blow struck at the
7*
villain that wrongs her;then let them fail me,
if Heaven wills it, and fail me for ever!
Few more words were required to confirm
Roland's
approval of the project so boldly, and
indeed
,
as it seemed, so judiciously advised by his
companion. To seek assistance, was, as Nathan
had justly said, to cast away the opportunity
which the absence of the warriors from their
towns opened to his hopes,an opportunity in
which craft and stratagem might well obtain the
success not to be won, at a later period, and after
the return of the marauders, even by a band of
armed men.
Turning to the corses that still lay on the
couch of leaves where they expired, Nathan
began
,
with little ceremony, and none of the
compunction
that might have been expected, to rob
them of their knives, guns and ammunition, with
which Roland, selecting weapons to his liking,
was soon well armed. The pouches of the
warriors
,
containing strips of dried venison and stores
of parched corn, Nathan appropriated in the same
way, taking care, from the superabundance, to
reward the services of little Peter, who received
with modest gratitude, but despatched with
energetic
haste, the meal which his appearance, as
well as his appetite, showed was not a blessing of
every-day occurrence.
These preparations concluded, Nathan signified
his readiness to conduct the young soldier on his
way. But as he stepped to the edge of the little
glade, and turned to take a last look of the dead
Indians, the victims of his own warlike hand, a
change came over his appearance. The bold and
manly look which he had for a moment assumed,
was exchanged for an air of embarrassment and
almost timidity, such as marked his visage of old,
at the Station. He hesitated, paused, looked at
the bodies again, and then at Roland; and finally
muttered aloud, though with doubting accents,
Thee is a man of war, friend,a man of war
and a soldier! and thee fights Injuns even as the
young men of Kentucky fights them; and thee
may think it but right and proper, as they do, in
such case made and provided, to take the scalps
off the heads of these same dead vagabonds! Truly,
friend, if thee is of that mind, truly, I won't
oppose
thee!
Their scalps?
I
scalp them! cried Roland,
with a soldier's disgust; I am no butcher: I
leave them to the bears and wolves, which the
villains in their natures so strongly resembled. I
will kill Indians wherever I can; but no
scalping
,
Nathan, no scalping from me!
Truly, it is just as thee thinks proper,
Nathan
mumbled out; and without further remark,
he strode into the wood, following the path which
the Piankeshaws had travelled the preceding
evening, until, with Roland, he reached the spot
where had happened the catastrophe of the keg,
a place but a few hundred paces distant from
the glade. Along the whole way he had betrayed
symptoms of dissatisfaction and uneasiness, for
which Roland could not account; and now,
having
arrived at this spot, he came to a pause, and
revealed the source of his trouble.
Do thee sit down here and rest thee weary
limbs, friend, he said. Truly, I have left two
Injun guns lying open to the day; and, truly, it
doth afflict me to think so; for if other Injuns
should chance upon this place, they must needs
find them, and perhaps use them in killing poor
white persons. Truly, I will hide them in a
hollow
tree, and return to thee in a minute.
With these words, he immediately retraced his
path, leaving Roland to wonder and speculate
at leisure over the singular intermixture of
humane
and ferocious elements of which his
character
seemed compounded. But the speculation
was not long indulged; in a few moments
Nathan's
footsteps were heard ringing along the
arched path, and he again made his appearance,
but looking a new man. His gait was fierce and
confident, his countenance bold and expressive of
satisfaction. Things should never be done by
halves, he muttered, but more as if speaking to
his own thoughts than to his companion.
With this brief apology, he again led the way
through the forest; but not until Roland had
observed
,
or thought he observed, a drop of blood
fall from his tattered knife-sheath to the earth.
But the suspicion that this little incident, coupled
with the change in Nathan's deportment, awoke
in Roland's mind, he had no leisure to pursue,
Nathan
now striding forward at a pace which soon
brought his companion to a painful sense of his
own enfeebled and suffering condition.
Thee must neither faint nor flag, said
Nathan
;
thee enemies have the start of thee by
a whole day; and they have thee horses also.
Truly, it is my fear, that, with these horses and
thee kinswoman, Abel Doe and the man Braxley,
thee foeman, may push on for the Injun town
with what speed they can, leaving their Injun
thieves the footmen, to follow on as they may, or
perhaps to strike through the woods for the North
Side, to join the ramping villains that are there
burning and murdering. Thee must keep up thee
strength till night-fall; when thee shall have good
meat to eat and a long sleep to refresh thee; and,
truly, on the morrow thee will be very well,
though a little feverish.
With such encouragement, repeated time by
time as seemed to him needful, Nathan continued
to lead through wood and brake, with a vigour
and freshness of step that moved the wonder and
envy of Roland, who knew that, like himself,
Nathan
had been without sleep for two nights in
succession; besides, having employed the
intervening
days in the most laborious exertions.
Such an example of untiring energy and zeal,
and the reflection that they were displayed in his
causein the cause of his hapless Edith
supported
Roland's own flagging steps; and he
followed
without murmuring, until the close of the
day found him again on the banks of the river
that had witnessed so many of his sufferings. He
had been long aware that Nathan had deserted
the path of the Piankeshaws; but not doubting
his superior knowledge of the woods had led him
into a shorter path, he was both surprised and
concerned, when, striking the river at last, he
found himself in a place entirely unknown, and
apparently many miles below the scene of
conflict
of the previous day.
He that would follow upon the heels of
Wenonga
,
said Nathan, must walk wide of his
footsteps, for fear lest he should suddenly tread
on the old reptile's tail. Thee don't know the
craft of an old Injun that expects to be
followed
,as,
truly, it is like the Black-Vulture may
expect it now. Do thee be content, friend; there
is more paths to Wenonga's town than them that
Wenonga follows; and, truly, we may gain
something
by taking the shortest.
Thus satisfying Roland he had good reasons for
choosing his own path, Nathan led the way to
the verge of the river; where, leaving the broad
buffalo-trace by which he descended the banks,
and diving through canes and rocks, until he had
left the ford to which the path led, a quarter-mile
or more behind, he stopped at last under a grim
cliff overgrown with trees and brambles, where
a cove or hollow in the rock, of a peculiarly
wild, solitary and defensible character, invited
him to take up quarters for the night.
Nor did this seem the first time Wandering
Nathan had sought shelter in the place, which
possessed an additional advantage in a little spring
that trickled from the rock, and collected its
limpid stores in a rocky basin hard by; there
were divers half-burned brands lying on its sandy
floor, and a bed of fern and cane-leaves, not yet
dispersed by the winds, that had evidently been
once pressed by a human form.
Thee will never see a true man of the woods,
said Nathan, with much apparent self-approval,
build his camp-fire on a road-side, like that
unlucky
foolish man, Ralph Stackpole by name, that
ferried thee down the river.Truly, it was a
marvel
he did not drown thee all, as well as the poor
man Dodge! Here, friend, we can sleep in peace;
and, truly, sleep will be good for thee, and me,
and little Peter.
With these words, Nathan set about collecting
dried logs and branches which former floods had
strown in great abundance along the rocks; and
dragging them into the cove, he soon set them in
a cheerful blaze. He then drew forth his stores
of provenderthe corn and dried meat he had
taken from the Piankeshaw's pouches,the latter
of which, after a preliminary sop or two in the
spring, for the double purpose of washing off the
grains of gun-powder, tobacco, and what not, the
usual scraping of an Indian's pocket,and of
restoring
its long vanished juices,he spitted on twigs
of cane, and roasted with exceeding patience and
solicitude at the fire. To these dainty viands he
added certain cakes and lumps of some
non-descript
substance, as Roland supposed it, until
assured
by Nathan it was good maple-sugar, and of
his own making. Truly, said he, it might
have been better, had it been better made. But,
truly, friend, I am, as thee may say, a man that
lives in the woods, having neither cabin nor
wigwam
,
the Injuns having burned down the same,
so that it is tedious to rebuild them: and having
neither pots nor pans, the same having been all
stolen, I did make my sugar in the wooden
troughs, boiling it down with hot stones; and,
truly, friend, it doth serve the purpose of salt, and
is good against hunger in long journeys.
There was little in the dishes, set off by
Nathan's
cookery, or his own feelings, to dispose the
sick and weary soldier to eat; and having
swallowed
but a few mouthfuls, he threw himself
upon the bed of leaves, hoping to find that
refreshment
in slumber which neither food nor the
conversation of his companion could supply. His
body being as much worn and exhausted as his
mind, the latter was not doomed to be long tossed
by grief and fear; and before the last hues
of sun-set had faded in the west, slumber had
swept from his bosom the consciousness of his
own sufferings, with even the memory of his
Edith.
In the meanwhile, Nathan had gathered more
wood to supply the fire during the night, and
added a new stock of cane-leaves for his own
bed; having made which to his liking, disposed
his arms where they could be seized at a
moment's
warning, and, above all, accommodated
little Peter with a couch at his own feet, he
also threw himself at length, and was soon sound
asleep.
CHAPTER VII.
The
morning-star, peeping into the hollow
den of the wanderers, was yet bright on the
horizon
,
when Roland was roused from his slumbers
by Nathan, who had already risen and prepared
a hasty meal resembling in all respects that of the
preceding evening. To this the soldier did better
justice than to the other; for although feeling sore
and stiff in every limb, he experienced none of the
feverish consequences Nathan had predicted from
his wounds; and his mind, invigorated by so many
hours of rest, was more tranquil and cheerful.
The confidence Nathan seemed to feel in the
reasonableness
and practicability of their enterprise,
however wild and daring it might have seemed to
others, was his own best assurance of its success;
and hope thus enkindled and growing with his
growing strength, it required no laborious effort to
summon the spirits necessary to sustain him during
the coming trials.
This change for the better was not unnoticed
by Nathan, who exhorted him to eat freely, as a
necessary prelude to the labours of the day; and
the rude meal being quickly and satisfactorily
despatched
,
and little Peter receiving his due share,
the companions, without further delay, seized their
arms, and recommenced their journey. Crossing
the river at the buffalo-ford above, and exchanging
the road to which it led for wilder and lonelier
paths traced by smaller animals, they made their
VOL. II.8
way through the forest, travelling with
considerable
speed, which was increased, as the warmth of
exercise gradually restored their native suppleness
to the soldier's limbs.
And now it was, that, as the opening of a
glorious dawn, flinging sunshine and life over the
whole wilderness, infused still brighter hopes into
his spirit, he began to divide his thoughts between
his kinswoman and his guide, bestowing more
upon the latter than he had previously found time
or inclination to do. His strange appearance, his
stranger character, his sudden metamorphosis from
a timid and somewhat over-conscientious professor
of the doctrines of peace and good-will, into a
highly energetic and unremorseful, not to say,
valiant, man of war, were all subjects to provoke
the soldier's curiosity; which was still further
increased
when he pondered over the dismal story
Nathan had so imperfectly told him on the past
day. Of those dreadful calamities which, in
Nathan's
own language, `had made him what he was,'
a houseless wanderer of the wilderness, the
Virginian
would have gladly known more; but his
first allusion to the subject produced such evident
disorder in Nathan's mind, as if the recollection
were too harrowing to be borne, that the young
man immediately repressed his inquiries, and
diverted
his guide's thoughts into another channel.
His imagination supplied the imperfect links in the
story: he could well believe that the same hands
which had shed the blood of every member of the
poor borderer's family, might have struck the
hatchet into the head of the resisting husband and
father; and that the effects of that blow, with the
desolation of heart and fortune which the heavier
ones, struck at the same time, had entailed, might
have driven him to the woods, an idle, and
perhaps
aimless, wanderer.
How far these causes might have operated in
leading Nathan into those late acts of blood which
were at such variance with his faith and
professions
,
it remained also for Roland to imagine; and,
in truth, he imagined they had operated deeply
and far; though nothing in Nathan's own
admissions
could be found to sanction any belief, save
that they were the results partly of accident, and
partly of sudden and irresistible impulse.
At all events, it was plain that his warlike feats,
however they might at first have shocked his sense
of propriety, now sat but lightly on his conscience;
and, indeed, since his confession at the Piankeshaw
camp, he ceased even to talk of them, perhaps
resting upon that as an all-sufficient explanation
and apology. It is certain, from that moment he
bore himself more freely and boldly, entered no
protest whatever against being called on to do his
share of such fighting as might occura
stipulation
made with such anxious forethought, when he
first consented to accompany the lost travellers
nor betrayed any tenderness of invective against
the Indians, whom, having first spoke of them
only as `evil-minded poor Shawnee creatures,' he
now designated, conformably to established usage
among his neighbours of the Stations, as `thieves
and dogs,' `bloody villains, and rapscallions;' all
which expressions he bestowed with as much ease
and emphasis as if he had been accustomed to
use them all his life.
With this singular friend and companion, Roland
pursued his way through the wilderness,
committing
life, and the hopes that were dearer than
life, to his sole guidance and protection; nor did
any thing happen to shake his faith in either the
zeal or ability of Nathan to conduct to a
prosperous
issue the cause he had so freely and
disinterestedly
espoused.
As they thridded the lonely forest-paths together,
Nathan explained at length the circumstances
upon which he founded his hopes of success in
their project; and in doing so, convinced the
soldier, not only that his sagacity was equal to the
enterprise, but that his acquaintance with the
wilderness
was by no means confined to the region
south of the Ohio; the northern countries, then
wholly in the possession of the Indian tribes,
appearing
to be just as well known to him, the Miami
country in particular, in which lay the village of
the Black-Vulture. How this knowledge had been
obtained was not so evident; for although he
averred he hunted the deer or trapped the beaver
on either side the river, as appeared to him most
agreeable, it was hardly to be supposed he could
carry on such operations in the heart of the Indian
nation. But it was enough for Roland that the
knowledge so essential to his own present plans,
was really possessed by his conductor, and he
cared not to question how it had been arrived at;
it was an augury of success, of which he felt the
full influence.
The evening of that day found him upon the
banks of the Kentucky, the wild and beautiful
river from which the wilderness around derived its
name; and the next morning, crossing it on a raft
of logs speedily constructed by Nathan, he trod
upon the soil of the North-side, famous even then
for its beauty and for the deeds of bloodshed
almost daily enacted among its scattered
settlements
,
and destined, unhappily, to be rendered still
more famous for a tragedy which that very day
witnessed, far off among the barren ridges of the
Licking, where sixty of the District's best and
bravest sons fell the victims less of Indian subtlety
than of their own unparallelled rashness. But of
that bloody field the travellers were to hear
thereafter
:
the vultures were winging their flight
towards the fatal scene; but they alone could
snuff, in that silent desert, the scent of the battle
that vexed it.
Sleeping that night in the woods, the next day,
being the fourth since they left the Piankeshaw
camp, beheld the travellers upon the banks of the
Ohio; which, seen for the first time in the glory of
summer, its crystal waters wheeling placidly along
amid hills and forests, ever reflected in the bright
mirror below, and with the air of virgin solitude
which, through so many leagues of its course, it
still presents, never fails to fill the beholder's mind
with an enchanting sense of its loveliness.
Here a raft was again constructed; and the
adventurers
pushing boldly across, were soon upon
the opposite shore. This feat accomplished,
Nathan
took the precaution to lansh their frail float
adrift in the current, that no tell-tale memorial of
a white-man's visit should remain to be read by
returning warriors. The next moment, ascending
the bank of the river, he plunged with his
companion
into a maze of brake and forest, neither of
them then dreaming that upon the very spot where
they toiled through the tangled labyrinths, a few
years should behold the magic spectacle of a fair
city, the Queen of the West, uprisen with the
suddenness
,
and almost the splendour of the
Fata-Morgana
,
though, happily, doomed to no such
evanescent
existence. Then handling their arms, like men
who felt they were in a foeman's country, and
knew that every further step was to be taken in
8*
peril, they resumed their journey, travelling with
such speed and vigour (for Roland's strength had
returned apace,) that at the close of the day, they
were, according to Nathan's account, scarce
twenty miles distant from the Black-Vulture's
village
,
which they might easily reach the following
day. On the following day, accordingly, they
resumed
their march, avoiding all paths, and stealing
through the most unfrequented depths of the
woods, proceeding with a caution which was
every moment becoming more obviously
necessary
to the success of their enterprise.
Up to this period, their journey had presented
nothing of interest, being a mere succession of
toil, privation, and occasional suffering, naturally
enough to be expected in such an undertaking;
but it was now about to be varied by an adventure
of no little interest in itself, and, in its
consequences
,
destined to exercise a powerful influence
on the prospects of the travellers.
Laying their plans so as to reach the Indian
village only about nightfall, and travelling but
slowly, and with great circumspection, they had
not at mid-day accomplished much more than half
the distance; when they came to a halt in a little
dell, extremely wild and sequestered, where Nathan
proposed to rest a few hours, and recruit their
strength with a warm dinner,a luxury they had
not enjoyed for the last two days, during which
they had subsisted upon the corn and dried meat
from the Indian wallets. Accident had a few
moments before provided them materials for a
more palatable meal. They had stumbled upon a
deer that had just fallen under the attack of a
catamount; which, easily driven from its yet warm
and palpitating quarry, surrendered the feast to its
unwelcome visiters. An inspection of the carcass
showed that the animal had been first struck by
the bullet of some wandering Indian hunter,a
discovery that somewhat concerned Nathan, until,
after a more careful examination of the wound,
which seemed neither severe nor mortal, he was
convinced the poor beast had run many long miles,
until, in fact, wholly exhausted, before the panther
had finished the work of the huntsman. This
circumstance
removing his uneasiness, he helped
himself to the choicest portion of the animal,
amputated
a hind leg without stopping to flay it, and
clapping this upon his shoulder in a very
businesslike
way, left the remainder of the carcass to be
despatched by the wild-cat at her leisure.
The little dell, in which Nathan proposed to
cook and enjoy his savoury treasure, at ease and
in safety, was enclosed by hills; of which the one
by which they descended into it, fell down in a
rolling slope densely covered with trees; while the
other, rocky, barren, and almost naked, rose
precipitously
up, a grim picture of solitude and
desolation
.
A scanty brook, oozing along through the
swampy bottom of the hollow, and supplied by a
spring near its head, at which the two friends
halted, to prepare their meal, ran meandering
away among alders and other swampy plants, to
find exit into a larger vale that opened below,
though hidden from the travellers by the winding
of the rocky ridge before them.
In this lonely den, Nathan and Roland began
straightway to disencumber themselves of arms
and provisions, seeming well satisfied with its
convenience
.
But not so little Peter; who, having
faithfully accompanied them so far, now following
humbly at his master's heels, and now, in periods
of alarm or doubt, taking post in front, the leader
of the party, uplifted his nose, and fell to snuffing
about him in a way that soon attracted his
master's
notice. Smelling first around the spring, and
then giving a look both up and down the glen, as
if to satisfy himself there was nothing wrong in
either of those quarters, he finally began to
ascend
the rocky ridge, snuffing as he went, and
ever and anon looking back to his master, and
soliciting
his attention by a wag of his tail.
Truly, thee did once wag to me in vain! said
Nathan, snatching up his gun, and looking volumes
of sagacious response at his brute ally, but thee
won't catch me napping again; though, truly,
what thee can smell here, where is neither track
of man nor print of beast, truly, Peter, I have no
idea!
With these words, he crept up the hill himself,
following in little Peter's wake; and Roland, who
also grasped his rifle, as Nathan had done, though
without perhaps attaching the same importance
to Peter's note of warning, thought fit to imitate
his example.
In this manner, cautiously crawling up, the two
friends reached the crest of the hill; and peering
over a precipice of fifty or more feet sheer descent,
with which it suddenly dipped into a wild but
beautiful
little valley below, beheld a scene that, besides
startling them somewhat out of their tranquillity,
caused both to bless their good fortune they had
not neglected the warning of their brute
confederate
.
The vale below, like that they had left, opened
into a wider bottom-land, the bed of a creek,
which they could see shining among the trees
that overshadowed the rich alluvion; and into
this poured a rivulet that chattered along through
the glen, at their feet, in which it had its sources.
The hill on the other side of the little vale, which
was of an oval figure, narrowest at its outlet, was
rough and precipitous, like that on which they
lay; but the two uniting above, bounded the head
of the vale with a long, bushy, sweeping slope
a fragment of a natural amphitheatrewhich
was evidently of easy ascent, though abrupt and
steep. The valley thus circumscribed, though
broken, and here and there deeply furrowed by
the water-course, was nearly destitute of trees,
except at its head, where a few young beeches
flung their silver boughs and rich green foliage
abroad over the grassy knolls, and patches of
papaws
drooped their loose leaves and swelling
fruit over the stream. It was in this part of the
valley, at the distance of three or four hundred
paces from them, that the eyes of the two
adventurers
,
directed by the sound of voices, which
they had heard the instant they reached the crest
of the ridge, fell, first, upon the smoke of a huge
fire curling merrily up into the air, and then upon
the bodies of no less than five Indian warriors,
all zealously and uproariously engaged in an
amusement highly characteristic of their race.
There was among them a white-man, an
unfortunate
prisoner, as was seen at a glance, whom
they had bound by the legs to a tree; around
which the savages danced and leaped, yelling now
with rage, now in merriment, but all the while
belabouring
the poor wretch with rods and switches,
which, at every turn round the tree, they laid
about his head and shoulders with uncommon
energy
and zest. This was a species of diversion
better relished, as it seemed, by the captors than
their captive; who, infuriated by his pangs, and
perhaps desiring, in the desperation of the
moment
,
to provoke them to end his sufferings with
the hatchet, retaliated with his fists, which were
at liberty, striking fiercely at every opportunity,
and once with such effect as to tumble one of the
tormentors to the earth,a catastrophe, however,
that the others rewarded with roars of
approving
laughter, though without for a moment
intermitting
their own cruelties.
This spectacle, it may be well supposed,
produced
a strong effect upon the minds of the
travellers
,
who, not without alarm on their own
account at the discovery of such dangerous
neighbours
,
could not view without emotion a fellow
white-man and countryman helpless in their hands,
and enduring tortures perhaps preliminary to the
more dreadful one of the stake. They looked one
another in the face: the Virginian's eyes sparkled
with a meaning which Nathan could not
misunderstand
;
and clutching his rifle tighter in his
hands, and eyeing the young man with an
ominous
stare, he muttered,Speak, friend,thee
is a man and a soldierwhat does thee think, in
the case made and provided?
We are but two men, and they five, replied
Roland, firmly, though in the lowest voice; and
then repeated, in the same energetic whisper,
we are but two men, Nathan; but there is no
kinswoman now to unman me!
Nathan took another peep at the savages, before
speaking. Then looking upon the young man
with an uneasy countenance, he said,We are
but two men, as thee says, and they five; and,
truly, to do what thee thinks of, in open day, is a
thing not to be thought on by men that have soft
places in their bosoms. Nevertheless, I think,
according to thee own opinion, we being strong
men that have the wind of the villains, and a good
cause to help us, truly, we might snap the poor
man they have captivated out of their hands, with
considerable much of damage to them besides,
the murdering rapscallions!But, friend, he
added
,
seeing Roland give way to his eagerness,
thee spoke of the fair maid, thee cousinIf thee
fights this battle, truly, thee may never see her
more.
If I fall, said Roland,but he was
interrupted
by Nathan:
It is not
that
thee is to think of. Truly,
friend, thee may fight these savages, and thee
may vanquish them; but unless thee believes in
thee conscience thee can kill them every one
truly, friend, thee can hardly expect it?
And why should we? It is enough if we can
rescue the prisoner.
Friend, thee is mistaken. If thee attacks the
villains, and but one of them escapes alive to the
village, sounding the alarm, thee will never enter
the same in search of the maid, thee kinswoman.
Thee sees the case: thee must choose between
the captive there and thee cousin!
This was a view of the case, and as Roland
felt, a just one, well calculated to stagger his
resolutions
,
if not entirely to abate his sympathy
for the unknown sufferer. As his hopes of
success
in the enterprise for which he had already
dared and endured so much, evidently depended
upon his ability to approach the Indian village
without awakening suspicion, it was undeniable
that an attack upon the party in the vale, unless
resulting in its complete destruction, must cause
to be borne to the Black-Vulture's town, and on
the wings of the wind, the alarm of white men
in the woods; and thus not only cut him off from
it, but actually bring upon himself all the
fighting-men
who might be remaining in the village.
To attack the party with the expectation of wholly
destroying it, was, or seemed to be, an absurdity.
But to desert a wretched prisoner whom he had
it perhaps in his power to rescue from captivity,
and from a fate still more dreadful, was a
dereliction
of duty, of honour, of common
humanity
,
of which he could scarce persuade
himself
to be guilty. He cast his eyes up the
glen, and once more looked upon the captive,
who had sunk to the ground as if from
exhaustion
,
and whom the savages, after beating him
awhile longer, as if to force him again on his feet,
that they might enjoy their amusement awhile
longer, now fell to securing with thongs. As Roland
looked, he remembered his own night of
captivity
,
and hesitated no longer. Turning to Nathan,
who had been earnestly reading the struggles of
his mind, as revealed in his face, he said, and
with unfaltering resolution,You say we
can
rescue that man.I was a prisoner, like him,
bound too,a helpless, hopeless, captive,three
Indians to guard me, and but one friend to look
upon me: yet did not that friend abandon me to
my fate.God will protect my poor cousinwe
must rescue him!
Thee is a man, every inch of thee! said
Nathan
,
with a look of uncommon satisfaction and
fire: thee shall have thee will, in the matter of
these murdering Shawnee dogs; and, it may be,
it will be none the worse for thee kinswoman.
With that, he motioned Roland to creep with
him beyond the crest of the hill, where they
straightway held a hurried consultation of war
to determine upon the plan of proceedings in
the prosecution of an adventure so wild and
perilous.
The soldier, burning with fierce ardour,
proposed
that they should take post respectively the
one at the head, the other at the outlet of the
vale, and creeping as nigh the enemy as they
could, deliver their fire, and then rushing on,
before
the savages could recover from their
surprise
,
do their best to finish the affair with their
hatchets,a plan, which, as he justly said, offered
the only prospect of cutting off the retreat of
those who might survive the fire. But Nathan
had already schemed the matter otherwise: he
had remarked the impossibility of approaching
the enemy from below, the valley offering no
concealment which would make an advance in
that quarter practicable; whereas the bushes on
the slope, where the two walls of the glen united,
afforded the most inviting opportunity to creep on
the foe without fear of detection. Truly, said
he, we will get us as nigh the assassin thieves as
we can; and, truly, it may be our luck, each of
us, to get a brace of them in range together, and
so bang them beautiful!an idea that was
manifestly
highly agreeable to his imagination, from
which he seemed to have utterly banished all
those disgusts and gaingivings on the subject of
fighting, which had formerly afflicted it; or
perhaps
,
if we can do nothing better, he continued,
we may catch the vagabonds wandering from
their guns, to pick up sticks for their fire; in
which case, friend, truly, it may be our luck to
help them to a second volley out of their own
pieces: or, if the worst must come, truly then,
I do know of a device that may help the
villains into our hands, even to their own
undoing
!
With these words, having first examined his
own and Roland's arms, to see that all were in
proper battle condition, and then directed little
Peter to ensconce in a bush, wherein little Peter
VOL. II.9
straightway bestowed himself, Bloody Nathan,
with an alacrity of motion and ardour of look
that indicated any thing rather than distaste to
the murderous work in hand, led the way along
the ridge, until he had reached the place where it
dipped down to the valley, covered with the bushes
through which he expected to advance to a
desirable
position undiscovered.
But a better auxiliary even than the bushes
was soon discovered by the two friends. A deep
gully, washed in the side of the hill by the rains,
was here found running obliquely from its top to
the bottom, affording a covered way, by which,
as they saw at a glance, they could approach
within twenty or thirty yards of the foe entirely
unseen; and, to add to its advantages, it was the
bed of a little water-course, whose murmurs, as
it leaped from rock to rock, assured them they
could as certainly approach unheard.
Truly, muttered Nathan, with a grim chuckle,
as he looked, first, at the friendly ravine, and then
at the savages below, the Philistine rascals is in
our hands, and we will smite them hip and
thigh!
With this inspiring assurance, he crept into
the ravine; and Roland following, they were
soon in possession of a post commanding, not
only the spot occupied by the enemy, but the
whole valley.
Peeping through the fringe of shrubs that rose,
a verdant parapet, on the brink of the gully, they
looked down upon the savage party, now less
than forty paces from the muzzles of their guns,
and wholly unaware of the fate preparing for
them. The scene of diversion and torment was
over: the prisoner, a man of powerful frame but
squalid appearance, whose hat,a thing of shreds
and patches,adorned the shorn pate of one of
the Indians, while his coat, equally rusty and
tattered
,
hung from the shoulders of a second, lay
bound under a tree, but so nigh that they could
mark the laborious heavings of his chest. Two
of the Indians sat near him on the grass keeping
watch, their hatchets in their hands, their guns
resting within reach against the trunk of a tree,
overthrown by some hurricane of former years,
and now mouldering away. A third was engaged
with his tomahawk, lopping away the few dry
boughs that remained on the trunk. Squatting at
the fire, which the third was thus labouring to
replenish
with fuel, were the two remaining
savages
;
who, holding their rifles in their own hands,
divided their attention betwixt a shoulder of
venison
roasting on a stick in the fire, and the captive,
whom they seemed to regard as destined to be
sooner or later disposed of in a similar manner.
The position of the parties precluded the hope
Nathan had ventured to entertain of getting them
in a cluster, and so doing double execution with
each bullet; but the disappointment neither chilled
his ardour nor embarrassed his plans. His scheme
of attack had been framed to embrace all
contingencies
;
and he wasted no further time in
deliberation
.
A few whispered words conveyed his last
instructions to the soldier; who, reflecting that he
was fighting in the cause of humanity,
remembering
his own heavy wrongs, and marking the fiery
eagerness that flamed from Nathan's visage,
banished
from his mind whatever disinclination he
might have felt at beginning the fray in a mode so
seemingly treacherous and ignoble. He laid his
axe on the brink of the gully at his side, together
with his foraging cap; and, then, thrusting his
rifle through the bushes, took aim at one of the
savages at the fire, Nathan directing his piece
against the other. Both of them presented the
fairest marks, as they sat wholly unconscious of
their danger, enjoying in imagination the tortures
yet to be inflicted on the prisoner. But a noise
in the gully,the falling of a stone loosened by
the soldier's foot, or a louder than usual plash of
water,suddenly roused them from their dreams:
they started up, and turned their eyes towards the
hill.Now, friend! whispered Nathan;if
thee misses, thee loses thee maiden and thee life
into the bargain.Is thee ready?
Ready, was the reply.
Right, then, through the dog's brain,fire!
The crash of the pieces, and the fall of the two
victims, both marked by a fatal aim, and both
pierced through the brain, were the first
announcement
of peril to their companions; who,
springing
up, with yells of fear and astonishment, and
snatching at their arms, looked wildly around
them for the unseen foe. The prisoner also,
astounded
out of his despair, raised his head from
the grass, and glared around. The wreaths of
smoke curling over the bushes on the hill-side,
betrayed the lurking-place of the assailants; and
savages and prisoner turning together, they all
beheld at once the spectacle of two human heads,
or, to speak more correctly, two human caps,
for the heads were far below them,rising in the
smoke, and peering over the bushes, as if to mark
the result of the volley. Loud, furious, and
exulting
were the screams of the Indians, as with
the speed of thought, seduced by a stratagem
often practised among the wild heroes of the
border, they raised and discharged their pieces
against the imaginary foes so incautiously exposed
to their vengeance. The caps fell, and with them
the rifles that had been employed to raise them;
and the voice of Nathan thundered through the
glen, as he grasped his tomahawk and sprang
from the ditch,Now, friend! up with thee
axe, and do thee duty!
With these words, the two assailants at once
leaped into view, and with a bold hurrah, and
bolder hearts, rushed towards the fire, where lay
the undischarged rifles of their first victims. The
savages yelled also in reply, and two of them
bounded forward to dispute the prize. The third,
staggered into momentary inaction by the
suddenness
and amazement of the attack, rushed
forward but a step; but a whoop of exultation
was on his lips, as he raised the rifle which
he
had not yet discharged, full against the breast of
Bloody Nathan. But his triumph was short-lived;
the blow, so fatal as it must have proved to the
life of Nathan, was averted by an unexpected
incident
.
The prisoner, near whom he stood,
putting
all his vigour into one tremendous effort,
burst his bonds, and, with a yell ten times louder
and fiercer than had been yet uttered, added
himself to the combatants. With a furious cry
of encouragement to his rescuers,Hurrah for
Kentucky!give it to 'em good! he threw
himself
upon the savage, beat the gun from his hands,
and grasping him in his brawny arms, hurled him
to the earth, where, rolling over and over in
mortal
struggle, growling and whooping, and
rending
one another like wild beasts, the two, still
locked in furious embrace, suddenly tumbled
down the banks of the brook, there high and
steep, and were immediately lost to sight.
Before this catastrophe occurred, the other
Indians
and the assailants met at the fire; and each
singling out his opponent, and thinking no more
9*
of the rifles, they met as men whose only
business
was to kill, or to die. With his axe
flourished
over his head, Nathan rushed against the
tallest
and foremost enemy, who, as he advanced,
swung his tomahawk, in the act of throwing it.
Their weapons parted from their hands at the
same moment, and with perhaps equal accuracy
of aim; but meeting with a crash in the air, they
fell together to the earth, doing no harm to either.
The Indian stooped to recover his weapon; but
it was too late: the hand of Nathan was already
upon his shoulder: a single effort of his vast
strength sufficed to stretch the savage at his feet;
and holding him down with knee and hand,
Nathan
snatched up the nearest axe. If the life of
thee tribe was in thee bosom, he cried with a
look of unrelenting fury, of hatred deep and
ineffaceable
,
thee should die the dog's death, as
thee does! And with a blow furiously struck,
and thrice repeated, he despatched the struggling
savage as he lay.
He rose, brandishing the bloody hatchet, and
looked for his companion. He found him upon
the earth, lying upon the breast of his antagonist,
whom it had been his good fortune to overmaster.
Both had thrown their hatchets, and both without
effect, Roland because skill was wanting, and the
Shawnee because, in the act of throwing, he had
stumbled over the body of one of his comrades,
so as to disorder his aim, and even to deprive
him of his footing. Before he could recover
himself
,
Roland imitated Nathan's example, and threw
himself upon the unlucky Indian,a youth, as it
appeared, whose strength, perhaps at no moment
equal to his own, had been reduced by recent
wounds,and found that he had him entirely at
his mercy. This circumstance, and the
knowledge
that the other Indians were now
overpowered
,
softened the soldier's wrath; and when
Nathan
,
rushing to assist him, cried aloud to him to
move aside, that he might `knock the assassin
knave's brains out,' Roland replied by begging
Nathan to spare his life. I have disarmed him,
he criedhe resists no moreDon't kill him.
To the last man of his tribe! cried Nathan
with unexampled ferocity; and, without another
word, drove the hatchet into the wretch's brain.
The victors now leaping to their feet, looked
round for the fifth savage and the prisoner; and
directed by a horrible din under the bank of the
stream, which was resounding with curses, groans,
heavy blows, and the plashing of water, ran to
the spot; where the last incident of battle was
revealed to them in a spectacle as novel as it was
shocking. The Indian lay on his back
suffocating
in mire and water; while astride his body
sat the late prisoner, covered from head to foot
with mud and gore, furiously plying his fists, for
he had no other weapons, about the head and face
of his foe, his blows falling like sledge-hammers
or battering-rams, with such strength and fury,
that it seemed impossible any one of them could
fail to crush the skull to atoms; and all the while
garnishing them with a running accompaniment
of oaths and maledictions little less emphatic and
overwhelming. You switches gentlemen, do you,
you exflunctified, perditioned rascal? Ar'n't you
got it, you niggur-in-law to old Sattan? you
'tarnal
half-imp, you? H'yar's for you, you dog, and
thar's for you, dog's dog! H'yar's the way I pay
you in a small-change of sogdologers!
And thus he cried, until Roland and Nathan
seizing him by the shoulders, dragged him by
main force from the Indian, whom, as was found
when they came to examine the body afterwards,
he had actually pommelled to death, the skull
having
been beaten in as with bludgeons.The victor
sprang upon his feet, and roared his triumph
aloud;Ar'n't I lick'd him handsome!
Hurrah
for Kentucky and old Salt
Cock-a-doodle-doo
!
And with that, turning to his deliverers, he
displayed
to their astonished eyes, though disfigured
by blood and mire, the never-to-be-forgotten
features
of the captain of horse-thieves, Roaring
Ralph Stackpole.
CHAPTER VIII.
The
amazement of Stackpole at finding to whom
he owed his deliverance, was not less than that of
the travellers; but it was mingled in his case, with
feelings of the most unbounded and clamorous
delight
.
Nathan he grasped by the hands, being the
first upon whom he set his eyes; but no sooner had
they wandered to the soldier, than throwing his
arms around him, he gave him a hug, neither
tender
nor respectful, but indicative of the intensest
affection and rapture.
You cut the rope, strannger, and you cut the
tug, he cried, on madam's beseeching! but
h'yar's the time you holped me out of a fix without
axing! Now, strannger, I ar'n't your dog, 'cause
how, I 'm anngelliferous madam's: but if I ar'n't
your dog, I'm your man, Ralph Stackpole, to be
your true-blue through time and etarnity, any way
you'll ax me; and if you wants a sodger, I'll 'list
with you, I will, 'tarnal death to me!
But how, in heaven's name, came you here a
prisoner? I saw you escape with my own eyes,
said Roland, better pleased perhaps at the
accession
of such a stout auxiliary than with his mode
of professing love and devotion.
Strannger, said Ralph, if you war to ax me
from now till doomsday about the why and the
wharfo', I could n't make you more nor one
answer
:
I come to holp anngelliferous madam out
of the hands of the abbregynes, according to my
sworn duty as her natteral-born slave and
redemptioner
!
I war hard on the track, when the
villians
here caught me.
What! cried Roland, his heart for the first
time warming towards the despised horse-thief,
while even Nathan surveyed him with something
like complacency, you are following my poor
cousin then? You were not brought here a
prisoner
?
If I war, I wish I may be shot, said Ralph:
it warn't a mile back on the ridge, whar the
Injuns
snapped me; 'cause how, I jist bang'd away at
a deer, and jist then up jumps the rascals on me,
afo' I had loaded old speechifier; and so they
nabb'd me! And so, sodger, h'yar's the way of it all:
You see, d'you see, as soon as Tom Bruce comes
to, so as to be able to hold the hoss himself
What, said Roland, was he not mortally
wounded?
He ar'n't hurt much to speak on, for all of his
looking so much like coffin-meat at the first jump:
it war a kind of narvousness come over him that
men feels when they gets the thwack of a bullet
among the narves. And so, you see, d'you see,
says I, `Tom Bruce, do you stick to the crittur,
and he'll holp you out of the skrimmage;' and,
says I, `I'll take the back-track, and foller atter
madam.' And says he, says heBut, 'tarnal death
to me, let's scalp these h'yar dead villians, and do
the talking atter! Did you see the licking I gin
this here feller? It war a reggelar fair
knock-down-and-drag-out
,
and I lick'd him! Thar's all
sorts of ways of killing Injuns; but, I reckon, I'm
the only gentleman in all Kentuck as ever took a
scalp in the way of natur'! Hurrah for Kentuck!
and hurrah for Ralph Stackpole, for he
ar
' a
screamer!
The violation of the dead bodies was a mode of
crowning their victory which Roland would have
gladly dispensed with; but such forbearance,
opposed
to all border ideas of manly spirit and
propriety
,
found no advocate in the captain of
horse-thieves
,
and none, we are sorry to say, even in the
conscientious Nathan; who, having bathed his
peaceful sword too deep in blood to boggle longer
at trifles, seemed mightily inclined to try his own
hand at the exercise. But this addition to the
catalogue
of his backslidings was spared him, Roaring
Ralph falling to work with an energy of spirit and
rapidity of execution, which showed he needed no
assistance, and left no room for competition.
Such is the practice of the border, and such it has
been, ever since the moral feud, never destined to
be really ended but with the annihilation of the
American race, first began between the savage
and the white intruder. It was, and is, essentially
a measure of retaliation, compelled, if not justified,
by the ferocious example of the red-man. Brutality
ever begets brutality; and magnanimity of arms
can be only exercised in the case of a
magnanimous
foe. With such, the wildest and fiercest
rover of the frontier becomes a generous, and even
humane enemy.
The Virginian was yet young in the war of the
wilderness: and turning in disgust from a scene he
could not prevent, he made his way to the fire,
where the haunch of venison, sending forth a
savoury
steam through the whole valley, was yet
roasting on the rude Indian spit,a spectacle,
which, (we record it with shame,) quite banished
from his mind not only all thoughts of Ralph's
barbarism, but even the sublime military ardour
awakened by the din and perils of the late conflict.
Nor were its effects less potential upon Nathan and
Ralph, who, having first washed from their hands
and faces the stains of battle, now drew nigh,
snuffing the perfume of a dinner with as much
ardour as they could have bestowed on the scent
of battle. The haunch, cooked to their hands, was
straightway removed to a convenient place;
where all, drawing their knives, fell foul with an
energy of appetite and satisfaction that left them
oblivious of most sublunary affairs. The soldier
forgot his sorrows, and Nathan forgot little Peter,
though little Peter, by suddenly creeping out of
the bushes on the hill, and crawling humbly to the
table, and his master's side, made it apparent he
had not forgot himself. As for the captain of
horse-thieves, he forgot every thing save the
dinner
itself, which he attacked with an appetite well
nigh ravenous, having, as he swore, by way of
grace over the first mouthful, eaten nothing save
roots and leaves for more than three days. It was
only when, by despatching at least twice his share
of the joint, he began to feel, as he said, `summat
like a hoss and a gentleman,' that the others
succeeded
in drawing from him a full account of the
circumstances which had attended his solitary
inroad
into the Indian country and his fall into the
clutches of the Shawnee party.
But little had the faithful fellow to impart,
beyond
what he had already told. Galloping from
the fatal hill, the scene of defeat to the young
Kentuckians, he sustained Tom Bruce in his arms,
until the latter, reviving, had recovered strength
enough to provide for his own safety; upon which
Ralph, with a degree of Quixotism, that formed a
part of his character, and which was, in this
instance
,
strengthened by his grateful devotion to
Edith, the saver of his life, declared he would
pursue
the trail of her captors, even if it led him to
their village, nor cease his efforts until he had
rescued
her out of their hands, or laid down his life
in her service. In this resolution he was
encouraged
by Bruce, who swore on his part, that
he would instantly follow with his father, and all
the men he could raise, recover the prisoners, and
burn the towns of the whole Shawnee nation about
their ears; a determination he was perhaps the
more readily driven to by the reflection, that the
unlucky captives were his father's individual
guests, and had been snatched away while still, in
a manner, under, or relying on, his father's
protection
.
So much he promised, and so much there
was no doubt he would, if able, perform;
nevertheless
,
he exhorted Ralph to do his best in the
mean while to help the strangers, vowing, if he
succeeded in rendering them any assistance, or in
taking a single scalp of the villains that had borne
them off, he would not only never Lynch him,
himself, but would not even allow others to do it,
though he were to steal all the horses in Kentucky,
his father's best bay mare included.
Thus encouraged, the valiant horse-theif,
bidding
farewell to Tom Bruce and Brown Briareus
together, commenced making good his words by
creeping back to the battle-field; when, arriving
before Nathan, he struck the trail of the main
party, and immediately pursued it with zeal and
courage, but still with the necessary caution and
circumspection; his hopes of being able to do
something to the advantage of his benefactress,
resting principally on his knowledge of several of
the outer Indian towns, in every one of which, he
boasted, he had stolen horses. Being but poorly
provided with food, and afraid to hunt while
following
so closely on the heels of the marauders,
he was soon reduced to want and suffering, which
VOL. II.10
he bore for three days with heroic fortitude; until
at last, on the morning of the present day, being
in a state of utter starvation, and a buck
springing
up in his path, he could resist the temptation
no longer, and so fired upon it. The animal
being
wounded, and apparently severely, he set off
in pursuit, too eager to lose time by re-charging
his piece; and it was while he was in that
defenceless
condition, that the five Indians, a
detachment
and rear-guard, as it proved, of the
very party he was dogging, attracted by the sound
of his gun, stole upon him unawares and made
him a prisoner. This, it seems, had happened
but a short distance behind; and there was every
reason to suppose that the buck from whose loins
the travellers had filched the haunch that destiny
had superseded by a better, was the identical
animal
whose seducing appearance had brought
Stackpole into captivity. He was immediately
recognised by his captors, whose exultation was
boundless, as indeed was their cruelty; and he
could only account for their halting with him in
that retired hollow, instead of pushing on to
display
their prize to the main body, by supposing
they could not resist their desire to enjoy a snug
little foretaste of the joys of torturing him at the
stake, all by themselves,a right they had earned
by their good fortune in taking him. In the
valley
,
then, they had paused, and tying him up,
proceeded
straightway to flog him to their hearts'
content; and they had just resolved to intermit
the amusement awhile, in favour of their dinner;
when the appearance of his bold deliverers
rushing into their camp, converted the scene of
brutal merriment into one of retributive vengeance
and blood.
The discovery that the five human beings he
had contributed so much to destroy, were part
and parcel of the very band, the authors of all
his sufferings, the captors of his kinswoman,
abated
some little feelings of compunction with which
Roland had begun occasionally to look upon the
gory corses around him.
The main body of marauders, with their
prisoner
,
there seemed good reason to suppose, were
yet upon their march to the village, though too far
advanced to leave any hope of overtaking them,
were that even desirable. It is true, that Roland,
fired by the thought of being so near his
kinswoman
,
and having before his eyes a proof of
what might be done by craft and courage, even
against overwhelming numbers, urged Nathan
immediately to re-commence the pursuit: the
Indians
would doubtless halt to rest and refresh, as
the luckless five had done, and might be
approached
and destroyed, now that they themselves had
increased their forces by the rescue of Ralph, in
the same way: we can carry with us, he said,
these Indians' guns, with which we shall be more
than a match for the villains; and he added other
arguments, such, however, as appeared much
more weighty to himself than to honest Nathan.
That the main party should have halted, as he
supposed, did not appear at all probable to
Nathan
:
they had no cause to arrest them in their
journey, and they were but a few miles removed
from the village, whither they would doubtless
proceed without delay, to enjoy the rewards of
their villany, and end the day in revelry and
debauch
.
And truly, friend, he added, it will
be better for thee, and me, and the maid Edith,
that we steal her by night from out of a village
defended only by drowsy squaws and drunken
warriors, than if we were to aim at taking her
out of the camp of a war-party. Do thee keep
thee patience; and, truly, there is no telling what
good may come of it.In short, Nathan had
here, as in previous instances, made up his mind
to conduct affairs his own way; and Roland,
though torn by impatience, could do nothing
better
than submit.
And now, the dinner being at last despatched,
Nathan directed that the bodies of the slain
Indians
should be tumbled into a gully, and hidden
from sight; a measure of such evident precaution
as to need no explanation. This was immediately
done; but not before Ralph and the man of peace
had well rummaged the pouches of the dead,
helping
themselves to such valuables and stores of
provender and ammunition as they could lay
hands on; in addition to which, Nathan stripped
from one a light Indian hunting-shirt, from
another
a blanket, a woman's shawl, and a medicine
bag, from a third divers jingling bundles of
broaches and hawk-bells, together with a pouch
containing vermilion and other paints, the
principal
articles of savage toilet; which he made up
into a bundle to be used for a purpose he did not
conceal from his comrades. He then seized upon
the rifles of the dead, (from among which
Stackpole
had already singled out his own,) and
removing
the locks, hid them away in crannies of
the cliffs, concealing the locks in other places;
a disposition which he also made of the knives
and tomahawks; remarking, with great justice,
that if honest Christian men were to have no
good of the weapons, it was just as well
murdering
Injuns should be no better off.
These things concluded, the dead covered over
with boughs and brambles, and nothing left in the
vale to attract a passing and unobservant eye, he
gave the signal to resume the march, and with
Roland
and Captain Ralph, stole from the field of
battle.
10*
CHAPTER IX.
The
twilight was darkening in the west, when
the three adventurers, stealing through tangled
thickets, and along lonely ridges, carefully
avoiding
all frequented paths, looked out at last, from a
distant hill, upon the valley in which lay the
village
of the Black-Vulture. The ruddy light of
evening, bursting from clouds of crimson and
purple
,
and shooting down through gaps of the hills in
cascades of fire, fell brightly and sweetly on the
little prairies, or natural meadow-lands; which,
dotted over with clumps of trees, and, watered by
a fairy river, a tributary, of the rapid Miami,
winding along from side to side, now hiding
beneath
the shadow of the hills, now glancing into
light, gave an air of tender beauty to the scene
better befitting, as it might have seemed, the
retreat
of the innocent and peaceful sons of Oberon
than the wild and warlike children of the
wilderness
.
Looking further up the vale, the eye fell
upon patches of ripening maize, waving along the
river; and beyond these, just where the valley
winded away behind the hills, at the distance of a
mile or more, thin wreaths of smoke creeping from
roofs of bark and skins, indicated the presence of
the Indian village.
Thus arrived at the goal and haven of their
hopes, the theatre in which was to be acted the
last scene in the drama of their enterprise, the
travellers surveyed it for awhile from their
concealment
,
in deep silence, each speculating in his
own mind upon the exploits still to be achieved,
the perils yet to be encountered, ere success should
crown their exertions, already so arduous and so
daring. Then creeping back again into a deep
hollow convenient for their purpose, they held their
last consultation, and made their final preparations
for entering the village. This Nathan at first
proposed
to do entirely alone, to spy out the condition
of the village, and to discover, if possible, in what
quarter the marauders had bestowed the unhappy
Edith; and this being a duty requiring the utmost
secrecy and circumspection, he insisted it could
not be safely committed to more than one person.
In that case, said valiant Ralph, I'm your
gentleman! Do you think, old father Bloody (and,
'tarnal death to me, I do think you're 'ginnin' to
be a peeler of the rale ring-tail specie,'I do, old
Rusty, and thar's my fo'-paw on it: you've got to
be a man at last, a feller for close locks and
fighting
Injuns that's quite cur'ous to think on, and I'll
lick any man that says a word agin you, I will,
'tarnal death to me:) But I say, do you think I'm
come so far atter madam, to gin up the holping
her out of bondage to any mortal two-legg'd crittur
whatsomever? I'm the person what knows this
h'yar town better nor ar another feller in all
Kentucky
;
and that I stick on,for, cuss me, I've stole
hosses in it!
Truly, said Nathan, after reflecting awhile,
thee might make theeself of service to the maid,
even in thee own way; but, verily, thee is an
unlucky
man, and thee brings bad luck wheresoever
thee goes; and so I'm afeard of thee.
Afeard of your nose! said Ralph, with great
indignation; ar'n't I jist been slicked out of the
paws of five mortal abbregynes that had me in the
tugs? and ar'n't that luck enough for any feller?
I tell you what, Bloody Nathan, me and you will
snuff the track together: you shall hunt up
anngelliferous
madam, and gin her my compliments;
and while you're about it, I'll steal her a hoss to
ride off on!
Truly, said Nathan, complacently, I was
thinking of that; for, they says, thee is good in a
horse-pound; and it needs the poor maid should
have something better to depend on, in flight, than
her own poor innocent legs. And so, friend, if thee
thinks in thee conscience thee can help her to a
strong animal, without fear of discovery, I don't
care if thee goes with me: and, truly, if thee could
steal two or three more of the creatures for our
own riding, it might greatly advantage the maid.
Thar you talk like a feller of gumption, said
Ralph: only show me the sight of a bit of
skinrope
for halters, and you'll see a sample of
hoss-stealing
to make your ha'r stand on eend!
Of a truth, said Nathan, thee shan't want
for halters, if leather can make them. There is
that on my back which will make thee a dozen;
and, truly, as it needs I should now put me on
attire more suitable to an Injun village, it is a
satisfaction
thee can put the old garment to such good
use.
With these words, Nathan stripped off his coat
of skins, so aged and so venerable, and gave it to
the captain of horse-thieves; who, vastly delighted
with the prize, instantly commenced cutting it into
strips, which he twisted together, and fashioned
into rude halters; while Nathan supplied its place
by the loose calico shirt he had selected from
among the spoils of the Indian party, throwing
over it, mantle-wise, the broad Indian blanket.
His head he bound round with the gawdy shawl
which he had also taken from the brows of a dead
foeman; and he hung about his person various
pouches and ornamented belts, provided for the
purpose. Then, daubing over his face, arms and
breast with streaks of red, black, and green paint,
that seemed designed to represent snakes, lizards,
and other reptiles; he was, on a sudden, converted
into a highly respectable-looking savage, as grim
and awe-inspiring as these barbaric ornaments and
his attire, added to his lofty stature, could make
him. Indeed, the metamorphosis was so complete,
that Captain Ralph, as he swore, could scarce look
at him without longing, as this worthy personage
expressed it, `to be at his top-knot.'
In the meanwhile, Forrester had not deferred
with patience to an arrangement which threatened
to leave him, the most interested of all, in
inglorious
inactivity, while his companions were
labouring
in the cause of his Edith. He remonstrated,
and insisted upon accompanying them to the
village
,
to share with them all the dangers of the
enterprise.
If there was danger to none but ourselves,
truly, thee should go with us and welcome, said
Nathan; representing justly enough, the little
service
that Roland, destitute of the requisite
knowledge
and skill, could be expected to render, and
the dangers he must necessarily bring upon the
others, in case of any, the most ordinary,
difficulties
arising in their progress through the village.
Every thing must now depend upon address, upon
cunning and presence of mind; the least
indiscretion
(and how many might not the soldier, his
feelings wound up to a pitch of the intensest
excitement
,
commit,) must of a necessity terminate in
the instant destruction of all. In short, Roland
was convinced, though sorely against his will,
that wisdom and affection both called on him to
play the part Nathan assigned him; and he
submitted
to be ruled accordingly,with the
understanding
,
however, that the rendezvous, in which
he was to await the operations of the others,
should be upon the very borders of the village,
whence he might, in any pressing emergency, in
case of positive danger and conflict, be
immediately
called to their assistance.
When the twilight had darkened away, and the
little river, rippling along on its course, sparkled
only in the light of the stars, the three friends
crept from their retreat, and descended boldly into
the valley; where, guided by the barking of dogs,
the occasional yells of a drunken or gamesome
savage, and now and then the red glare of a fire
flashing from the open crannies of a cabin, they
found little difficulty in approaching the Indian
village. It was situated on the further bank of
the stream, and, as described, just behind the bend
of the vale, at the bottom of a rugged, but not
lofty hill; which, jutting almost into the river, left
yet space enough for the forty or fifty lodges
composing
the village, sheltering them in winter from
the bitter blasts that rush, at that season, from the
northern lakes. Beyond the river, on the side
towards
the travellers, the vale was broader; and
it was there the Indians had chiefly planted their
corn-fields,fields enriched by the labour,
perhaps
also by the tears, of their oppressed and
degraded
women.
Arriving at the borders of the cultivated
grounds, the three adventurers crossed the river,
which was neither broad nor deep, and stealing
among logs and stumps at the foot of the hill,
where some industrious savage had in former
years begun to clear a field, which, however, his
wives had never planted, they lay down in
concealment
,
waiting until the subsiding of the
unusual
bustle in the village, a consequence manifestly
of the excesses which Nathan predicted the
victors
would indulge in, should render their further
advance practicable. But this was not the work
of a moment. The savage can drink and dance
through the night with as lusty a zeal as his white
neighbour; the song, the jest, the merry tale,
are as dear to his imagination; and in the
retirement
of his own village, feeling no longer the
restraint
of solid gravity,assumed in the haunts
of the white-man, less to play the part of a hero
than to cover the nakedness of his own
inferiority
,he
can give himself up to wild indulgence,
the sport of whim and frolic; and, when the
fire-water
is the soul of the feast, the feast only ends
with the last drop of liquor.
It could be scarcely doubted that the Indians of
the village were, this night, paying their devotions
to the Manito of the rum-keg, and drinking folly
and fury together from the enchanted draught,
which one of the bravest of the raceits adorer
and victim, like Logan the heroic, and Red-Jacket
the renowned,declared could only have been
distilled `from the hearts of wild-cats and the
tongues of women,it made him so fierce and
so foolish;' nor could it, on the other hand, be
questioned that many a sad and gloomy
reminiscence
,
the recollection of wrong, of defeat, of
disaster, of the loss of friends and of country,
was mingled in the joy of the debauch. From their
lurking-place near the village, the three friends
could hear many a wild whoop, now fierce and
startling, now plaintive and mourning,the one,
as Nathan and Ralph said, the halloo for revenge,
the other the whoop of lamentation,at intervals
chiming strangely in with unmeaning shrieks and
roaring laughter, the squeaking of women and the
gibbering of children, with the barking of curs,
the utterance of obstreperous enjoyment, in which
the whole village, brute and human, seemed
equally to share. For a time, indeed, one might
have deemed the little hamlet an outer burgh of
Pandemonium itself; and the captain of
horse-thieves
swore, that, having long been of opinion
the red abbregynes war the rale children of
Sattan
,
and niggurs only the grand-boys, he should
now hold the matter to be as settled as if booked
down in an almanac,he would, 'tarnal death to
him.
But if the festive spirit of the barbarians might
have lasted for ever, there was, it appeared, no
such exhaustless quality in their liquor; and, that
failing at last, the uproar began gradually to
decrease
;
although it was not until within an hour
of midnight that Bloody Nathan declared the
moment
had arrived for entering the village.
He then rose from his lair, and repeating his
injunctions to Roland to remain where he was,
until the issue of his own visit should be known,
added a word of parting counsel, which, to
Roland's
imagination, bore somewhat an ominous
character. The thing that is to come, he said,
neither thee nor me knows any thing about; for,
truly, an Injun village is a war-trap, which one
may sometimes creep into easy enough; but,
truly, the getting out again is another matter.
And so, friend, if it should be my luck, and friend
Ralph's, to be killed or captivated, so that we
cannot
return to thee again, do thee move by the first
blink of day, and do thee best to save thee own
life: and, truly, I have some hope thee may
succeed
;
seeing that, if I should fall, little Peter,
(which I will leave with thee, for truly he would
but encumber me among the dogs of the village,
having better skill to avoid murdering Injuns than
the creatures of his own kind,) will make thee his
master,as verily, he can no longer serve a dead
one,and show thee the way back again from the
wilderness. Truly, friend, he hath an affection
for thee, for thee had used him well; which he
can say of no other persons, save only thee and
me excepted.
With that, having laid aside his gun, which as
he represented, could be, in such an undertaking,
of no service, and directed Stackpole to do the
same, he shook Roland by the hand, and, waiting
an instant till Ralph had followed his example,
and added his farewell in the brief phrase,
Sodger, I'm atter my mistress; and, for all
Bloody Nathan's small-talk about massacree and
captivation, we'll fetch her, with a most
beautiful
lot of hosses; so thar's no fawwell about it,
turned to little Peter, whom he addressed quite as
gravely as he had done the Virginian. Now,
little dog Peter, said he, I leave thee to take
care of theeself and the young man that is with
thee; and do thee be good, and faithful, and
obedient
,
as thee always has been, and have a good
care thee keeps out of mischief.
With these words, which Peter doubtless
perfectly
understood, for he squatted himself down
upon the ground, without any attempt to follow
his master, Nathan departed, with Roaring Ralph
at his side, leaving Roland to mutter his anxieties
and fears, his doubts and impatience, into the ears
of the least presuming of counsellors.
VOL. II 11
CHAPTER X.
The
night was brilliantly clear, the stars
shining
with an excess of lustre, with which Nathan
would perhaps, at that moment, have gladly
dispensed
,
since it was by no means favourable to the
achievement he was now so daringly
attempting-Fortunately
,
however, the Indian village lay, for
the most part, in the shadow of the hill, itself
covered
with majestic maples and tulip-trees, that rose in
dark and solemn masses above it, and thus offered
the concealment denied in the more open parts of
the valley. With Ralph still at his side, he crept
round the projecting corner of the hill, and,
shrouded in its gloom, drew nigh the village,
wherein might be still occasionally heard the
halloo
of a drunken savage, followed by an
uproareous
chorus of barking and howling curs.
Whether it was that these sounds, or some
gloomy forebodings of his own, awoke the
anxieties
of Nathan, he did not deign to reveal; but,
by and by, having arrived within but a few paces
of a wretched pile of skins and boughs, the
dwelling
of some equally wretched and improvident
barbarian, he came to a sudden halt, and
withdrawing
the captain of horse-thieves aside from
the path, addressed him in the following terms:
Thee says, friend, thee has taken horses from
this very village, and that thee knows it well?
As well, replied Ralph, as I know the
stepmothers
on my own thumbs and fingers,I do,
'tarnal death to me,that is to say, all the parts
injacent and outjacent, circumsurrounding the
hoss-stamp; for thar's the place of my visiting.
The way to fetch it, old Bloody, is jist to fetch
round this h'yar old skin-pot, whar thar's a whole
bee's-nest of young papooses, the size of
bulltoads
,from
that, up, (I know it, 'cause how, I
heerd 'em squallin'; and thar war some one a lickin'
'em:) or, if you don't favour taking it so close to
the skirmudgeons, then you must claw up the
knob h'yar, and then take and take the shoot, till
you fetch right among the hosses, whar you h'ar
them whinnying down the holler; and thar
Friend, said Nathan, cutting him short, it
is on
thee
doings, more than on them of any
others, that the hopes of the maid Edith
Call her anngelliferous madam, said Ralph,
for I can't stand any feller being familiar with
her,I can't, no how.
Well, friend, said Nathan, it is on thee
doings
that her escaping the Shawnee villains this
night depends. If thee does well, it may be we
shall both discover and carry her safe away from
captivation: if thee acts as a foolish imprudent
man,and, truly, friend, I have my fears of thee,
thee will both fail to help her theeself, and
prevent
others doing it, who, it may be, has the
power.
Old Bloody, said the captain of horse-thieves,
with something like a gulp of emotion, you
ar'n't respectable to a feller's feelings. But I'll
stand any thing from you, 'cause how, you down'd
my house in a fa'r tussle, and you holped the
captain
thar that holped me out of trouble. If you 're
atter ginning me a bit of wisdom, and all on
madam's
account, I'm jist the gentleman that h'ars
you. State the case, and h'yar stands I
confawmable
.
Well, friend, said Nathan, what I have to
advise thee is, that thee stops where thee is,
leaving
the rest of this matter entirely to me; seeing
that, as thee knows nothing of this Injun village,
excepting the horse-pound thereof, it will not be
safe for thee to enter. Do thee rest where thee
is, and I will spy out the place of the maiden's
concealing.
Old feller, said Captain Ralph, you won't
pretend you knows more of the place than me?
You don't go for to say you ever stole a hoss
here?
Do thee be content, friend, said Nathan, to
know there is not a cabin in all the village that is
unbeknown to me: do thee be content with that.
Thee must not go near the pound, until thee knows
for certain the maid thee calls madam can be
saved. Truly, friend, it may be, we cannot help
her to-night, but may do so to-morrow night.
I see what you 're up to, said Ralph: and
thar's no denying it war a natteral piece of
nonsense
to steal a hoss, afo' madam war ready to
ride him. And so, old Nathan, if it ar' your
qualified
opinion I'll sarve madam better by snuggin'
under a log, than by snuffin' atter her among the
cabins, I'm jist the gentleman to knock under,
accordin'
to reason.
This declaration seemed greatly to relieve the
uneasiness of Nathan, who recommending him to
be as good as his word, and ensconce among
some logs lying near the path, awaiting the event
of his own visit to the heart of the village,
immediately
took his leave; though not with the timid
and skulking step of a spy. Wrapping his
blanket
about his shoulders, and assuming the gait of
a savage, he stalked boldly forwards; jingling
under his mantle the bundle of hawk's-bells which
he carried in his hand, as if actually to invite the
observation of such barbarians as were yet
moving
through the village.
But this stretch of audacity, as the listening
horse-thief was at first inclined to esteem it, was
soon seen to have been adopted with a wise
fore-knowledge
of its effects in removing one of the
first and greatest difficulties in the wanderer's
way. At the first cabin was a troop of yelling
curs, that seemed somewhat disturbed by the
stranger's approach, and disposed to contest his
right of passing scot-free; but a jerk of the bells
settled the difficulty in a moment; and the
animals
,
mute and crest-fallen, slunk hastily away, as
if expecting the crash of a tomahawk about their
ears, in the usual summary Indian way, to punish
their presumption in baying a warrior.
A right-down natteral, fine conceit!
muttered
Captain Ralph, approvingly: the next time I
come a-grabbin' hosses, if I don't fetch a bushel
of the jinglers, I wish I may be kicked! Them
thar Injun dogs is always the devil.
In the meanwhile, Nathan, though proceeding
with such apparent boldness, and relying upon his
disguise as all-sufficient to avert suspicion, was by
no means inclined to court any such dangers as
could be really avoided. If the light of a fire still
burning in a wigwam, and watched by wakeful
habitants, shone too brightly from its door, he
crept by with the greatest circumspection; and he
gave as wide a berth as possible to every noisy
straggler who yet roamed through the village.
There was indeed necessity for every
precaution
.
It was evident, that the village was by no
means so destitute of defence as he had
imagined
,that
11*
the warriors of Wenonga had not
generally
obeyed the call that carried the army of
the tribes to Kentucky, but had remained in
inglorious
case and sloth in their own cabins. There
was no other way, at least, of accounting for the
dozen or more male vagabonds, whom he found at
intervals stretched, here, before a fire where they
had been carousing in the open air, and, there,
lying asleep across the path, just where the demon
of good cheer had dropped them. Making his
own inferences from their appearance, and passing
them with care, sometimes even, where their
slumbers seemed unsound, crawling by on his
face, he succeeded at last in reaching the central
part of the village; where the presence of
several
cabins of logs, humble enough in themselves,
but far superior to the ordinary hovels of an
Indian
village, indicated the abiding place of the
superiors of the clan, or of those apostate
white-men
,
renegades from the States, traitors to their
country and to civilization, who were, at that
day, in so many instances, found uniting their
fortunes
with the Indians, following, and even
leading
them, in their bloody incursions upon the
frontiers
.
To one of those cabins Nathan made his
way with stealthy step; and peeping through a
chink in the logs, beheld a proof that here a
renegade
had cast his lot, in the appearance of some
half a dozen naked children, of fairer hue than
the savages, yet not so pale as those of his own
race, sleeping on mats round a fire, at which sat,
nodding and dozing, the dark-eyed Indian mother.
One brief, earnest look Nathan gave to this
spectacle; then, stealing away, he bent his steps
towards a neighbouring cabin, which he
approached
with even greater precautions than before.
This was a hovel of logs, like the other, but of
still better construction, having the uncommon
convenience of a chimney, built of sticks and
mud, through whose low wide top ascended
volumes
of smoke, made ruddy by the glare of the
flames below. A cranny here also afforded the
means of spying into the doings within; and
Nathan
,
who approached it with the precision of one
not unfamiliar with the premises, was not tardy to
avail himself of its advantages. Bare naked walls
of logs, the interstices rudely stuffed with moss
and clay,a few uncouth wooden stools,a
rough table,a bed of skins,and implements of
war and the chase hung in various places about
the room, all illuminated more brilliantly by the
fire on the hearth than by the miserable tallow
candle, stuck in a lamp of humid clay, that
glimmered
on the table,were not the only objects to
attract the wanderer's eye. Sitting by the fire
were two men, both white; though the blanket
and calico shirt of one, and the red shawl which
he was just in the act of removing from his
brows, as Nathan peeped through the chink, with
an uncommon darkness of skin and hair, might
have well made him pass for an Indian. His
figure was very tall, well proportioned, and
athletic
;
his visage manly, and even handsome; though
the wrinkles of forty winters furrowed deeply in
his brows, and perhaps a certain repelling gleam,
the light of smothered passions, shining from the
eyes below, might have left that merit
questionable
with the beholder.
The other was a smaller man, whom Roland,
had he been present, would have recognised as
the supposed half-breed, who, at the partition of
spoils, after the capture of his party and the
defeat
of the young Kentuckians, had given him a
prisoner into the hands of the three Piankeshaws,
in a word, the renegade father of Telie Doe.
Nor was his companion less familiar to Nathan,
who beheld in his sombre countenance the features
of that identical stranger, seen with Doe at the
fire among the assailants at the memorable ruin,
whose appearance had awakened the first
suspicion
that there was more in the attack than
proceeded
from ordinary causes. This was a
discovery
well fitted to increase the interest, and
sharpen the curiosity, of the man of peace: who
peering in upon the pair from the chink, gave all
his faculties to the duty of listening and
observing
.
The visage of Doe, dark and sullen at the
best, was now peculiarly moody; and he sat
gazing
into the fire, apparently regardless of his
companion, who, as he drew the shawl from
his head, and threw it aside, muttered something
into Doe's ears, but in a voice too low for Nathan
to distinguish what he said. The whisper was
repeated once and again, but without seeming to
produce any impression upon Doe's ears; at
which the other growing impatient, gave, to
Nathan's
great satisfaction, a louder voice to his
discourse
:
Hark you, Jack,Atkinson,Doe,
Shanogenaw
,Rattlesnake,or
whatever you may be
pleased to call yourself, he cried, striking the
muser on the shoulder, are you mad, drunk, or
asleep? Get up, man, and tell me, since you will
tell me nothing else, what the devil you are
dreaming
about?
Why, curse it, said the other, starting up
somewhat in anger, but draining, before he spoke,
a deep draught from an earthen pitcher that stood
on the table,I was thinking, if you must know,
about the youngster, and the dog's death we have
driven him toChristian work for Christian men,
eh!
The fate of war! exclaimed the renegade's
companion, with great composure; we have
won the battle, boy,the defeated must bear the
consequences.
Ondoubtedly, said Doe,up to the rack,
fodder or no fodder; that's the word; there's no
'scaping them consequences; they must be taken
as they come,gantelope, fire-roasting, and all.
But, I say, Dicksaving your pardon for being
familiar, he added, there's the small matter to
be thought on in the case,and that is, it was
not Injuns, but rale right-down Christian men that
brought the younker to the tug. It's a bad
business
for white-men, and it makes me feel
oncomfortable
.
Pooh, said the other, with an air of
contemptuous
commiseration, you are growing
sentimental
.
This comes of listening to that
confounded
whimpering Telie.
No words agin the gal! cried Doe, sternly;
you may say what you like of me, for I'm a
rascal
that desarves it; but I'll stand no barking
agin the gal.
Why, she's a good girl and a pretty girl,too
good and too pretty to have so crusty a father,
and I have nothing against her, but her taking on
so about the younker, and so playing the devil
with the wits and good-looks of my own bargain.
A dear bargain she is like to prove to all of
us, said Doe, drowing his anger, or remorse, in
another draught from the pitcher. She has cost
us eleven men already: it is well the bulk of
the whelps was Wabash and Maumee dogs; or
you would have seen her killed and scalped, for
all of your guns and whiskey,you would,
there's no two ways about it. Howsomever, four
of 'em was dogs of our own, and two of them
was picked off by the Jibbenainosay. I tell you
what, Dick, I'm not the man to skear at a
raw-head-and-bloody-bones
;
but I do think the
coming
of this here cursed Jibbenainosay among us,
jist as we was nabbing the gal and the sodger,
was as much as to say there was no good could
come of it: and so the Injuns thought tooyou
saw how hard it was to bring 'em up to the
scratch, when they found he had been knifing a
feller right among 'em? I do believe the crittur's
Old Nick himself!
So don't I, said the other; for it is quite
unnatural
to suppose the devil would ever take part
against his own children.
Perhaps, said Doe, you don't believe in the
crittur?
Good Jack, honest Jack, replied his
companion
,
I am no such ass.
Them that don't believe in hell, will natterly
go agin the devil, muttered the renegade, with
strong signs of disapprobation; and then added
earnestly,Look you, Squire, your'e a man
that knows more of things than me, and the likes
of me.You saw that 'ere Injun, dead, in the
woods under the tree, where the five scouters had
left him a living man?
Ay, said the man of the turban; but he
had been wounded by the horsemen you so madly
suffered to pass the ambush at the ford, and was
obliged to stop from loss of blood and faintness.
What so natural as to suppose the younker fell
upon him, (we saw the tracks of the whole party
where the body lay,) and slashed him in your
devil's style, to take advantage of the
superstitious
fears of the Indians?
There's nothing like being a lawyer, sartain!
grumbled Doe. But the warrior right among
us, there at the ruin?you seed him yourself,
marked right in the thick of us! I reckon you
won't say the sodger, that we had there trapped
up fast in the cabin, put the cross on that Injun
too?
Nothing more likely, said the skeptic;a
stratagem a bold man might easily execute in the
dark.
Well, Squire, said Doe, waxing impatient,
you may jist as well work it out according to
law that this same sodger younker, that never
seed Kentucky afore in his life, has been
butchering
Shawnees there, ay, and in this dd town
too, for ten years agone. Ay, Dick, it's true, jist
as I tell you: there has been a dozen or more
Injun
warriors struck and scalped in our very
wigwams
here, in the dead of the night, and nothing,
in the morning, but the mark of the
Jibbenainosay
to tell who was the butcher. There's not a
cussed warrior of them all that does n't go to his
bed at night in fear; for none knows when the
Jibbenainosay,the Howl of the Shawnees,
may be upon him. You must know, there was
some bloody piece of business done in times past
(Injuns is the boys for them things!)the
murdering
of a knot of innocent peopleby some of the
tribe, with the old villain Wenonga at the head of
'em. Ever since that, the Jibbenainosay has been
murdering among them; and they hold that it's
a judgment on the tribe, as ondoubtedly it is.
And now, you see, that's jist the reason why the
old chief has turned such a vagabond: for the
tribe is rifled at him, because of his bringing sich
a devil on them, and they wont follow him to
batfle
no more, except some sich riff-raff, vagabond
rascals as them we picked up for this here
rascality
,
no how. And so, you see, it has a sort of
set the old feller mad: he thinks of nothing but
the Jibbenainosay,(that is, when he's sober;
though, cuss him, I believe it's all one when he's
drunk, too,)of hunting him up and killing him;
for he's jist a feller to fight the devil, there's no
two ways about it. It was because I told him we
was going to the woods on Salt, where the
crittur
abounds, and where he might get wind of him,
that he smashed his rum-keg, and agreed to go
with us.
Well, well, said Doe's associate, this is idle
talk. We have won the victory, and must enjoy
it. I must see the prize.
What good can come of it? demanded Doe,
moodily: the gal's half dead and whole crazy,
or so Telie says. And as for your gitting any
good-will out of her, cuss me if I believe it. And
Telie says
That Telie will spoil all! I told you to keep
the girl away from her.
Well, and didn't I act accordin'? I told her
I'd murder her, if she went near her agina
full-blooded, rale-grit rascal to talk so to my own
daughter, an't I? But I should like to know
where's the good of keeping the gal from her,
since it's all she has for comfort?
And that is the very reason she must be kept
away, said the stranger with a look malignly
expressive
of self-approving cunning: there must
be no hope, no thought of security, no
consciousness
of sympathy, to make me more trouble than
I have had already. She must know where she
is, and what she is, a prisoner among wild
savages
;
a little fright, a little despair, and the
work is over. You understand me, eh? There
is a way of bringing the devil himself to terms;
and as for a woman, she is not much more
unmanageable
.
One week of terrors, real and
imagined, does the work; and then, my jolly Jack,
you have won your wages.
And I have desarved 'em, said Doe, striking
his fist upon the table with violence; for I have
made myself jist the ddest rascal that was
ever made of a white man. Lying, and cheating,
and perjuring, and murderingit's nothing better
nor murder, that giving up the younker that never
did harm to me or mine, to the Piankeshaws,for
they 'll burn him, they will, dn 'em! there's no
two ways about it.There's what I've done for
you; and if you were to give me half the plunder,
I reckon 'twould do no more than indamnify me
for my rascality. And so here's the end on't;
you've made me a rascal, and you shall pay for
it.
It is the only thing the world ever does pay
for, said the stranger, with edifying coolness;
and so don't be afflicted. To be a rascal is to be
a man of sense,provided you are a rascal in a
sensible way,that is, a profitable one.
Ay, said Doe, that is the doctrine you have
been preaching ever since I knowed you; and
you
have made a fortun' by it. But as for me, though
I've toed the track after your own leading, I'm
jist as poor as ever, and ten times more despisable,
I am, dn me; for I'm a white Injun, and
there's nothing more despisable. But here's the
case, he added, working himself into a rage,
I won't be a rascal for nothing,I'm sworn to it:
and this is a job you must pay for to the full vally,
or you're none the better on it.
It will make your fortune, said his companion
in iniquity: there was bad luck about us before;
VOL. II.12
but all is now safeThe girl will make us
secure
.
I don't see into it a bit, said Doe, morosely:
you were secure enough without her. The story
of the other gal you know of gave you the grab on
the lands and vall'ables; and I don't see what's the
good to come of this here other one, no how.
Then have you less brains, my jolly Jack, than
I have given you credit for, said the other. The
story you speak of, is somewhat too flimsy to serve
us long. We must have a better claim to the
lands than can come of possession in trust for an
heir not to be produced, till we can find the way
to Abraham's bosom. We have now obtained it:
the younker, thanks to your Piankeshaw cut-throats,
is on the path to Paradise; the girl is left alone, sole
claimant, and heiress at law. In a word, Jack, I
design to marry her;ay, faith, will-she will-she,
I will marry her: and thereby, besides gratifying
certain private whims and humours not worth
mentioning, I will put the last finish to the scheme,
and step into the estate with a clear conscience.
But the will, the cussed old will? cried Doe.
You've got up a cry about it, and there's them
that won't let it drop so easy. What's an heir at
law agin a will? You take the gal back, and the
cry is, `Where's the true gal, the major's
daughter
?'
I reckon, you'll find you're jist got yourself
into a trap of your own making!
In that case, said the stranger, with a grin,
we must e'en act like honest men, and find (after
much hunting and rummaging, mind you!) the
major's
last
will.
But you burned it! exclaimed Doe: you told
me so yourself.
I told you so, Jack; but that was a little bit of
innocent deception, to make you easy. I told you
so; but I kept it, to guard against accidents. And
here it is, Jack, added the speaker, drawing from
amid the folds of his blanket a roll of parchment,
which he proceeded very deliberately to spread
upon the table: The very difficulty you mention
occurred to me: I saw it would not do to raise the
devil, without retaining the power to lay him.
Here then is the will, that settles the affair to your
liking. The girl and the younker are co-heirs
together
;
but the latter dying intestate, you
understand
,
the whole falls into the lap of the former.
Are you easy now, honest Jack? Will this satisfy
you all is safe?
It's jist the thing to an iota, ejaculated Doe,
in whom the sight of the parchment seemed to
awaken cupidity and exultation together: there's
no standing agin it in any court in Virginnee!
Right my boy, said his associate. But where
is the girl? I must see her.
In the cabin with Wenonga's squaw, right
over agin the Council-house, replied Doe; adding
with animation, but I'm agin your going nigh her,
till we settle up accounts jist as honestly as any
two sich dd rascals can. I say, by G, I must
know how the book stands, and how I'm to finger
the snacks: for snacks is the word, or the bargain's
no go.
Well,we can talk of this on the morrow.
To-night's the time, said Doe: there's
nothing
like having an honest understanding of
matters afore-hand. I'm not going to be cheated,
not meaning no offence in saying so; and I've
jist made up my mind to keep the gal out of your
way, till we've settled things to our liking.
Spoken like a sensible rogue, said the
stranger
,
with a voice all frankness and approval, but
with a lowering look of impatience, which Nathan,
who had watched the proceedings of the pair with
equal amazement and interest, could observe from
the chink, though it was concealed from Doe by
the position of the speaker, who had risen from
his stool, as if to depart, but who now sat down
again, to satisfy the fears of his partner in villany.
To this he immediately addressed himself, but in
tones lower than before, so that Nathan could no
longer distinguish his words.
But Nathan had heard enough. The
conversation
,
as far as he had distinguished it, chimed
strangely in with all his own and Roland's
suspicions
;
there was, indeed, not a word uttered that
did not confirm them. The confessions of the
stranger, vague and mysterious as they seemed,
tallied in all respects with Roland's account of the
villanous designs imputed to the hated Braxley;
and it was no little additional proof of his identity,
that, in addressing Doe, whom he styled
throughout
as Jack, he had, once at least, called him by
the name of Atkinson,a refugee, whose
connection
with the conspiracy in Roland's story Nathan
had not forgotten. It was not, indeed, surprising
that Abel Doe should possess another name; since
it was a common practice among renegades like
himself, from some sentiment of shame or other
obvious reasons, to assume an
alias
and
nom de
guerre
, under which they acquired their notoriety:
the only wonder was, that he should prove to be
that person whose agency in the abduction of
Edith would, of all other men in the world, go
furthest
to sustain the belief of Braxley being the
principal contriver of the outrage.
Such thoughts as these may have wandered
through Nathan's mind; but he took little time to
con them over. He had made a discovery at that
moment of more stirring importance and interest.
Allowing that Edith Forrester was the prisoner of
whom the disguised stranger and his sordid
confederate
spoke, and there was little reason to doubt
it, he had learned, out of their own mouths, the
place of her concealment, to discover which was
the object of his daring visit to the village. Her
prison-house was the wigwam of Wenonga, the
chief,if chief he could still be called, whom the
displeasure of his tribe had robbed of almost every
vestige of authority; and thither Nathan, to whom
the vile bargaining of the white-men no longer
offered interest, supposing he could even have
overheard it, instantly determined to make his
way.
But how was Nathan to know the cabin of the
chief from the dozen other hovels that surrounded
the Council-house? That was a question which
perhaps Nathan did not ask himself: for creeping
softly from Doe's hut, and turning into the street,
(if such could be called the irregular winding
space that separated the two lines of cabins
composing
the village,) he stole forward, with nothing
of the hesitation or doubt which might have been
expected from one unfamiliar with the village.
12*
CHAPTER XI.
While
Nathan lay watching at the renegade's
hut, there came a change over the aspect of the
night, little less favourable to his plans and hopes
than even the discovery of Edith's place of
concealment
,
which he had so fortunately made. The
sky became suddenly overcast with clouds, and
deep darkness invested the Indian village; while
gusts of wind, sweeping with a moaning sound
over the adjacent hills, and waking the forests
from their repose, came rushing over the village,
whirring and fluttering aloft like flights of the
boding night-raven, or the more powerful bird of
prey that had given its name to the chieftain of
the tribe.
In such darkness, and with the murmur of the
blasts and the rustling of boughs to drown the
noise of his footsteps, Nathan no longer feared to
pursue his way; and rising boldly to his feet,
drawing his blanket close around him, and
assuming
,
as before, the gait of a savage, he strode
forwards
,
and, in less than a minute, was upon the
public square,if such we may call it,the
vacant
area in the centre of the village, where stood
the rude shed of bark and boughs, supported by a
circular range of posts, all open, except at top,
to the weather, which custom had dignified with
the title of Council-house. The bounds of the
square were marked by clusters of cabins placed
with happy contempt of order and symmetry, and
by trees and bushes that grew among and behind
them, particularly at the foot of the hill on one
side, and, on the other, along the borders of the
river; which, in the pauses of the gusts, could be
heard sweeping hard by over a broken and
pebbly
channel. Patches of bushes might even be
seen growing in places on the square itself; and
here and there were a few tall trees, remnants of
the old forest which had once overshadowed the
scene, towering aloft, and sending forth on the
blast such spiritual murmurs, and wild oraculous
whispers, as were wont, in ancient days, to strike
an awe through soothsayers and devotees in the
sacred groves of Dodona.
Through this square, looking solitude and
desolation
together, lay the path of the spy; and he
trode it without fear, although it offered an
obstruction
that might well have daunted the zeal
of one less crafty and determined. In its centre,
and near the Council-house, he discovered a fire,
now burning low, but still, as the breeze, time by
time, fanned the decaying embers into flame,
sending forth light enough to reveal the spectacle
of at least a dozen savages stretched in slumber
around it, with as many ready rifles stacked round
a post hard by. Their appearance, without
affrighting
,
greatly perplexed the man of peace;
who, though at first disposed to regard them as a
kind of guard, to whom had been committed the
charge of the village and the peace of the
community
,
during the uproar and terrors of the
debauch
,
found reason, upon more mature
inspection
,
to consider them a band from some
neighbouring
village, perhaps an out-going war-party,
which, unluckily for himself, had tarried at the
village to share the hospitalities, and take part in
the revels, of its inhabitants. Thus, there was
near the fire a huge heap of dried corn-husks and
prairie-grass, designed for a couch,a kind of
luxury which Nathan supposed the villagers
would have scarce taken the trouble to provide,
unless for guests, whose warlike pride and sense
of honour would not permit them to sleep under
cover, until they had struck the enemy in his
own country, and were returning victorious to
their own; and as a proof that they had shared
as guests in all the excesses of their hosts, but
few of them were seen huddled together on the
couch, the majority lying about in such confusion
and postures as could only have been produced
by the grossest indulgence.
Pausing awhile, but not deterred by the
discovery
of such undesirable neighbours, Nathan
easily avoided them by making the circuit of the
square; creeping along from tree to tree, and
bush to bush, until he had left the whole group
on the rear, and arrived in the vicinity of a cabin,
which, from its appearance, might with propriety
be supposed the dwelling of the most
distinguished
demagogue of the tribe. It was a cottage of
logs very similar to those of the renegades, who
had themselves perhaps built it for the chief,
whose favour it was so necessary to purchase by
every means in their power; but as it consisted
of only a single room, and that by no means
spacious
,
the barbarian had seen fit to eke it out by a
brace of summer apartments, being tents of skins,
which were pitched at its ends like wings, and
perhaps communicated directly with the interior,
though each had its own particular door of mats
looking out upon the square.
All these appearances Nathan could easily note,
in occasional gleams from the fire, which, falling
upon the rude and misshapen lodge, revealed its
features obscurely to the eye. It bore an air of
solitude, that became the dwelling of a chief. The
soil around it, as if too sacred to be invaded by
the profane feet of the multitude, was left
overgrown
with weeds and starveling bushes; and
an ancient elm, rising among them, and flinging
its shadowy branches wide around, stood like a
giant watchman, to repel the gaze of the curious.
This solitude, these bushes through which he
could crawl unobserved, and the shadows of the
tree, offering a concealment equally effectual and
inviting, were all circumstances in Nathan's
favour
;
and giving one backward glance to the
fire on the square, and then fixing his eye on one
of the tents, in which, as the mat at the door
shook in the breeze, he could detect the
glimmering
of a light, and fancied he could even faintly
hear the murmur of voices, he crawled among
the bushes, scarcely doubting that he was now
within but a few feet of the unhappy maid in
whose service he had toiled so long and so well.
But the path to the wigwam was not yet free
from obstructions. He had scarce pushed aside
the first bush in his way, opening a vista into the
den of leaves, where he looked to find his best
concealment, before a flash of light from the fire,
darting through the gap, and falling upon a dark
grim visage almost within reach of his hand,
showed him that he had stumbled unawares upon
a sleeping savage,a man that had evidently
staggered there in his drunkenness, and falling
among the bushes, had straightway given himself
up to sottish repose.
For the first time, a thrill smote through the
bosom of the spy; but it was not wholly a thrill
of dismay. There was little indeed in the
appearance
of the wretched sleeper, at that moment,
to inspire terror; for apart from the condition of
helpless impotence, to which his ungovernable
appetites
had reduced him, he seemed to be entirely
unarmed,at least Nathan could see neither knife
nor tomahawk about him. But there was that in
the grim visage, withered with age, and seamed
with many a scar,in the mutilated, but bony
and still nervous hand lying on the broad naked
chest,and in the recollections of the past they
recalled to Nathan's brain, which awoke a feeling
not less exciting, if less unworthy, than fear. In
the first impulse of surprise, it is true, he started
backwards, and grovelled flat upon his face, as if
to beat an instant retreat in the only posture
which could conceal him, if the sleeper should
have been disturbed by his approach. But the
savage slept on, drugged to stupefaction by many
a deep and potent draught; and Nathan
preserving
his snake-like position only for a moment, rose
slowly upon his hands, and peered over again
upon the unconscious barbarian.
But the bushes had closed again around him,
and the glimmer of the dying fire no longer fell
upon the barbarian. With an audacity of daring
that marked the eagerness and intensity of his
curiosity, Nathan with his hands pushed the bushes
aside, so as again to bring a gleam upon the
swarthy countenance; which he perused with such
feelings as left him for a time unconscious of the
object of his enterprise, unconscious of every thing
save the spectacle before him, the embodied
representation
of features which events of former
years had painted in indelible hues on his
remembrance
.
The face was that of a warrior, worn
with years, and covered with such scars as could
be boasted only by one of the most distinguished
men of the tribe. Deep seams also marked the
naked chest of the sleeper; and there was
something
in the appearance of his garments of dressed
hides, which, though squalid enough, were
garnished
with multitudes of silver broaches and tufts
of human hair, with here and there a broad
Spanish
dollar looped ostentatiously to the skin, to
prove he was any thing but a common brave. To
each ear was attached a string of silver coins,
strung together in regular gradation from the
largest to the smallest,a profusion of wealth
which could appertain only to a chief. To prove,
indeed, that he was no less, there was visible upon
his head, secured to the tiara, or
glory
, as it might
be called (for such is its figure,) of badgers' hairs,
which is so often found woven around the
scalp-lock
of a North-western Indian, an ornament
consisting
of the beaks and claws of a buzzard, and
some dozen or more of its sable feathers. These,
as Nathan had previously told the soldier, were
the distinguishing badges of Wenonga, or the
Black-Vulture (for so the name is translated;) and
it was no less a name than Wenonga himself, the
oldest, most famous, and, at one time, the most
powerful chief of his tribe, who thus lay, a
wretched, squalid sot, before the doors of his own
wigwam, which he had been unable to reach.
Such was Wenonga, such were many of the
bravest
and most distinguished of his truly
unfortunate
race, who exchanged their lands, their
fathers' graves, and the lives of their people, for
the doubtful celebrity which the white-man is so
easily disposed to allow them.
The spy looked upon the face of the Indian; but
there was none at hand to gaze upon his own, to
mark the hideous frown of hate, and the more
hideous grin of delight, that mingled on, and
distorted
his visage, as he gloated, snake-like, over
that of the chief. As he looked, he drew from
its sheath in his girdle, his well-worn, but still
bright and keen knife,which he poised in one
hand, while feeling, with what seemed
extraordinary
fearlessness or confidence of his prey,
with the other along the sleeper's naked breast, as
if regardless how soon he might wake. But
Wenonga
still slept on, though the hand of the
white-man
lay upon his ribs, and rose and fell with the
throbs of his warlike heart. The knife took the
place of the hand, and one thrust would have
driven it through the organ that had never beaten
with pity or remorse; and that thrust Nathan,
quivering through every fibre with nameless joy
and exultation, and forgetful of every thing but his
prey, was about to make. He nerved his hand for
the blow; but it trembled with eagerness. He
paused an instant, and before he could make a
second effort, a voice from the wigwam struck
upon his ear, and the strength departed from his
arm. He staggered back, and awoke to
consciousness
:
the sound was repeated; it was the
wail of a female voice, and its mournful accents,
coming to his ear in an interval of the gust, struck
a new feeling into his bosom. He remembered the
captive, and his errand of charity and mercy. He
drew a deep and painful breath, and muttering,
but within the silent recesses of his breast, Thee
shall not call to me in vain! buried the knife
softly
in its sheath. Then crawling silently away,
and leaving the chief to his slumbers, he crept
through the bushes until he had reached the tent
from which the mourning voice proceeded. Still
lying upon his face, he dragged himself to the door,
and looking under the corner of the mat that
waved before it in the wind, he saw at a glance
that he had reached the goal of his journey.
The tent was of an oval figure, and of no great
extent; but being lighted only by a fire burning
dimly in the centre of its earthen floor, and its
frail walls darkened by smoke, the eye could
scarcely penetrate to its dusky extremity. It
consisted
,
as has been said, of skins, which were
supported
upon poles, wattled together like the
frame-work
of a crate or basket; the poles of the opposite
sides being kept asunder by cross-pieces, which,
at the common centre of intersection or radiation,
were themselves upheld by a stout wooden pillar.
Upon this pillar, and on the slender rafters, were
laid or suspended sundry Indian utensils of the
kitchen and the field, wooden bowls, earthen pans
and brazen pots, guns, hatchets, and fish-spears,
with ears of corn, dried roots, smoked meats,
blankets and skins, and many articles that had
perhaps been plundered from the Long-knives,
such as halters and bridles, hats, coats, shawls, and
aprons, and other such gear; among which was
conspicuous a bundle of scalps, some of them with
long female tresses,the proofs of the prowess of
a great warrior, who, like the other fighting-men
of his race, accounted the golden ringlets of a girl
as noble a trophy of valour as the grizzled looks of
a veteran soldier.
On the floor of the tent, piled against its sides
and furthest extremity, was the raised platform of
skins, with rude partitions and curtains of mats,
which formed the sleeping-couch, or, perhaps we
might say, the sleeping-apartments, of the lodge.
But these were in a great measure hidden under
heaps of blankets, skins, and other trumpery
articles
,
that seemed to have been snatched in some
sudden hurry from the floor, which they had
previously
cumbered. In fact, there was every
appearance
that the tent had been for a long time
VOL. II.13
used as a kind of store-room, the receptacle of a
bandit's omnium-gatherum, and had been hastily
prepared for unexpected inmates. But these
particulars
,
which he might have noted at a glance,
Nathan did not pause to survey. There were
objects
of greater attraction for his eyes in a group of
three female figures: in one of whom, standing
near the fire, and grasping the hands and garments
of a second, as if imploring pity or protection, her
hair dishevelled, her visage bloodless, her eyes wild
with grief and terror, he beheld the object of his
perilous enterprise, the lovely and unhappy Edith
Forrester. Struggling in her grasp, as if to
escape
,
yet weeping, and uttering hurried
expressions
that were meant to soothe the agitation of
the captive, was the renegade's daughter, Telie,
who seemed herself little less terrified than the
prisoner. The third person of the group was an
Indian beldam, old, withered, and witch-like, who
sat crouching over the fire, warming her skinny
hands, and only intermitting her employment
occasionally
to eye the more youthful pair with
looks of malignant hatred and suspicion.
The gale was still freshening, and the
elmboughs
rustled loudly in the wind; but Nathan
could overhear every word of the captive, as, still
grasping Telie by the hand, she besought her, in
the language of desperation, `not to leave her,
not to desert her, at such a moment;' while Telie,
still shedding tears, which seemed to be equally
those of shame and sorrow, entreated her to fear
nothing, and permit her to depart.
They won't hurt you,no, my father
promised
that, she said: it is the chief's house, and
nobody
will come nigh to hurt you. You are safe,
lady; but, oh! my father will kill me, if he finds
me here.
It was your father that caused it all! cried
Edith, with a vehement change of feeling: it
was
he
that betrayed us,
he
that killed, oh! killed
my Roland! Go!I hate you! Heaven will
punish you for what you have done; Heaven
will never forgive the treachery and the
murder
Go,
go! they will kill me, and then all will
be well,yes, all will be well!
But Telie, thus released, no longer sought to
fly. She strove to obtain and kiss the hand
that repelled her, sobbing bitterly, and reiterating
her assurances that no harm was designed the
maiden.
No,no harm! Do I not know it all?
exclaimed
Edith, again giving way to her fears, and
grasping Telie's arm.
You
are not like your
father: if you betrayed me once, you will not
betray me again. Stay with me,yes, stay with
me, and I'll forgive you,forgive you all. That
manthat dreadful man! I know him well: he
will comehe has murdered my cousin, and he
is,oh Heaven, how black a villain! Stay with
me, Telie, to protect me from that man; stay
with me, and I'll forgive all you have done.
It was with such wild entreaties Edith,
agitated
by an excitement that seemed almost to have
unsettled her brain, still urged Telie not to
abandon
her; while Telie, repeating again and again
her protestations that no injury was designed or
could happen, and that the old woman at the fire
was specially deputed to protect her, and would
do so, begged to be permitted to go, insisting,
with every appearance of sincere alarm, that her
father would kill her if she remained,that he
had forbidden her to come near the prisoner,
which, nevertheless, she had secretly done, and
would do again, if she could this time avoid
discovery
.
But her protestations were of little avail in
moving Edith to her purpose; and it was only
when the latter, worn out by suffering and
agitation
,
and sinking helpless on the couch at her
feet, had no longer the power to oppose her,
that Telie hurriedly, yet with evident grief and
reluctance, tore herself away. She pressed the
captive's hand to her lips, bathed it in her tears,
and then, with many a backward glance of
sorrow
,
stole from the lodge. Nathan crawled aside
as she passed out, and watching a moment until
she had fled across the square, returned to his
place of observation. He looked again into the
tent, and his heart smote him with pity as he
beheld
the wretched Edith sitting in a stupor of
despair, her head sunk upon her breast, her
hands clasped, her ashy lips quivering, but
uttering
no articulate sound. Thee prays Heaven
to help thee, poor maid! he muttered to
himself
:
Heaven denied the prayer of them that
was as good and as lovely; but thee is not yet
forsaken!
He took his knife from its sheath, and turned
his eyes upon the old hag, who sat at the fire
with her back partly towards him, but her eyes
fastened upon the captive, over whom they
wandered
with the fierce and unappeasable malice,
that was in those days, seen rankling in the breast
of many an Indian mother, and expended upon
prisoners at the stake with a savage, nay, a
demoniacal
zeal, that might have put warriors to
shame. In truth, the unlucky captive had always
more to apprehend from the squaws of a tribe
than from its warriors; and
their
cries for
vengeance
often gave to the torture wretches, whom
even their cruel husbands were inclined to spare.
With knife in hand, and murderous thoughts in
his heart, Nathan raised a corner of the mat, and
glared for a moment upon the beldam. But the
feelings of the white-man prevailed; he hesitated,
faltered, and dropping the mat in its place,
retreated
silently from the door. Then restoring
his knife for a second time to its sheath, listening
awhile to hear if the drunken Wenonga yet stirred
in his lair, and taking a survey of the sleepers at
the nearly extinguished fire, he crept away,
retraced
his steps through the village, to the place
where he had left the captain of horse-thieves,
whom,to the shame of that worthy be it
spoken
,he
found fast locked in the arms of
Morpheus
,
and breathing such a melody from his
upturned
nostrils as might have roused the whole
village from its repose, had not that been at least
twice as sound and deep as his own.
'Tarnal death to me! said he, rubbing his
eyes when Nathan shook him from his slumbers,
I war nigh gone in a dead snooze!being as
how I ar'n't had a true reggelar mouthful of
snortin'
this h'yar no-time,considering I always took
it with my hoptical peepers right open. But, I
say, Bloody Nathan, what's the last news from
the abbregynes and anngelliferous madam!
Give me one of thee halters, said Nathan,
and do thee observe now what I have to say to
thee.
A halter! cried Ralph, in dudgeon; you
ar'n't for doing all, and the hoss-stealing too?
Friend, said Nathan, with this halter I must
bind one that sits in watch over the maiden; and,
truly, it is better it should be so, seeing that these
hands of mine have never been stained with the
blood of woman.
And you have found my mistress, old
13*
Bloody? said Ralph, in a rapture. Jist call
the Captain, and let's be a doing!
He is a brave youth, and a youth of a mighty
heart, said Nathan; but this is no work for
them that has never seen the ways of an Injun
village.Now, friend, does thee hear me? The
town is alive with fighting-men, and there is a
war-party of fourteen painted Wyandotts
sleeping
on the Council-square. But don't thee be
dismayed thereupon; for, truly, these assassin
creatures is all besotted with drink; and were
there with us but ten stout young men of
Kentucky
,
I do truly believe we could knock every
murdering dog of 'em on the head, and nobody
the wiser.Does thee hear, friend? Do but thee
own part in this endeavour well, and we will save
the young and tender maid thee calls madam.
Take theeself to the pound, which thee may do
safely, by following the hill: pick out four good
horses, fleet and strong, and carry them safely
away, going up the valley,mind, friend, thee
must go
up
, as if thee was speeding thee way to
the Big Lake, instead of to Kentucky: then, when
thee has ridden a mile, thee may cross the brook,
and follow the hills, till thee has reached the
hiding-place
that we did spy from out upon this
village
.
Thee hears, friend? There thee will find
the fair maid, Edith; which I will straightway
fetch out of her bondage. And, truly, it may be,
I have learned
that
, this night, which will make
both her and the young man thee calls Captain,
which is a brave young man, both rich and
happy. And now, friend, thee has heard me;
and thee must do thee duty.
If I don't fetch her the beautifullest hoss that
war ever seed in the woods, said Ralph, thar's
no reason, except because the Injuns ar'n't had
good luck this year in grabbing! And I'll fetch
him round up the holler, jist as you say too, and
round about till I strike the snuggery, jist the
same way; for thar's the way you show
judgematical
,
and I'm cl'ar of your way of thinking.
And so now, h'yar's my fo'-paw, in token thar's
no two ways about me, Ralph Stackpole, a hoss
to my friends, and a niggur to them that sarves
me!
With these words, the two associates, equally
zealous in the cause in which they had
embarked
,
parted, each to achieve his own particular
share of the adventure, in which they had left so
little to be done by the young Virginian.
But, as it happened, neither Roland's inclination
nor fate was favourable to his playing so
insignificant
a part in the undertaking. He had
remained
in the place of concealment assigned
him, tortured with suspense, and racked by
self-reproach
,
for more than an hour: until, his
impatience
getting the better of his judgment, he
resolved to creep nigher the village, to ascertain,
if possible, the state of affairs. He had arrived
within ear-shot of the pair, and without
over-hearing
all, had gathered enough of their
conversation
to convince him that Edith was at last
found, and that the blow was now to be struck for
her deliverance. His two associates separated
before
he could reach them; Ralph plunging among
the bushes that covered the hill, while Nathan, as
before, stalked boldly into the village. He called
softly after the latter, to attract his notice; but
his voice was lost in the gusts sweeping along the
hill; and Nathan proceeded onwards, without
heeding him. He hesitated a moment whether to
follow, or return to his station, where little Peter,
more obedient, or more prudent than himself, still
lay, having resolutely refused to stir at the
soldier's
invitation to accompany him; until finally,
surrendering his discretion to his anxiety, he
resolved to pursue after Nathan,a measure
of imprudence, if not of folly, which at a less
exciting
moment, no one would have been more
ready to condemn than himself. But the image
of Edith in captivity, and perhaps of Braxley
standing by, the master of her fate, was
impressed
upon his heart, as if pricked into it with
daggers
;
and to remain longer at a distance, and in
inaction, was impossible. Imitating Nathan's
mode of advance as well as he could, guided by
his dusky figure, and hoping soon to overtake
him, he pushed forward, and was soon in the
dreaded village.
CHAPTER XII.
In
the meanwhile, Edith sat in the tent
abandoned
to despair, her mind not yet recovered
from the stunning effect of her calamity,
struggling
confusedly with images of blood and
phantasms
of fear, the dreary recollections of the past
mingling with the scarce less dreadful
anticipations
of the future. Of the battle on the hill-side
she remembered nothing save the fall of her
kinsman
,
shot down at her feet,all she had herself
witnessed, and all she could believe; for Telie
Doe's assurances, contradicted in effect by her
constant tears and agitation, that he had been
carried
off to captivity like herself, conveyed no
conviction
to her mind: from that moment, events
were pictured on her memory as the records of a
feverish dream, including all the incidents of her
wild and hurried journey to the Indian village.
But with these broken and dream-like
reminiscences
,
there were associated recollections, vague,
yet not the less terrifying, of a visage that had
haunted her presence by day and night,
throughout
the whole journey, watching over her with the
pertinacity of an evil genius; and which, as her
faculties woke slowly from their trance, assumed
every moment a more distinct and dreaded
appearance
in her imagination.
It was upon these hated features, seen side by
side with the blood-stained aspect of her kinsman,
she now pondered in mingled grief and terror;
starting occasionally from the horror of her
thoughts only to be driven back to them again by
the scowling eyes of the old crone; who, still
crouching over the fire, as if its warmth could
never strike deep enough into her frozen veins,
watched every movement and every look with the
vigilance, and, as it seemed, the viciousness of a
serpent. No ray of pity shone even for a moment
from her forbidding, and even hideous
countenance
;
she offered no words, she made no signs,
of sympathy; and, as if to prove her hearty
disregard
,
or profound contempt for the prisoner's
manifest
distress, she by and by, to while the time,
began to drone out a succession of grunting
sounds, such as make up a red-man's melody, and
such indeed as any village urchin can drum with
his heels out of an empty hogshead. The song,
thus barbarously chanted, at first startled and
affrighted
the captive; but its monotony had at last
an affect which the beldam was far from
designing
.
It diverted the maiden's mind in a measure
from its own harassing thoughts, and thus
introduced
a kind of composure where all had been
before
painful agitation. Nay, as the sounds, which
were at no time very loud, mingled with the piping
of the gale without, and the rustling of the old elm
at the door, they lost their harshness, and were
softened into a descant that was lulling to the
senses, and might, like a gentler nepenthe, have, in
time, cheated the over-weary mind to repose.
Such, perhaps, was beginning to be its effect.
Edith ceased to bend upon the hag the wild,
terrified
looks that at first rewarded the music; she
sunk her head upon her bosom, and sat as if
gradually
giving way to a lethargy of spirit, which,
if not sleep, was sleep's most beneficent substitute.
From this state of calm she was roused by the
sudden cessation of the music; and looking up,
she beheld, with a renewal of all her alarms, a tall
man, standing before her, his face and figure both
enveloped in the folds of a huge blanket, from
which, however, a pair of gleaming eyes were
seen riveted upon her own countenance. At the
same time, she observed that the old Indian
woman
had risen, and was stealing softly from the
apartment. Filled with terror, she would have
rushed after the hag, to claim her protection: but
she was immediately arrested by the visiter, who,
seizing her by the arm firmly, yet with an air of
respect, and suffering his blanket to drop to the
ground, displayed to her gaze features that had
long dwelt, its darkest phantoms, upon her mind.
As he seized her, he muttered, and still with an
accent of the most earnest respect,Fear me
not, Edith; I am not yet an enemy.
His voice, though one of gentleness, and even of
music, completed the terrors of the captive, who
trembled in his hand like a quail in the clutches of
a kite, and would, but for his grasp, as powerful
to sustain as to oppose, have fallen to the floor.
Her lips quivered, but they gave forth no sound;
and her eyes were fastened upon his with a
wildness
and intensity of glare that showed the
fascination
,
the temporary self-abandonment, of her
spirit.
Fear me not, Edith Forrester, he repeated,
with a voice even more soothing than before:
You know me;I am no savage;I will do you
no harm.
Yes,yes,yes, muttered Edith at last, but
in the tones of an automaton, they were so broken
and inarticulate, yet so unnaturally calm and
unimpassioned
I
know you,yes, yes, I do know
you, and know you well. You are Richard
Braxley
,the
robber, and now the persecutor, of the
orphan; and this hand that holds me, is red with
the blood of my cousin. Oh, villain! villain! are
you not yet content?
The prize is not yet won, replied the other,
with a smile that seemed intended to express his
contempt of the maiden's invectives, and his ability
to forgive them: I am indeed Richard Braxley,
the friend of Edith Forrester, though she will
not believe it,a rough and self-willed one, it may
be, but still her true and unchangeable friend.
Where will she look for a better? Anger has not
alienated, contempt has not estranged me: injury
and injustice still find me the same. I am still
Edith Forrester's friend; and such, in the
sturdiness
of my affection, I will remain, whether my
fair mistress will or no.But you are feeble and
agitated: sit down and listen to me. I have that
to say which will convince my thoughtless fair
the day of disdain is now over.
All these expressions, though uttered with
seeming
blandness, were yet accompanied by an air of
decision and even command, as if the speaker
were conscious the maiden was fully in his power,
and not unwilling she should know it. But his
attempt
to make her resume her seat upon the pile
of skins from which she had so wildly started at
his entrance, was resisted by Edith; who,
gathering
courage from desperation, and shaking his
hand from her arm, as if snatching it from the
embraces
of a serpent, replied, with even energy,
I will not sit down,I will not listen to you.
Approach me nottouch me not. You are a
villain
and murderer, and I loathe, oh! unspeakably
loathe, your presence. Away from me, or
Or, interrupted Braxley, with the sneer of a
naturally mean and vindictive spirit, you will
cry for assistance! From whom do you expect
it? From wild, murderous, besotted Indians, who,
if roused from their drunken slumbers, would be
more like to assail you with their hatchets, than to
weep for your sorrows? Know, fair Edith, that
you are now in their hands;that there is not one
of them who would not rather see those golden
tresses
hung blackening in the smoke from the rafters
of his wigwam, than floating over the brows they
adornLook aloft: there are ringlets of the young
and fair, the innocent and tender, swinging above
you!Learn, moreover, that from these dangerous
friends there is none who can protect you, save
me
. Ay, my beauteous Edith, he added, as the
captive, overcome by the representation of her
perils so unscrupulously, nay, so sternly made,
sank almost fainting upon the pile, it is even so;
and you must know it. It is needful you should
know what you have to expect, if you reject my
protection. But that you will not reject; in faith,
you
cannot!
The time has come, as I told you it
would, when your disdainful scruplesI speak
plainly, fair Edith!are to be at an end. I swore
to you,and it was when your scorn and unbelief
were at the highestthat you should yet smile
upon the man you disdained, and smile upon no
other. It was a rough and uncouth threat for a
lover; but my mistress would have it so. It was
a vow breathed in anger: but it was a vow not
meant to be broken. You tremble! I am cruel in
my wooing; but this is not the moment for
compliment
and deception. You are
mine
, Edith: I
swore it to myself,ay, and to you. You cannot
escape. You have driven me to extremities; but
they have succeeded. You are mine; or you are
nothing.
VOL. II.14
Nothing let it be, said Edith, over whose
mind, prone to agitation and terror, it was evident
the fierce and domineering temper of the
individual
could exercise an irresistible control,and
who, though yet striving to resist, was visibly
sinking before his stern looks and menacing words,
let it be nothing! Kill me, if you will, as you
have already killed my cousin.Oh! mockery of
passion, of humanity, of decency, to speak to me
thus;to
me
, the relative, the more than sister of
him you have so basely and cruelly murdered!
I have murdered no one, said Braxley, with
stony composure; and, if you will but listen
patiently
,
you will find I am stained by no crime
save that of loving a woman who forces me to
woo her like a master, rather than a slave. Your
cousin is living and in safety.
It is false, cried Edith, wringing her hands;
with my own eyes I saw him fall, and fall,
covered
with blood!
And, from that moment, you saw nothing
more, rejoined Braxley. The blood came from
the veins of others: he was carried away alive,
and almost unhurt. He is a captive,a captive
like yourself. And why? Shall I remind my
fair Edith how much of her hostility and scorn I
owed to her hot and foolish kinsman? how he
persuaded her the love she so naturally bore so
near a relative was reason enough to reject the
affection of a suitor? how impossible she should
listen to the dictates of her own heart, or the calls
of her interest, while misled by a counsellor so
indiscreet, yet so trusted? Before that unlucky
young man stepped between me and my love,
Edith Forrester could listen,nay, and could
smile.Nay, deny it, if you will; but hearken.
Your cousin is safe; rely upon that; but, rely
he will never again see the home of his birth, or
the kinswoman whose fortunes he has so opposed,
until she is the wife of the man he misjudges and
hates. He is removed from my path: it was
necessary
to my hopes. His life is, at all events,
safe: his deliverance rests with his kinswoman.
When she has plighted her troth, and surely she
will
plight it
Never! never! cried Edith, starting up, her
indignation for a moment getting the better of her
fears; with one so false and treacherous, so
unprincipled
and ungrateful, so base and
revengeful
,with
such a man, with such a villain,
never
!
no, never!
I
am
a villain indeed, Edith, said Braxley, but
with exemplary coolness: all men are so. Good
and evil are sown together in our natures, and
each has its season and its harvest. In this breast,
as in the breast of the worst and the noblest,
Nature
set, at birth, an angel and a devil, either to
be the governor of my actions, as either should
be best encouraged. If the devil be now at work,
and have been for months, it was because your
scorn called him from his slumbers. Before that
time, Edith, I was under the domination of my
angel: who then called, or who deemed me, a
villain? Was I then a robber and persecutor of
the orphan? Am I
now?
Perhaps so,but it is
yourself that have made me so. For you, I called
up my evil-genius to my aid; and my evil-genius
aided me. He bade me woo no longer like the
turtle, but strike like the falcon. Through plots
and stratagems, through storms and perils, through
battle and blood, I have pursued you, and I have
conquered at last. The captive of my sword and
my spear, you will spurn my love no longer; for,
in truth, you cannot. I came to the wilderness to
seek an heiress for your uncle's wealth: I have
found her. But she returns to her inheritance the
wife of the seeker! In a word, my Edithfor
why should I, who am now the master of your
fate, forbear the style of a conqueror? why
should I longer sue, who have the power to
command
?you
are
mine
,mine beyond the
influence
of caprice, or change,mine beyond the
hope of escape. This village you will never leave,
but as a bride.
So spoke the bold wooer, elated by the
consciousness
of successful villany, and perhaps
convinced
from long experience of the timorous, and
doubtless, feeble, character of the maid, that a
haughty and overbearing tone would produce an
impression, however painful it might be to her,
more favourable to his hopes, than the soft
hypocrisy
of sueing. He was manifestly resolved to
wring from her fears the consent not to be
obtained
from her love. Nor had he miscalculated
the power of such a display of bold, unflinching,
energetic determination to consummate all his
schemes, in awing, if not bending, her youthful
spirit. She seemed indeed stunned, wholly
over-powered
by his resolved and violent manner: and
she had scarcely strength to mutter the answer
that rose to her lips:
If it be so, she faltered out, this village
then I must never leave; for here I will die, die
even by the hands of barbarians, and die a
thousand
times, ere I look upon you, base and cruel
man, with any but the eyes of detestation. I
hated you ever,I hate you yet.
My fair mistress, said Braxley, with a sneer
that might have well become the lip of the devil
he had pronounced the then ruler of his breast,
knows not all the alternative. Death is a boon
the savages may bestow, when the whim takes
them. But before that, they must show their
affection
for their prisoner. There are many that
can admire the bright eyes and ruddy cheeks of
the white maiden; and some one, doubtless, will
admit the stranger to a corner of his wigwam
and his bosom! Ay, madam, I will speak plainly,
it is as the wife of Richard Braxley or of a
pagan
savage, you go out of the tent of Wenonga.
Or why go out of the tent of Wenonga at all? Is
Wenonga insensible to the beauty of his guest?
The hag that I drove from the fire, seemed
already
to see in her prisoner the maid that was to
rob her of her husband.
Heaven help me! exclaimed Edith, sinking
again to her seat, wholly overcome by the
horrors
it was the object of the wooer to accumulate
on her mind. He noted the effect of his threat,
and stealing up, he took her trembling, almost
lifeless
hand, adding, but in a softer voice,
Why will Edith drive one who adores her, to
these extremities? Let her smile but as she
smiled
of yore, and all will yet be well. One smile
secures her deliverance from all that she dreads,
her restoration to her home and to happiness.
With that smile, the angel again awakes in my
bosom, and all is love and tenderness.
Heaven help me! iterated the trembling girl,
struggling to shake off Braxley's hand. But she
struggled feebly and in vain; and Braxley, in the
audacity of his belief that he had frightened her
into a more reasonable mood, proceeded the
length of throwing an arm around his almost
insensible
victim.
But heaven was not unmindful of the prayer of
the desolate and helpless maid. Scarce had his
arm encircled the waist of the captive, when a
14*
pair of arms, long and brawny, infolded his body
as in the hug of an angry bear, and in an instant
he lay upon his back on the floor, a knee upon
his breast, a hand at his throat, and a knife,
glittering
blood-red in the light of the fire, flourished
within an inch of his eyes; while a voice,
subdued
to a whisper, yet distinct as if uttered in
tones of thunder, muttered in his ear,Speak,
and thee dies!
The attack, so wholly unexpected, so sudden
and so violent, was as irresistible as astounding;
and Braxley, unnerved by the surprise and by
fear, succumbing as to the stroke of an avenging
angel, the protector of innocence, whom his
villany
had conjured from the air, lay gasping on
the earth without attempting the slightest
resistance
,
while the assailant, dropping his knife and
producing a long cord of twisted leather,
proceeded
with inexpressible dexterity and speed, to
bind his limbs, which he did in a manner none
the less effectual for being so hasty. An instant
sufficed to secure him hand and foot; in another,
a gag was clapped in his mouth and secured by
a turn of the rope round his neck: at the third,
the conqueror, thrusting his hand into his bosom,
tore from it the stolen will, which he immediately
after buried in his own. Then, spurning the baffled
villain into a corner, and flinging over his body
a pile of skins and blankets, until he was entirely
hidden from sight, he left him to the combined
agonies of fear, darkness, and suffocation.
Such was the rapidity indeed, with which the
whole affair was conducted, that Braxley had scarce
time to catch a glimpse of his assailant's
countenance
;
and that glimpse, without abating his
terror
,
took but little from his amazement. It was
the countenance of an Indian,or such it
seemed
,grimly
and hideously painted over with
figures of snakes, lizards, skulls, and other savage
devices, which were repeated upon the arms, the
half naked bosom, and even the squalid shirt, of
the victor. One glance, in the confusion and
terror
of the moment, Braxley gave to his
extraordinary
foe; and then the mantles piled upon his
body concealed all objects from his eyes.
In the meanwhile, Edith, not less confounded,
sat cowering with terror, until the victor, having
completed his task, sprang to her side,a
movement
,
however, that only increased her dismay,
crying, with warning gestures, Fear not and
speak not;up and away! when, perceiving
she recoiled from him with all her feeble strength,
and was indeed unable to rise, he caught her in
his arms, muttering, Thee is safethee friends
is nigh! and bore her swiftly, yet noiselessly, from
the tent.
CHAPTER XIII.
The
night was even darker than before, the fire
of the Wyandotts on the square had burned so
low as no longer to send even a ray to the hut of
Wenonga, and the wind, though subsiding, still
kept up a sufficient din to drown the ordinary
sound of footsteps. Under such favourable
circumstances
,
Nathan (for, as may be supposed, it
was this faithful friend who had snatched the
forlorn
Edith from the grasp of the betrayer,) stalked
boldly from the hut, bearing the rescued maiden
in his arms, and little doubting, that, having thus
so successfully accomplished the first and greatest
step in the enterprise, he could now conclude it in
safety, if not with ease.
But there were perils yet to be encountered,
which the man of peace had not taken into
anticipation
,
and which, indeed, would not have existed,
had his foreboding doubts of the propriety of
admitting
either of his associates, and honest
Stackpole
especially, to a share of the exploit, been
suffered
to influence his counsels to the exclusion of
that worthy but unlucky personage altogether.
He had scarce stepped from the tent-door, before
there arose on the sudden, and at no great
distance
from the square over which he was
hurrying
his precious burthen, a horrible din,a
stamping
,
snorting, galloping and neighing of horses, as
if a dozen famished bears or wolves had suddenly
made their way into the Indian pin-fold, carrying
death and distraction into the whole herd. And
this alarming omen was almost instantly followed
by an increase of all the uproar, as if the animals
had broken loose from the pound, and were
rushing
,
mad with terror, towards the centre of the
village.
At the first outbreak of the tumult, Nathan had
dropped immediately into the bushes before the
wigwam; but perceiving that the sounds increased,
and were actually drawing nigh, and that the
sleepers were waking on the square, he sprang
again to his feet, and, flinging his blanket around
Edith, who was yet incapable of aiding herself,
resolved to make a bold effort to escape, while
darkness and the confusion of the enemy
permitted
.
There was, in truth, not a moment to be
lost. The slumbers of the barbarians, proverbially
light at all times, and readily broken even when
the stupor of drunkenness has steeped their
faculties
,
were not proof against sounds at once so
unusual and so uproareous. A sudden yell of
surprise
,
bursting from one point, was echoed by
another
,
and another voice; and, in a moment, the
square resounded with these signals of alarm,
added
to the wilder screams which some of them set
up, of Long knives! Long-knives! as if the
savages
supposed themselves suddenly beset by a
whole army of charging Kentuckians.
It was at this moment of dismay and confusion,
that Nathan rose from the earth, and, all other
paths being now cut off, darted across a corner of
the square towards the river, which was in a
quarter opposite to that whence the sounds came,
in hopes to reach the alder-thicket on its banks,
before being observed. And this, perhaps, he
would have succeeded in reaching, had not
Fortune
,
which seemed this night to give a loose to
all her fickleness, prepared a new and greater
difficulty.
As he rose from the bushes, some savage,
possessed
of greater presence of mind than his fellows,
cast a decaying brand from the fire into the heap
of dried grass and maize-husks, designed for their
couches, which, bursting immediately into a
furious
flame, illuminated the whole square and
village
,
and revealed, as it was designed to do, the
cause of the wondrous uproar. A dozen or more
horses were instantly seen galloping into the square,
followed by a larger and denser herd behind,
all agitated by terror, all plunging, rearing,
prancing
and kicking, as if possessed by a legion of evil
spirits, though driven, as was made apparent by
the yells which the Indians set up on seeing him,
by nothing more than the agency of a human
being.
At the first flash of the flames, seizing upon the
huge bed of straw, and whirling up in the gust in
a prodigious volume, Nathan gave up all for lost,
not doubting that he would be instantly seen and
assailed. But the spectacle of their horses
dashing
madly into the square, with the cause of the
tumult seen struggling among them, in the
apparition
of a white-man, sitting aloft, entangled
inextricably
in the thickest of the herd, and evidently
borne forward with no consent of his own, was
metal more attractive for Indian eyes; and
Nathan
perceived that he was not only neglected in
the confusion by all, but was likely to remain so,
long enough to enable him to put the thicket
betwixt
him and the danger of discovery.
The knave has endangered us, and to the
value
of the scalp on his own foolish head;
muttered
Nathan, his indignation speaking in a voice
louder than a whisper: but, truly, he will pay the
price: and, truly, his loss is the maiden's
redeeming
!
He darted forwards as he spoke; but his words
had reached the ears of one, who, cowering like
himself among the weeds around Wenonga's hut,
now started suddenly forth, and displayed to his
eyes the young Virginian, who, rushing eagerly
up, clasped the rescued captive in his arms, crying,
Forward now, for the love of Heaven!
forward
,
forward!
Thee has ruined all! cried Nathan, with bitter
reproach, as Edith, rousing from insensibility at
the well known voice, opened her eyes upon her
kinsman, and, all unmindful of the place of
meeting
,
unconscious of every thing but his presence,
the presence of him whose supposed death she
had so long lamented,sprang to his embrace
with a cry of joy that was heard over the whole
square, a tone of happiness, pealing above the rush
of the winds and the uproar of men and animals.
Thee has ruined all,theeself and the maid!
Save thee own life!
With these words, Nathan strove to tear Edith
from his grasp, to make one more effort for her
rescue; and Roland, yielding her to his superior
strength, and perceiving that a dozen Indians were
running against them, drew his tomahawk, and,
with a self-devotion which marked his love, his
consciousness of error, and his heroism of
character
,
waved Nathan away, while he himself
rushed back upon the pursuers, not so much,
however
,
in the vain hope of disputing the path, as, by
laying down his life on the spot, to purchase one
more hope of escape to his Edith.
The act, so unexpectedly, so audaciously bold,
drew a shout of admiration from throats which
had before only uttered yells of fury: but it was
mingled with fierce laughter, as the savages,
without
hesitating at, or indeed seeming at all to
regard
,
his menacing position, ran upon him in a
body, and avoiding the only blow they gave him
the power to make, seized and disarmed him,a
result that, notwithstanding his fierce and furious
struggles, was effected in less space than we have
taken to describe it. Then, leaving him in the
hands of two of their number, who proceeded to
bind him securely, the others rushed after Nathan,
who, though encumbered by his burthen, again
inanimate
,
her arms clasped around his neck, as
they had been round that of her kinsman, made
the most desperate exertions to bear her off,
seeming
to regard her weight no more than if the
burthen
had been a cushion of thistle-down. He ran
for a moment with astonishing activity, leaping
over bush and gully, where such crossed his path,
with such prodigious strength and suppleness of
frame, as to the savages appeared little short of
miraculous; and, it is more than probable he
might have effected his escape, had he chosen to
abandon the helpless Edith. As it was, he, for a
time, bade fair to make his retreat good. He
reached the low thicket that fringed the river, and
one more step would have found him in at least
temporary security. But that step was never to
be taken. As he approached, two tall barbarians
suddenly sprang from the cover, where they had
been taking their drunken slumbers; and,
responding
with exulting whoops to the cries of the
others, they leaped forward to secure him. He
turned aside, running downwards to where a
lonely wigwam, surrounded by trees, offered the
concealment of its shadow. But he turned too
late; a dozen fierce wolf-like dogs, rushing from
the cabin, and emboldened by the cries of the
pursuers
,
rushed upon him, hanging to his skirts, and
entangling his legs, rending and tearing all the
while, so that he could fly no longer. The Indians
were at his heels: their shouts were in his ears;
their hands were almost upon his shoulders. He
stopped, and turning towards them, with a gesture
and look of desperate defiance, and still more
desperate
hatred, exclaimed,Here, devils! cut and
hack! your time has come, and I am the last of
them! And holding Edith at the length of his
arm, he pulled open his garment, as if to invite the
death-stroke.
But his death, at least at that moment, was not
sought after by the Indians. They seized him,
and, Edith being torn from his hands, dragged
him, with endless whoops, towards the fire,
whither
they had previously borne the captured
Roland
,
over whom, as over himself, they yelled their
triumph; while screams of rage, from those who
had dashed among the horses after the daring
white-man who had been seen among them, and
the confusion that still prevailed, showed that
he
also had fallen into their hands.
The words of defiance which Nathan breathed
at the moment of yielding, were the last he
uttered
.
Submitting passively to his fate, he was
dragged onwards by a dozen hands, a dozen voices
around him vociferating their surprise at his
appearance
even more energetically than the joy
of their triumph. His Indian habiliments and
painted body evidently struck them with
astonishment
,
which increased as they drew nearer the
fire and could better distinguish the extraordinary
devices he had traced so carefully on his breast
and visage. Their looks of inquiry, their
questions
jabbered freely in broken English as well as
in their own tongue, Nathan regarded no more
VOL. II.15
than their taunts and menaces, replying to these,
as to all, only with a wild and haggard stare,
which seemed to awe several of the younger
warriors, who began to exchange looks of
peculiar
meaning. At last, as they drew nearer the
fire, an old Indian staggered among the group,
who made way for him with a kind of respect, as
was, indeed, his due,for he was no other than
the old Black-Vulture himself. Limping up to the
prisoner, with as much ferocity as his
drunkenness
would permit, he laid one hand upon his
shoulder, and with the other aimed a furious
hatchet-blow at his head. The blow was
arrested
by the renegade, Doe, or Atkinson, who made
his appearance at the same time with Wenonga,
and muttered some words in the Shawnee tongue,
which seemed meant to soothe the old man's
fury.
Me Injun-man! said the chief, addressing
his words to the prisoner, and therefore in the
prisoner's language,Me kill all white-man!
Me Wenonga: me drink white-man blood! me
no heart! And to impress the truth of his words
on the prisoner's mind, he laid his right hand,
from which the axe had been removed, as well as
his left, on Nathan's shoulder, in which position
supporting himself, he nodded and wagged his
head in the other's face, with as savage a look of
malice as he could infuse into his drunken
features
.
To this the prisoner replied by bending
upon the chief a look more hideous than his own,
and indeed so strangely unnatural and revolting,
with lips so retracted, features so distorted by
some nameless passion, and eyes gleaming with
fires so wild and unearthly, that even Wenonga,
chief as he was, and then in no condition to be
daunted by any thing, drew slowly back, remov
ing his hands from the prisoner's shoulder, who
immediately fell down in horrible convulsions, the
foam flying from his lips, and his fingers
clenching
like spikes of iron into the flesh of two
Indians
that had hold of him.
Taunts, questions, and whoops were heard no
more among the captors, who drew aside from
their wretched prisoner, as if from the darkest of
their Manitoes, all looking on with unconcealed
wonder and awe. The only person, indeed, who
seemed undismayed at the spectacle, was the
renegade, who, as Nathan shock and writhed in
the fit, beheld the corner of a piece of
parchment
projecting from the bosom of his shirt, and
looking vastly like that identical instrument he had
seen but an hour or two before in the hands of
Braxley. Stooping down, and making as if he
would have raised the convulsed man in his arms,
he drew the parchment from its hiding-place,
and, unobserved by the Indians, transferred it to
a secret place in his own garments. He then
rose up, and stood like the rest, looking upon the
prisoner, until the fit had passed off, which it did
in but a few moments, Nathan starting to his feet,
and looking around him in the greatest wildness,
as if, for a moment, not only unconscious of what
had befallen him, but even of his captivity.
But unconsciousness of the latter calamity was
of no great duration, and was dispelled by the old
chief saying, but with looks of drunken respect,
that had succeeded his insane furyMy
brudder
great-medicine white-man! great white-man
medicine! Me Wenonga, great Injun-captain,
great kill-man-white-man, kill-all-man, man-man,
squaw-man, little papoose-man! Me make
medicine-man
brudder-man! Medicine-man tell
Wenonga
all Jibbenainosay?where find
Jibbenainosay
?
how kill Jibbenainosay? kill white-man's
devil-man! Medicine-man tell Injun-man why
medicine-man come Injun town? steal Injun
prisoner
?
steal Injun hoss? Me Wenonga,me
good brudder medicine-man.
This gibberish, with which he seemed, besides
expressing much new-born good will, to intimate
that its cause lay in the belief that the prisoner
was a great white conjuror, who could help him
to a solution of sundry interesting questions, the
old chief pronounced with much solemnity and
suavity; and he betrayed an inclination to
continue
it, the captors of Nathan standing by and
looking on with vast and eager interest. But a
sudden and startling yell from the Indians who
had charge of the young Virginian, preceded by
an exclamation from the renegade who had stolen
among them, upset the curiosity of the party,or
rather substituted a new object for admiration,
which set them all running towards the fire,
where Roland lay bound. The cause of the
excitement
was nothing less than the discovery
which Doe had just made, of the identity of the
prisoner with Roland Forrester, whom he had
with his own hands delivered into those of the
merciless Piankeshaws, and whose escape from
them and sudden appearance in the Shawnce
village
were events just as wonderful to the savages
as the supposed powers of the white
medicine-man
,
his associate.
But there was still a third prodigy to be
wondered
at. The third prisoner was dragged from
among the horses to the fire, where he was
almost
immediately recognised by half a dozen
different
warriors, as the redoubted and incorrigible
horse-thief, Captain Stackpole. The wonderful
conjuror, and the wonderful young Long-knife,
who was one moment a captive in the hands of
Piankeshaws on the banks of the Wabash, and,
the next, an invader of a Shawnee village in the
valley of the Miami, were both forgotten: the
captain of horse-thieves was a much more
wonderful
person,or, at the least, a much more
important
prize. His name was howled aloud, and
in a moment became the theme of every tongue;
and he was instantly surrounded by every man in
the village,we may say, every woman and child
too, for the alarm had brought the whole village
into the square; and the shrieks of triumph, the
yells of unfeigned delight with which all
welcomed
a prisoner so renowned and so detested,
produced
an uproar ten times greater than that
which gave the alarm.
It was indeed Stackpole, the zealous and
unlucky
slave of a mistress whom it was his fate to
injure and wrong in every attempt he made to
serve her; and who had brought himself and his
associates to their present bonds by merely
toiling
on the present occasion too hard in her
service
.
It seems,for so he was used himself to
tell the tale,that he entered the Indian pound
with the resolution to fulfil Bloody Nathan's
instructions
to the letter; and he accordingly
selected
four of the best animals of the herd, which
he succeeded in haltering without difficulty or
noise. Had he paused here, he might have
retreated
with his prizes without fear of discovery.
But the excellence of the opportunity,the best
he had ever had in his life,the excellence, too,
of the horses, thirty or forty in number, the
primest and beautifullest critturs, he averred,
what war ever seed in a hoss-pound, with a
notion which now suddenly beset his grateful
brain, namely, that by carrying off the whole
15*
herd he could make anngelliferous madam rich
in the item of hoss-flesh, proved too much for
his philosophy and his judgment; and after
holding
a council of war in his own mind, he came to
a resolution to steal the lot.
This being determined upon, he imitated the
example of magnanimity lately set him by
Nathan
,
stripped off and converted his venerable
wrap-rascal into extemporary halters, and so
made sure of half a dozen more of the best
horses; with which, and the four first selected,
not doubting that the remainder of the herd would
readily follow at their heels, he crept from the
fold, to make his way up the valley, and round
among the hills, to the rendezvous. But that was
a direction in which, as he soon learned to his
cost, neither the horses he had in hand, nor those
that were to follow in freedom, had the slightest
inclination to go; and there immediately ensued
a struggle between the stealer and the stolen,
which, in the space of a minute or less, resulted
in the whole herd making a demonstration
towards
the centre of the village, whither they
succeeded
both in carrying themselves and the
vainly resisting horse-thief, who was borne along
on the backs of those he had haltered, like a
land-bird on the bosom of a torrent, incapable
alike of resisting or escaping the flood.
In this manner, he was taken in a trap of his
own making, as many a better and wiser man of
the world has been, and daily is; and it was no
melioration of his distress to think he had
whelmed
his associates in his ruin, and defeated the best
and last hopes of his benefactress. It was with
such feelings at his heart, that he was dragged up
to the fire, to be exulted over and scolded at as long
as it should seem good to his captors. But the
latter, exhausted by the day's revels, and
satisfied
with their victory, so complete and so
bloodless
,
soon gave over tormenting him, resolving
however that he should be soundly beaten at the
gantelope on the morrow, for the especial
gratification
,
and in honour, of the Wyandott party, their
guests.
This resolution being made, he was, like
Roland
and Nathan, led away bound, each being
bestowed
in a different hut, where they were
committed
to safer guards than had been appointed to
watch over Edith; and, in an hour after, the
village
was again wrapped in repose. The last to
betake themselves to their rest were Doe, and his
confederate, Braxley, the latter of whom had been
released from his disagreeable bonds, when Edith
was carried back to the tent. It was while
following
Doe to his cabin, that he discovered the
loss of the precious document upon the possession
of which he had built so many stratagems, and so
many hopes of success. His agitation and
confusion
were so great at the time of Nathan's assault,
that he was wholly unaware it had been taken
from him by this assailant; and Doe, to whom its
possession opened newer and bolder prospects, and
who had already formed a design for using it to
his own advantage, affected to believe that he had
dropped it on the way, and would easily recover
it on the morrow, as no Indian could possibly
attach
the least value to it.
Another subject of agitation to Braxley, was the
reappearance of his rival; who, however, Doe
assured
him, was now as certainly a dead man as
if twenty bullets had been driven through his
body.He is in the hands of the Old Vulture,
said he, grimly, and he will burn in fire jist as
sure as
we
will, Dick Braxley, when the devil gits
us!that is, unless we ourselves save him.
We, Jack! said the other with a laugh: and
yet who knows how the wind may blow
you?
But
an hour ago you were as remorseful over the lad's
supposed death, as you are now apparently
indifferent
what befalls him.
It is true, replied Doe, coolly: but see the
difference! When the Piankeshaws were burning
him,or when I thought the dogs were at it,it
was a death of
my
making for him: it was
I
that
helped him to the stake. But here the case is
altered
.
He comes here on his own hook; the
Injuns
catch him on his own hook; and, dn them,
they'll burn him on his own hook! and so it's no
matter of my consarning. There's the root of it!
This explanation satisfied his suspicious ally;
and having conversed awhile longer on what
appeared
to them most wonderful and interesting in
the singular attempt at the rescue, the two
retired
to their repose.
CHAPTER XIV.
The
following day was one of unusual
animation
and bustle in the Indian village, as the
prisoners
could distinguish even from their several
places of confinement, without, however, being
sensible of the cause. From sunrise until after
mid-day, they heard, at intervals, volleys of
fire-arms
shot off at the skirts of the town, which,
being followed by shrill halloos as from those
who fired them, were immediately re-echoed by
all the throats in the village,men, women,
children
,
and dogs uniting in a clamour that was
plainly the outpouring of savage exultation and
delight. It seemed as if parties of warriors,
returning
victorious from the lands of the
Long-knife
,
were time by time marching into, and
through the village, proclaiming the success of
their arms, and exhibiting the bloody trophies of
their triumph. The hubbub increased, the shouts
became more frequent and multitudinous, and the
village for a second time seemed given up to the
wildest and maddest revelry, to the sway of
unchained
demons, or of men abandoned to all the
horrible impulses of lycanthropy.
During all this time, the young Virginian lay
bound in a wigwam, guarded by a brace of old
warriors, who occasionally varied the tedium of
watching by stalking to the door, where, like
yelping curs paying their respects to passers-by,
they uplifted their voices and vented a yell or two
in testimony of their approbation of what was
going on without. Now and then, also, they even
left the wigwam, but never for more than a few
moments at a time; when, having thus amused
themselves, they would return, squat themselves
down by the prisoner's side, and proceed to
entertain
him with sundry long-winded speeches in
their own dialect, of which, of course, he
understood
not a word. Wrapped in his own bitter
thoughts, baffled in his last hope, and now grown
indifferent what might befall him, he lay upon the
earthen floor during the whole day, expecting
almost
every moment to behold some of the
shouting
crew of the village rush into the hovel and
drag him away to the tortures, which, at that
period
,
were so often the doom of the prisoner.
But the solitude of his prison-house was
invaded
only by his two old jailers; and it was not
until nightfall that he beheld a third human
countenance
.
At that period, Telie Doe stole
trembling
into the hut, bringing him food, which she
set before him, but with looks of deep grief and
deeper abasement, which he might have attributed
to shame and remorse for a part played in the
scheme of captivity, had not all her actions shown
that, although acquainted with the meditated
outrage
,
she was sincerely desirous to avert it.
Her appearance awakened his dormant spirits,
and recalled the memory of his kinswoman, of
whom he besought her to speak, though well
aware she could speak neither hope nor comfort.
But scarce had Telie, more abashed and more
sorrowful
at the question, opened her lips to reply, when
one of the old Indians interposed with a frown of
displeasure
,
and taking her by the arm, led her
angrily
to the door, where he waved her away, with
gestures that seemed to threaten a worse
reception
,
should she presume to return.
Thus thwarted and driven back again upon
his own reflections, Roland gave himself up to
despondency, awaiting with sullen indifference the
fate which he had no doubt was preparing for
him. But he was doomed once more to
experience
the agitations of hope, the tormentor not
less than the soother of existence,the
Brother of Fear, more gayly clad,
The merrier fool o' th' two, yet quite as mad.
Soon after nightfall, and when his mind was in
a condition resembling the hovel in which he lay,
a cheerless ruin, lighted only by occasional
flickerings from a fire of spirit fast smouldering
into ashes,he heard a step enter the door, and,
by and by, a jabbering debate commenced
between
the new comer and his guards, which
resulted
in the latter presently leaving the cabin.
The intruder then stepped up to the fire, which
he stirred into a flame; and seating himself full
in its light, revealed, somewhat to Roland's
surprise
,
the form and visage of the renegade, Abel
Doe, whose acts on the hill-side had sufficiently
impressed his lineaments on the soldier's memory.
He eyed the captive for awhile very earnestly,
but in deep silence, which Roland himself was the
first to break.
To the soldier, however, bent upon preserving
the sullen equanimity which was his best
substitute
for resignation, there was enough in the
appearance
of this man to excite the fiercest
emotions
of indignation. Others might have planned
the villany which had brought ruin and misery
upon his head; but it was Doe, who, for the
bravo's
price, and with the bravo's baseness, had set
the toils around him, and struck the blow. It was,
indeed, only through the agency of such an
accomplice
,
that Braxley could have put his schemes
into execution, or ventured even to attempt them.
The blood boiled in his veins, as he surveyed the
mercenary and unprincipled hireling, and strove,
though in vain, to rise upon his fettered arms, to
give energy to his words of denunciation:
Villain! he cried, base caitiff! have you
come to boast the fruits of your rascally crime?
Mean, wretched, dastardly villain!
Right, captain! replied Doe, with a consent
ing nod of the head, you have nicked me on the
right p'int: villain's the true word to begin on;
and, perhaps, 'twill be the one to end on: but
that's as we shall conclude about it, after we have
talked the matter over.
Begone, wretch,trouble me not, said
Roland
,
I have nothing to say to you, but to curse
you.
Well, I reckon that's natteral enough, too, that
cussing of me, said Doe, seeing as how I've in
a manner desarved it. But there's an end to all
things, even to cussing; and, may be, you'll jist
take a jump the other way, when the gall's over.
A friend to-day, an enemy to-morrow, as the
saying
is; and you may jist as well say it
backwards
;
for, as things turn up, I'm no sich
blasted
enemy jist now, no-way no-how. I'm for
holding a peace-talk, as the Injuns say, dn 'em,
burying the axe, and taking a whiff or two at the
kinnikinick of friendship. So cuss away, if it
will do you good; and I'll stand it. But as for
being off, why I don't mean it no-way. I've got a
bargain to strike with you, and it is jist a matter
to take the tiger-cat out of you,it is, dn it:
and when you've heard it, you'll be in no sich
hurry to get rid of me. But afore we begin, I've
jist got a matter to ax you: and that is,how
the h you cleared the old Piankeshaw and his
young uns?
If you have any thing to propose to me, said
Roland, smothering his wrath as well as he could,
though scarcely hoping assistance or comfort of
any kind from the man who had done him such
injury, propose it, and be brief, and trouble me
with no questions.
Well now, said Doe, a civil question might
as well have a civil answer! If you killed the
old feller and the young uns, you need 'nt be
ashamed of it; for, cuss me, I think all the better
of you for it; for it's not every feller can kill three
Injuns that has him in the tugs, by no means,
no-how
.
But, I reckon, the ramscallions took to the
liquor? (Injuns will be Injuns, there's no two ways
about it!) and you riz on 'em, and so payed 'em
up scot and lot, according to their desarvings?
You could 'nt have done a better thing to make
me beholden; for, you see, I had the giving of
you up to 'em, and I felt bad,I did, dn me,
for I knew the butchers would burn you, if they
got you to the Wabash;I did, captain, and I
had bad thoughts about it. But it was a cussed
mad notion of you, following us, it was, there's
no denying! Howsomever, I won't talk of that.
I jist want to ax you where you picked up that
Injun-looking feller that was lugging off the gal,
and what's his natur'? The Injuns say, he's a
conjuror: now I never heerd of conjurors among
the whites, like as among the Injuns, afore I cut
loose from 'em, and I'm cur'ous on the subject!
I jist ax you a civil question, and I don't mean no
harm in it. There's nobody can make the feller
VOL. II.16
out; and, as for Ralph Stackpole, blast him, he
says he never seed the crittur afore in his life!
If you would have me answer
your
question,
said Roland, in whom Doe's discourse was
beginning
to stir up many a former feeling, you
must first answer mine. This person you speak
of,what is to be his fate?
Why, burning, I reckon: but that's according
as he pleases the old Vulture: for, if he can find
out what never an Injun Medicine has been able
to do, it may be, the old chief will feed him up,
and make him his conjuror. They say, he's
conjuring
with the crittur now.
And Stackpole,what will they do with
him?
Burn him, sartain! They're jist waiting till the
warriors come in from the Licking, where, you
must know, they have taken a hundred scalps, or
so, at one grab: and then the feller will roast
beyond
all mention.
And I, too, said the Virginian, with such
calmness as he could,I, too, am to meet the
same fate?
Most ondoubtedly, said Doe, with an
ominous
nod of assent. There's them among us
that speak well of you, as having heart enough to
be made an Injun: but there's them that have
sworn you shall burn; and burn you
must!
That
is, onless But he was interrupted by
Roland
,
exclaiming hurriedly,
There is but one more to speak ofmy
cousin
?
my poor, friendless cousin?
There, said Doe, you need 'nt be afeard of
burning, by no means whatsomever. We did 'nt
catch the gal to make a roast of. She is safe
enough; there's one that will take care of her.
And that one is the villain Braxley! Oh,
knave that you are, could you have the heart,
you who have a daughter of your own,could
you have committed
her
into the arms of such a
villain?
No, by G, I could'nt! said Doe, with great
earnestness: but another man's daughter is quite
another thing. Howsomever, you need'nt take
on for nothing; for he means to marry her and
take her safe back to Virginny: and, you see, I
bargained with him agin all rascality; for I had a
gal of my own, and I could'nt think of his
playing
foul with the poor creatur'. No; we had an
understanding about all that, when we was
waiting
for you on old Salt. All Dick wants is jist a
wife that will help him to them lands of the old
major. And that, you see, is jist the whole
reason
of our making the grab on you.
You confess it then! cried Roland, too much
excited by the bitterest of passions to be surprised
at the singular communicativeness of his visiter:
you sold yourself to the villain for gold! for gold
you hesitated not to sacrifice the happiness of one
victim of his passions, the life of another! Oh,
basest of all that bear the name of man, how could
you do this villany?
Because, replied Doe, with as much apparent
sincerity as emphasis,because I am a dd
rascal;there's no sort of doubt about it; and we
won't be tender, the way we talk of it. I was an
honest man once, captain, but I am a rascal now;
warp and woof, skin-deep and heart-deep,ay,
to the bones and marrow,I am all the way a
rascal! But don't look as if you was astonished
already. I come to make a clean breast of all
sorts of matters,jist, captain, for a little bit of
your advantage and my own: and there's things
coming that will make you look a leetle of a sight
wilder! And, first and foremost, to beginHave
you any particular longing to be out of this here
Injun town, and well shut of the dd fire-torture?
Have I any desire to be free! Mad question!
Well, captain, I'm jist the man, and the only
one, that can help you; for them that would, can't,
and them that can, won't.And, secondly and
lastly, captain,as the parsons say in the
settlements
,have
you any hankering to be the master
of the old major your uncle's, lands and houses?
If you come to mock and torture me,said
Roland, but was interrupted by the renegade:
It is jist to save you from the torture, said
he, that I'm now speaking; for, cuss me, the
more I think of it, the more I can't stand it
no-how
.
I'm a rascal, captain, but I'm no tiger-cat,
especially to them that has n't misused me; and
there's the grit of a man about you, that strikes
my feelings exactly. But, you see, captain,
there's a bargain first to be struck between us,
afore I comes up to the rackBut I'll make tarms
easy.
Make them what you will, andBut, alas!
where shall I find means to repay you? I who am
robbed of every thing?
Didn't I say, I could help you to the major's
lands and houses? and a'n't they a fortun' for an
emperor?
You!
you
help me? help me to
them?
Captain, said the renegade, with sundry
emphatic
nods of the head, I'm a sight more of a
rascal than you ever dreamed on! and this
snapping
of you up by Injun deviltry, that you think
so hard of, is but a small part of my misdoings:
I've been slaving agin you this sixteen years, more
or less,
slaving
, (that's the word, for I made a
niggur of myself,) to rob you of these here very
lands that I'm now thinking of helping you to!
You don't believe me, captain? Well,did you
ever hear of a certain honest feller of old Augusta,
called John Atkinson?
Hah! cried the soldier, looking with new
eyes upon the renegade; you are then the fellow
upon whose perjured testimony Braxley relied to
sustain his frauds?
The identical same man, John Atkinson,or
Jack, as they used to call me; but now Abel Doe,
for convenience sake, said the refugee, with great
composure; and so, now, you can see into the
whole matter. It was
me
that had the keeping of
the major's daughter that you knows of. Well;
I was an honest feller in them days,I was,
captain
,
by G! repeated the fellow with something
that sounded like remorseful utterance, and jist
as contented in my cabin on the mountain as the
old major himself in his big house at Fellhallow.
But Dick Braxley came, dn him, and there was
an end of all honest doings: for Dick was high
with the old major, and the major was agin his
brothers; and says Dick, says he, `Put but this little
gal,'meaning the major's daughter,`out of the
way, and I'm jist as good as the major's heir; and
I'll make your fortun'
Ay! and it was
he
then, the villain himself,
cried Roland, who devised this horrible iniquity,
which, by innuendo at least, he charged upon my
father!You are a rascal indeed! And you
murdered
the poor child?
Murdered! No, rat it, there was no
murdering
in the case: it was jist hiding in a hole, as
you may call it. We burned down the wigwam,
and made on as if the gal was burned in it; and
then I stumped off to the Injun border, among
them that didn't know me, and according to Dick's
16*
advice, helped myself to another name, and jist
passed off the gal for my own daughter.
Your own daughter! cried Roland, starting
half up, but being unable to rise on account of his
bonds: the story then is true! and Telie Doe is
my uncle's child, the lost heiress?
Well, supposing she is? said Atkinson, I
reckon,
you
'd not be exactly the man to help her
to her rights?
Ay, by Heaven, but I would though! said
Roland, if rights they be. If my uncle, upon
knowledge that she was still alive, thought fit to
alter his intentions with regard to Edith and
myself
,
he would have found none more ready to
acknowledge
the poor girl's claims than ourselves,
none more ready to befriend and assist her.
Well! there's all the difference between being
an honest feller and a rascal! muttered
Atkinson
,
casting his eyes upon the fire, which he fell to
studying for a moment with great earnestness.
Then starting up hastily, and turning to the
prisoner
,
he exclaimed,
There's not a better gal in the etarnal world!
You don't know it, captain; but that Telie, that
poor crittur that's afeard of her own shadow, did
run all risks, and play all manner of fool's tricks,
to save you from this identical same captivation;
and the night you was sleeping at Bruce's fort,
and we waiting for you at the Ford, she cried, and
begged, and prayed that I would do you no more
mischief; and, cuss her, she threatened to tell you
and Bruce, there, the whole affair of the ambush;
till I scared her with my tomahawk, like a dd
rascal, as I am; (but there's nothing will fetch her
round but fear of murdering,) and so swore her to
keep silence. And then, captain, her running
away after you in the woods,why it was jist to
circumvent us,to lead you to the t'other old
road, and so save you; it was, captain, and she
owned it: and if you'd 'a' taken to her leading, as
she axed you, she'd 'a' got you out of the snarl
altogether. Howsomever, captain, he continued,
after making those admissions, which solved all
the enigmas of Telie's conduct, I won't lie in this
matter no-how. The gal is no gal of the major's,
but my own flesh and blood: the major's little
crittur sickened on the border, and died off in less
than a year; and so there was all our rascally
burning and lying for nothing; for, if we had
waited awhile, the poor thing would have died of
her own accord. Well, captain, I'm making a
long story about nothing: but the short of it is, I
did n't make a bit of a fortun' at all, but fell into
troubles; and the end was, I turned Injun, jist as
you see me; and a feller there, Tom Bruce, took to
my little gal out of charity; and so she was bred
up a beggar's brat, with every body a jeering of
her, because of her dd rascally father. And,
you see, this made a wolf of me; for I couldn't
bring her among the Injuns, to marry her to a
cussed niggur of a savage,no, captain, I couldn't;
for she's my own natteral flesh and blood, and
captain, I love her! And so, I goes back to
Virginny, to see what Braxley could do for her;
and there, dn him, he puts me up to a new
rascality
;
which was nothing less than setting up my
gal for the major's daughter, and making her a
great heiress, and marrying of her. Howsomever,
this wouldn't do, this marrying; for, first, Dick
Braxley was a bigger rascal than myself, and it
was agin my conscience to give him the gal, who
was a good gal, desarving of an honest husband;
and, next, the feller was mad after young madam,
and there was no telling how soon he might p'ison
my gal, to marry the other. And so we couldn't
fix the thing then to our liking, no-way; but by
and by we did. For when the major died, he
sends for me in a way I told him of; and here's
jist the whole of our rascality. We was, in the
first place, jist to kill you off
To kill me, villain! cried Roland, whose
interest was already excited to the highest pitch
by the renegade's story.
Not exactly with our own hands; for I
bargained
agin that: but it was agreed you should be
put out of the way of ever returning agin to
Virginny
.
Well, captain, Dick was then to marry the
young lady; and then jist step into the major's
estate by virtue of the major's will,the second
one, you must know, which Dick took good care
to hide away, pretending to suppose the major had
destroyed it.
And that will, exclaimed Roland, the villain,
the unparalleled villain, is still possessed of?
No, rat him,the devil has turned upon him
at last, and it is in better hands! said Atkinson;
and without more ado, he drew the instrument
from his bosom, and unfolded it before Roland's
astonished eyes. Read it, said Doe, with
exulting
voice: I can make nothing of the cussed
pothooks
myself, having never been able to stand the
flogging of a school-house; but I know the fixings
of itthe whole estate devised equally to you
and the young woman, to be divided according as
you may agree of yourselves,a monstrous silly
way, that; but there's no helping it.
And holding it before the Virginian, in the light
of the fire, the latter satisfied himself at a glance
that Atkinson had truly reported its contents. It
was written with his uncle's own hand, briefly but
clearly; and while manifesting, throughout, the
greatest affection on the part of the testator
towards
his orphan niece, it contained no
expressions
indicative either of ill-will to his nephew, or
disapprobation of the part the young man had
chosen to play in the great drama of revolution.
And this was the more remarkable, as it was dated
at a period soon after Roland had so wilfully, or
patriotically, fled to fight the battles of his country,
and when, it might have been supposed, the stern
old loyalist's anger was at its acme. A better and
more grateful proof that the young man had
neither
lost his regard nor confidence, was shown in
a final codicil, dated in the year of Roland's
majority
,
in which he was associated with Braxley as
executor, the latter worthy having been made to
figure in that capacity alone, in the body of the
will.
This is indeed a discovery! cried Roland,
with the agitation of joy and hope. Cut my
bonds, deliver me, with my cousin and
companions
,and
the best farm in the manor shall
reward
you:nay, you shall fix your own terms
for your daughter and yourself.
Exactly, said Atkinson, who, although the
prisoner was carefully bound, exhibited a jealous
disinclination to let the will come near his hands,
and now restored it carefully to his own bosom;
we must talk over that matter of tarms, jist to
avoid mistakes. And to begin, captain, I will jist
observe, as before, that if you don't take my offer,
and close with me hard and fast, you will roast at
an Injun stake jist as sartainly as you are now
snugging by an Injun fire;you will, dn me,
there's no two ways about it!
The terms, the terms? cried Roland,
eagerly
:
name them; I will not dispute them.
But the renegade was in no such hurry.
You see, said he, I'm a dd rascal, as I
said; and in this matter, I am jist as much a
rascal
as before, for I'm playing foul with Braxley,
having bargained to work out the whole thing
in his sarvice. Howsomever, there is a kind of
fair play in cheating
him
, seeing it was him that
made a rascal of me. And, moresomeover, I
have my doubts of him, and there's no way I can
hold him up to a bargain. And, lastly, captain, I
don't see how he can be of any sarvice to my
gal! He can't marry her, if he would; and if he
could, he shouldn't have her; and as for leaving
her to his tender mercies, I would jist as soon
think of hunting her up quarters in a bear's den.
And as for keeping her among these dd brutes,
the Injunsfor brutes they are, captain, there's
no denying it
Why need you speak of it more? I will find
her a home and protection,a home and
protection
for both of you.
As for
me
, captain, thanking you for the
favour
,
you won't do me no sich thing, seeing as
how I don't look for it. There's two or three
small matters agin me in the Settlements, which
it is no notion of mine to bring up for reckoning.
The gal's the crittur to be protected; and I'll take
my pay out chiefly in the good you do to her; and
for the small matters, not meaning no offence, I
can trust best to her,for she's my daughter, and
she won't cheat me. Now, captain, a better gal
than Telieher true name's Matilda, but she
never heard any thing of it but Teliea better
gal was never seen in the woods, for all she's
young and timorsome; and it's jist my notion
and my desire, that, whatever may become of
me, nothing but good shall become of her. And
now, captain, here's my tarms; I'll cut you
loose from Injun tugs and Injun fires, carry you
safe to the Settlements, and give you this here
precious sheepskin,which is jist as much
as saying I'll make you the richest man, in
farms, flocks, and niggurs, in all Virginny; and
you shall marry the gal, and make a lady of
her.
Marry her! cried Roland, in amazement and
consternation,marry her!
Ay, captain! that's the word, said Atkinson:
I have an idea you'll make her a good husband,
for you're an honest feller, and a brave oneI'll
say that for you; and she'll make you a good
wife, she will, by G, or I'll give you my scalp
on it. I reckon the crittur has a liking for you
already; for I never did see any body so beg,
and plead, and take on for mortal feller. Marry
her's the tarms; and, I reckon, you'll allow, they're
easy ones?
My good friend, you are surely jesting! said
the Virginian. I will do for her whatever you
can wish, or demand. The best farm in the whole
estate shall be her's, and the protection of my
kinswoman will be cheerfully and gratefully
granted.
As for jesting, captain, said the renegade,
with a lowering brow, there's not one particle
of it about me from top to toe. I offer you a
bargain, that has all the good on your side; and
I reckoned you'd 'a' jumped at it, with a whole
hoss-load of thank'ees. I offer you a gal that's
the best gal in the whole etarnal wood; and, I
reckon, you may count all that this here
sheepskin
will bring you, as jist so much dowry of my
giving. An't that making tarms easy?for, as
for the small matters for myself, them is things I
will come upon the gal for, without troubling you
for 'em. Now you see, captain, I'll jist argue
the matter. You may reckon it strange I should
make you such an offer; and, ondoubtedly, so it
is. But here's the case. First, captain, I'm agin
burning you; it makes me oneasy to think of it,
for you ha'n't done me no harm, and you're a
young feller of the rale Virginny grit, jist after
my own heart, and I takes to you. And, next,
captain, there's the gal,a good gal, captain,
that's desarving of all I can do for her, and a
heap more. But, captain, what's to become of
the crittur, when I'm done for? You see, some
of these cussed Injuns,or it may be the white
men, for they're all agin me,will take the scalp
off me some day, sooner or later, there's no two
ways about it. Well then, what's to become of
the poor gal, that ha'n't no friend in the big world
to care for her? Now, you see, I'm thinking of
the gal, and I'm making the bargain for her; and
I made it in my own mind, jist the minute I seed
you were a captive among us, and laid my hand
on this here will. Said I to myself, `I'll save the
youngster, and I'll marry my gal to him, and
there's jist two good things I'll do for the pair
of 'em!' And so, captain, there's exactly the
end of it. If you'll take the gal, you shall have
her, and you'll make three different critturs greatly
beholden to you:first, the gal, who's a good
gal, and a comely gal, and will love and honour
you jist as hard as the best madam in the land;
next, myself, that am her father, and longs to give
her to an honest feller that won't misuse her; and,
last, your own partickelar self;for the taking of
her is exactly the only way you have of gitting
back the old major's lands, and, what I hold to be
jist as agreeable, dragging clear of a hot Injun
fire, that will roast you to cinders, if you remain
in this dd village two days longer!
My friend, cried Roland, driven to
desperation
,
for he perceived Atkinson was making his
extraordinary proposal in perfectly good faith and
simplicity, as a regular matter of business, you
know not what you ask. Free me and my
kinswoman
As for young madam there, interrupted the
renegade, don't be at all oneasy. She's in good
hands, I tell you; and Braxley 'll fetch her straight
off to Virginny, as soon as he has brought her
to reason.
And your terms, said Roland, smothering his
fury as he could, imply an understanding that
my cousin is to be surrendered to him?
Ondoubtedly, replied Doe; There's no two
ways about it. I work on my own hook, in the
matter of the fortun''cause how, Dick's not to
be trusted, where the play's all in his own hands;
but as for cheating him out of the gal, there's no
manner of good can come of it, and it's clear
agin my own interest. No, captain, here's the
case: you takes my gal Telie, and Braxley takes
the t'other; and so it's all settled fair between
you.
Hark you, rascal! cried Roland, giving way
to his feelings; if you would deserve a reward,
you must win it, not by saving
me
, but my
cousin
.
My own life I would buy at the price of
half the lands which that will makes me master
of; for the rescue of Edith from the vile
Braxley
,
I would give
all
. Save her,save her from
Braxley, and then ask me what you will.
Well, said Atkinson, and you'll marry my
gal?
Death and furies! are you besotted? I will
VOL. II.17
enrich her,ay, with the best of my estate,
with allshe shall have it all.
And you won't have her then? cried the
renegade, starting up in anger: You don't think
her good enough for you, because you're of a
great quality stock, and she's come of nothing
but me, John Atkinson, a plain back-woods
feller
?
Or mayhap, he added, more temperately,
you're agin taking her, because of my being sich
a dd notorious rascal? Well now, I reckon,
that's a thing nobody will know of in Virginny,
unless you should tell it yourself. You can jist
call her Telie Jones, or Telie Small, or any
nickname
of that natur', and nobody 'll be the wiser;
and I shall jist say nothing about it myselfI
won't, captain, dn me; for it's the gal's good
I'm hunting after, and none of my own.
You are mad, I tell you, cried the soldier.
Fix your own terms for her: I will execute any
instrument, I will give you any bond
None of your cussed bonds for me, said
Doe, with great contempt; I knows the worth
of 'em, and I'm jist lawyer enough to see how
you could git out of 'em, by swearing they were
written under compulsion, or whatsomever you
call it. And, besides, who's to stop your cheating
the gal that has nobody to take care of her, when
you gits her in Virginny, where I dar' n't foller
her? No, captain, there's jist but the one way to
make all safe and fair; and that's by marrying
her. So marry her, captain; and jist to be short,
captain, you must marry her or burn, there's no
two ways about it. I make you the last offer;
there's no time for another; for to-morrow you
must be help'd off, or it's too late for you. Come,
captain, jist say the wordmarry the gal, and
I'll save you.
You are mad, I tell you again. Marry her I
neither can nor will. But
There's no occasion for more,
interrupted
Doe, starting angrily up. You've jist said
the word, and that's enough. And now,
captain
,
when you come to the stake, don't say
I
brought you there:no, dn it, don't,for I've
done jist all I could do to help you to life and
fortun'
,I
have, dn me, you can't deny it.
And with these words, uttered with sullen
accents
and looks, the renegade stole from the hut,
disregarding all Roland's entreaties to him to
return
,
and all the offers of wealth with which the
latter, in a phrensy of despair, sought to awaken
his cupidity and compassion. The door-mats had
scarce closed upon his retreating figure, before
they were parted to give entrance to the two old
Indians, who immediately assumed their positions
at his side, preserving them with vigilant fidelity
throughout the remainder of the night.
CHAPTER XV.
In
the mean time, and at the very moment
when the renegade was urging his extraordinary
proposals on the young Virginian, a scene was
passing in the hut of Wenonga, in which one of
Roland's fellow-prisoners was destined to play an
important and remarkable part. There, in the
very tent in which he had struck so daring a blow
for the rescue of Edith, but in which Edith
appeared
no more, lay the luckless Nathan, a
victim
not so much of his own rashness as of the
excessive zeal, not to say folly, of his coadjutors.
And thither he had been conducted but a few
hours before, after having passed the previous
night and day in a prison-house less honoured, but
fated, as it proved, to derive peculiar distinction
from the presence of such a guest.
His extraordinary appearance, partaking so
much of that of an Indian juggler arrayed in the
panoply of legerdemain, had produced, as was
mentioned, a powerful effect on the minds of his
captors, ever prone to the grossest credulity and
superstition; and this was prodigiously increased
by the sudden recurrence of his disease,a
dreadful
infliction, whose convulsions seem ever to have
been proposed as the favourite exemplars for the
expression of prophetic fury and the demoniacal
orgasm,and were aped alike by the Pythian
priestess on her tripod and the ruder impostor of
an Indian wigwam. The foaming lips and
convulsed
limbs of the prisoner, if they did not
`speak the god,' to the awe-struck barbarians,
declared at least the presence of the mighty
fiend who possessed his body; and when the fit
was over, though they took good care to bind him
with thongs of bison-hide, like his companions,
and led him away to a place of security, it was
with a degree of gentleness and respect, that
proved the strength of their belief in his
supernatural
endowments. This belief was still further
indicated the next day, by crowds of savages who
flocked into the wigwam where he was confined,
some to stare at him, some to inquire the
mysteries
of their fate, and some, as it seemed, with
credulity less unconditional, to solve the enigma
of his appearance, before yielding their full
belief
.
Among these last were the renegade and
one or two savages of a more sagacious or
skeptical
turn than their fellows, who beset the
supposed
conjuror with questions, calculated to pluck
out the heart of his mystery.
But questions and curiosity were in vain. The
conjuror was possessed by a silent devil; and
whether it was that the shock of his last
paroxysm
had left his mind benumbed and stupified,
whether his courage had failed at last, leaving
him plunged in despair, or whether indeed, his
frigid indifference was not altogether assumed, to
serve a peculiar purpose, it was nevertheless
certain
that he bestowed not the slightest attention
on any of his questioners, not even upon Doe, who
had previously endeavoured to unravel the riddle
by seeking the assistance of Ralph Stackpole,
assistance, however, which Ralph, waxing
sagacious
of a sudden, professed himself wholly
unable
to give. The faithful fellow indeed professed
17*
to be just as ignorant of the person and
character
of the young Virginian; swearing, with a
magnanimous resolve to assume the pains and
penalties of Indian ire on his own shoulders, that
`the hoss-stealing' (which, he doubted not, would
be held the most unpardonable feature in the
adventure
,)
`was jist a bit of a private speculation
of his own,that there was nobody with him,
that he had come on his expedition alone, and
knew no more of the other fellers than he did of
the 'tarnal tempers of Injun hosses,not he!' In
short, the skeptics were baffled, and the
superstitious
were left to the enjoyment of their wonder
and awe.
At nightfall, Nathan was removed to
Wenonga's
cabin, where the chief, surrounded by a
dozen
or more warriors, made him a speech in such
English phrases as he had acquired, informing
the prisoner, as before, that `he, Wenonga, was a
great chief and warrior, that the other, the
prisoner
,
was a great medicine-man; and, finally,
that he, Wenonga, required of his prisoner, the
medicine-man, by his charms, to produce the
Jibbenainosay
,
the unearthly slayer of his people
and curse of his tribe, in order that he, the great
chief, who feared neither warrior nor devil, might
fight him, like a man, and kill him, so that he, the
aforesaid destroyer, should destroy his young men
in the dark no longer.'
Not even to this speech, though received by the
warriors with marks of great approbation, did
Nathan vouchsafe the least notice; and the
savages
despairing of moving him to their purpose
at that period, but hoping perhaps to find him in
a more reasonable mood at another moment, left
him,but not until they had again inspected the
thongs, and satisfied themselves they were tied in
knots strong and intricate enough to hold even a
conjuror. They also, before leaving him to
himself
,
placed food and water at his side, and in a
way that was perhaps designed to show their
opinion of his wondrous powers; for as his arms
were pinioned tightly behind his back, it was
evident
he could feed himself only by magic.
The stolid indifference to all sublunary matters
which had distinguished Nathan throughout the
scene, vanished the moment he found himself
alone. In fact, the step of the savage the last to
depart was yet rustling among the weeds at the
Black Vulture's door, when, making a violent
effort
,
he succeeded in placing himself in a sitting
posture, and glared with eager look around the
apartment, which was, as before, dimly lighted by
a fire on the floor. The piles of skins and
domestic
utensils were hanging about, as on the
preceding
night; and, indeed, nothing seemed to have
been disturbed, except the weapons, of which
there had been so many when Edith occupied the
den, but of which not a single one now
remained
.
Over the fire,the long tresses that depended
from it swinging and fluttering in the currents of
smoke and heated air,was the bundle of scalps,
to which Braxley had so insidiously directed the
gaze of Edith, and which was now one of the first
objects that met Nathan's eyes.
Having reconnoitered every corner and cranny,
and convinced himself that there was no lurking
savage watching his movements, he began
straightway
to test the strength of the thong by which his
arms were bound; but without making the slightest
impression on it. The cord was strong, the knots
were securely tied; and after five or six minutes of
struggling, in which he made the most prodigious
efforts to tear it asunder, without hesitating at the
anguish it caused him, he was obliged to give over
his hopes, fain could he have, like Thomson's
demon
in the net of the good Knight, enjoyed that
consolation of despair,to
Sit him felly down, and gnaw his bitter nail.
He summoned his strength, and renewed his
efforts again and again, but always without
effect
;
and being at last persuaded of his inability
to aid himself, he leaned back against a bundle of
skins, to counsel with his own thoughts what hope,
if any, yet remained.
At that instant, and while the unuttered misery
of his spirit might have been read in his haggard
and despairing eyes, a low whining sound, coming
from a corner of the tent, but on the outside, with
a rustling and scratching, as if some animal were
struggling to burrow its way betwixt the skins
and the earth, into the lodge, struck his ear. He
started, and stared round with a wild but joyous
look of recognition.
Hist, hist! he criedor rather whispered,
for his voice was not above his breath: hist,
hist! If thee ever was wise, now do thee show
it!
The whining ceased; the scratching and
rustling
were heard a moment longer; and, then,
rising from the skin wall, under which he had
made his way, appearedno bulky demon,
indeed
,
summoned by the conjuror to his assistance
but little dog Peter, his trusty, sagacious, and
hitherto inseparable friend, creeping with stealthy
step, but eyes glistening with affection, towards
the bound and helpless prisoner.
I can't hug thee, little Peter! cried the
master
,
as the little animal crawled to him, wagging
his tail, and, throwing his paws upon Nathan's
knee, looked into his face, with a most meaning
stare of inquiry;I can't hug thee, Peter!
Thee sees how it is! the Injuns have ensnared
me. But where
thee
is, Peter, there there is hope.
Quick, little Peter! he cried, thrusting his arms
out from his back; thee has teeth, and thee
knows how to use themthee has gnawed me
free beforeQuick, little Peter, quick! Thee
teeth is the knives; and with them thee can cut
me free!
The little animal, whose remarkable docility
and sagacity have been instanced before, seemed
actually to understand his master's words, or, at
least, to comprehend from his gestures, the strange
duty that was now required of him; and, without
more ado, he laid hold with his teeth upon the
thong round Nathan's wrists, tugging and
gnawing
at it with a zeal and perseverance that seemed
to make his master's deliverance, sooner or later,
sure: and his industry was quickened by Nathan,
who, all the while, encouraged him with whispers
to continue his efforts.
Thee gnawed me loose, when the four
Shawnees
had me bound by their fire, at night, on the
banks of Kenhawa; (does thee remember
that
,
Peter?) Ay, thee did, while the knaves slept; and
from that sleep they never waked, the murdering
villains,no, not one of them!Gnaw, little Peter,
gnaw hard and fast; and care not if thee
wounds me with thee teeth; for, truly, I will
forgive
thee, even if thee bites me to the bone.
Faster
,
Peter, faster! Does thee boggle at the skin,
because of its hardness? Truly, I have seen thee
a-hungered, Peter, when thee would have cracked
it like a marrow-bone! Fast, Peter, fast; and
thee shall see me again in freedom!
With such expressions Nathan inflamed the
zeal of his familiar, who continued to gnaw for
the space of five minutes or more, and with such
effect, that Nathan, who ever and anon tested the
brute's progress by a violent jerk at the rope,
found, at the fourth or fifth effort, that it yielded
a little, and cracked, as if its fibres were already
giving way.
Now, Peter! tug, if thee ever tugged! he
cried, his hopes rising almost to ecstasy: A
little
longer; one bite more,a little, but a little
longer, Peter, if thee loves thee master! Yea,
Peter, and we will walk the woods again in
freedom
!Now,
Peter, now for thee last bite!
But the last bite Peter, on the sudden,
betrayed
a disinclination to make. He ceased his toil,
jostled against his master's side, and uttered a
whine, the lowest that could be made audible.
Hah! cried Nathan, as, at the same instant,
he heard the sound of footsteps approaching the
wigwam, thee speaks the truth, and the
accursed
villains is upon us! Away with thee, dog
thee shall finish thee work by and by!
Faithful to his master's orders, or perhaps to
his own sense of what was fitting and proper in
such a case, little Peter leaped hastily among the
skins and other litter that covered half the floor
and the sleeping-berths of the lodge, and was
immediately
out of sight, having left the apartment,
or concealed himself in its darkest corner. The
steps approached; they reached the door: Nathan
threw himself back, reclining against his pile of
furs, and fixed his eye upon the mats at the
entrance
.
They were presently parted; and the
old chief Wenonga came halting into the
apartment
,halting,
yet with a step that was designed
to indicate all the pride and dignity of a warrior.
And this attempt at state was the more natural
and proper, as he was armed and painted as if
for war, his grim countenance hideously
bedaubed
on one side with vermilion, on the other with
black, a long scalping-knife, without sheath or
cover, swinging from his wampum belt, while a
hatchet, the blade and handle both of steel, was
grasped in his hand. In this guise, and with a
wild and demoniacal glitter of eye, that seemed
the result of mingled drunkenness and insanity,
the old chief stalked and limped up to the
prisoner
,
looking as if bent upon his instant
destruction
.
That his passions were up in arms, that he
was ripe for mischief and blood, was indeed plain
and undeniable; but he soon made it apparent
that his rage was only conditional and alternative,
as regarded the prisoner. Pausing within three
or four feet of him, and giving him a look that
seemed designed to freeze his blood, it was so
desperately hostile and savage, he extended his
arm and hatchet,not, however, to strike, as it
appeared, but to do what might be judged
almost
equally agreeable to nine-tenths of his race,
that is, to deliver a speech.
I am Wenonga! he cried, in his own tongue,
being perhaps too much enraged to think of any
other,I am Wenonga, a great Shawnee chief.
I have fought the Long-knives, and drunk their
blood: when they hear my voice, they are afraid,
they run howling away, like dogs when the
squaws beat them from the firewho ever stood
before Wenonga? I have fought my enemies,
and killed them. I never feared a white-man:
why should I fear a white-man's devil? Where
is the Jibbenainosay, the curse of my tribe?the
Shawneewannawin, the howl of my people? He
kills them in the dark, he creeps upon them while
they sleep; but he fears to stand before the face
of a warrior! Am I a dog? or a woman? The
squaws and the children curse me, as I go by:
they say
I
am the killer of their husbands and
fathers; they tell me it was the deed of
Wenonga
that brought the white-man's devil to kill
them; if Wenonga is a chief, let him kill the killer
of his people! I am Wenonga; I am a man; I
fear nothing: I have sought the Jibbenainosay.
But the Jibbenainosay is a coward; he walks in
the dark, he kills in the time of sleephe fears to
fight a warrior! My brother is a great
medicine-man
;
he is a white-man, and he knows how to find
the white-man's devils. Let my brother speak for
me; let him show me where to find the
Jibbenainosay
;
and he shall be a great chief, and the son
of a chief; Wenonga will make him his son, and
he shall be a Shawnee!
Does Wenonga, at last, feel he has brought a
devil upon his people? said Nathan, speaking for
the first time since his capture, and speaking in a
way well suited to strike the interrogator with
surprise. A sneer, as it seemed, of gratified
malice
crept over his face, and was visible even
through the coat of paint, that still invested his
features; and, to crown all, his words were
delivered
in the Shawnee tongue, correctly and
unhesitatingly
pronounced; which was itself, or so
Wenonga appeared to hold it, a proof of his
superhuman
acquirements.
The old chief started, as the words fell upon his
ear, and looked around him in awe, as if the
prisoner
had already summoned a spirit to his elbow.
I have heard the voice of the dead! he cried.
My brother is a great Medicine! But I am a
chief;I am not afraid.
The chief tells me lies, rejoined Nathan, who,
having once unlocked his lips, seemed but little
disposed to resume his former silence;the chief
tells me lies: there is no white-devil hurts his
people
!
I am an old man, and a warrior,I speak the
truth! said the chief, with dignity; and then added,
with sudden feeling,I am an old man; I had
sons and grandsonsyoung warriors, and boys
that would soon have blacked their faces for
battle
[1]
[1]
The young warriors of many tribes are obliged to confine
themselves to black paint, during their probationary
campaigns
.
where are they? The Jibbenainosay
has been in my village, he has been in my
wigwam
There
are none leftthe Jibbenainosay
killed them!
Ay! exclaimed the prisoner, and his eyes
shot fire as he spoke, they fell under his hand,
man and boy,there was not one of them spared
they were of the blood of Wenonga!
Wenonga is a great chief! cried the Indian:
he is childless; but childless he has made the
Long-knife.
The Long-knife, and the son of Onas! said
Nathan.
The chief staggered back, as if struck by a blow,
and stared wildly upon the prisoner.
My brother is a medicine-man,he knows all
things! he exclaimed. He speaks the truth: I
am a great warrior; I took the scalp of the
Quakel
Quakels
a corruption of Quakers, whom the Indians of
Pennsylvania originally designated as the sons of
Onas
, that
being one of the names they bestowed upon Penn.
And of his wife and childrenyou left not
one alive!Ay! continued Nathan, fastening
his looks upon the amazed chief, you slew them
VOL. II.18
all! And he that was the husband and father,
was the Shawnees' friend, the friend even of
Wenonga
!
The white-men are dogs and robbers! said
the chief: the Quakel was my brother; but I
killed him. I am an IndianI love white-man's
blood. My people have soft hearts; they cried for
the Quakel: but I am a warrior with no heart. I
killed them: their scalps are hanging to my
fire-post
!
I am not sorry; I am not afraid.
The eyes of the prisoner followed the Indian's
hand, as he pointed, with savage triumph, to the
shrivelled scalps that had once crowned the
heads of childhood and innocence, and then sunk
to the floor, while his whole frame shivered as
with an ague-fit.
My brother is a great medicine-man,
iterated
the chief: he shall show me the
Jibbenainosay
,
or he shall die.
The chief lies! cried Nathan, with a sudden
and taunting laugh: he can talk big things to a
prisoner, but he fears the Jibbenainosay!
I am a chief and warrior: I will fight the
white-man's devil!
The warrior shall see him then, said the
captive
,
with extraordinary fire. Cut me loose
from my bonds, and I will bring him before the
chief.
And as he spoke, he thrust out his legs, inviting
the stroke of the axe upon the thongs that bound
his ankles.
But this was a favour, which, stupid or mad as
he was, Wenonga hesitated to grant.
The chief, cried Nathan, with a laugh of
scorn, would stand face to face with the
Jibbenainosay
,
and yet fears to loose a naked
prisoner
!
The taunt produced its effect. The axe fell
upon the thong, and Nathan leaped to his feet.
He extended his wrists. The Indian hesitated
again. The chief shall see the
Jibbenainosay
!
cried Nathan; and the cord was cut. The
prisoner turned quickly round, and while his eyes
fastened with a wild but joyous glare upon his
jailer's, a laugh that would have become the jaws
of a hyena, lighted up his visage, and sounded
from his lips. Look! he cried, thee has thee
will! Thee sees the destroyer of thee race,
ay, murdering villain, the destroyer of thee
people
,
and thee own!
And with that, leaping upon the astounded
chief with rather the rancorous ferocity of a wolf
than the enmity of a human being, and
clutching
him by the throat with one hand, while with
the other he tore the iron tomahawk from his
grasp, he bore him to the earth, clinging to him
as he fell, and using the wrested weapon with
such furious haste and skill, that before they had
yet reached the ground, he had buried it in the
Indian's brain. Another stroke, and another, he
gave with the same murderous activity and force;
and Wenonga trode the path to the spirit-land,
bearing the same gory evidences of the
unrelenting
and successful vengeance of the white-man,
that his children and grand-children had borne
before him.
Ay, dog, thee dies at last! at last I have
caught thee!
With these words, Nathan, leaving the
shattered
skull, dashed the tomahawk into the Indian's
chest, snatched the scalping-knife from the belt,
and with one griding sweep of the blade, and
one fierce jerk of his arm, the gray scalp-lock of
the warrior was torn from the dishonoured head.
The last proof of the slayer's ferocity was not
given until he had twice, with his utmost strength,
drawn the knife over the dead man's breast,
dividing
skin, cartilage, and even bone, before it, so
sharp was the blade, and so powerful the hand
that urged it.
Then, leaping to his feet, and snatching from
the post the bundle of withered scalpsthe locks
and ringlets of his own murdered children,
which he spread a moment before his eyes with
one hand, while the other extended, as if to
contrast
the two prizes together, the reeking
scalp-lock
of the murderer, he sprang through the door
of the lodge, and fled from the village; but not
until he had, in the insane fury of the moment,
given forth a wild, ear-piercing yell, that spoke
the triumph, the exulting transport, of long
baffled
but never-dying revenge. The wild whoop,
thus rising in the depth and stillness of the night,
startled many a wakeful warrior and timorous
mother from their repose. But such sounds in a
disorderly hamlet of barbarians, were too
common
to create alarm or uneasiness; and the wary
and the timid again betook themselves to their
dreams, leaving the corse of their chief to stiffen
on the floor of his own wigwam.
CHAPTER XVI.
From
an uneasy slumber, into which,
notwithstanding
his sufferings of mind and body, he had
at last fallen, Roland was roused at the break of
day by a horrible clamour, that suddenly arose in
the village. A shrill scream, that seemed to come
from a female voice, was first heard; then a wild
yell from the lungs of a warrior, which was caught
up and repeated by other voices; and, in a few
moments, the whole town resounded with shrieks,
dismal and thrilling, and expressing astonishment
mingled with fear and horror.
The prisoner, incapable of comprehending the
cause of such a commotion, looked to his guards,
who had started up at the first cry, grasped their
arms, and stood gazing upon one another with
perturbed looks of inquiry. The shriek was
repeated
,
by one,twenty,an hundred throats; and
the two warriors, with hurried exclamations of
alarm, rushed from the wigwam, leaving the
prisoner
to solve the riddle as he might. But he
tasked his faculties in vain. His first ideaand it
sent the blood leaping to his heartthat the village
was suddenly attacked by an army of white-men,
perhaps by the gallant Bruce, the commander
of the Station where his misfortunes had begun,
was but momentary; no lusty hurrahs were heard
mingling with the shrieks of the savages, and no
explosions of fire-arms denoted the existence of
conflict. And yet he perceived that the cries were
18*
not all of surprise and dismay. Some voices were
uplifted in rage, which was evidently spreading
among the agitated barbarians, and displacing the
other passions in their minds.
In the midst of the tumult, and while he was yet
lost in wonder and speculation, the renegade Doe
suddenly rushed into the wigwam, pale with
affright
and agitation.
They 'll murder you, captain! he cried,
there's no time for holding back nowTake the
gal, and I'll save you. The village is up,they'll
have your blood,they're crying for it already,
squaws, warriors and all,ay, dn'em, there's
no stopping 'em now!
What in Heaven's name is the matter?
demanded
the soldier.
All etarnity's the matter! replied Doe, with
vehement utterance: the Jibbenainosay has been
in the village, and killed the chief,ay, dn him,
struck him in his own house, marked him at his
own fire! he lies, dead and scalped,ay, and
crossed too,on the floor of his own wigwam;
the conjurer gone, snapped up by his devil, and
Wenonga stiff and gory!Don't you hear 'em
yelling? The Jibbenainosay, I tell youhe has
killed the chief;we found him dead in his cabin;
and the Injuns are bawling for revengethey are,
dn'em, and they'll murder you;burn you,
tear you to pieces;they will, there's no two ways
about it: they're singing out to murder the
white-men
,
and they'll be on you in no time!
And there is no escape! cried Roland, whose
blood curdled, as he listened to the thrilling yells
that were increased in number and loudness, as if
the enraged barbarians, rushing madly through
the village, were gathering arms to destory the
prisoners,there is no escape?
Take the gal! jist say the word, and I'll save
you, or die with you, I will, dn me! exclaimed
Doe, with fierce energy. There's hosses
grazing
in the pastures; there's halters swinging above
us: I'll mount you, and save you. Say the word,
captain, and I'll cut you loose, and save yousay
it, and be quick; your life depends on itHark!
the dogs is coming! Hold out your arms, till I
cut the tug.
Any thing for my life! cried the Virginian;
but if it can be only bought at the price of
marrying
the girl, it is lost.
And the soldier would have resisted the effort
Doe was making for his deliverance.
You'll be murdered, I tell you! re-echoed
Doe, with increased vehemence, holding the knife
ready in his hand: they're coming on us;I
don't want to see you butchered like an ox. One
word, captain!I'll take your word: you're an
honest feller, and I'll believe in you: jist one word,
captain:I'll help you; I'll fight the dogs for you;
I'll give you weapons. The gal, captain! life and
the fortun', captain!the gal! the gal!
Never, I tell you, never! cried Roland, who,
faithful to the honour and integrity of spirit which
conducted the men of that day, the mighty fathers
of the republic, through the vicissitudes of
revolution
to the rewards of liberty, would not stoop to
the meanness of falsehood and deception, even in
that moment of peril and fear;any thing but
that,but that never!
But, whilst he spoke, Doe, urged on by his own
impetuous feelings, had cut the thong from his
wrists, and was even proceeding to divide those
that bound his ancles, disregarding all his
protestations
and averments, or perhaps drowning them
in his own eager exclamations of, The gal,
captain
,the
word, jist one word! when a dozen or
more savages burst into the hut, and sprang upon
the Virginian, yelling, cursing, and flourishing
their knives and hatchets, as if they would have
torn him to pieces on the spot. And such
undoubtedly
was the aim of some of the younger
men, who struck at him several furious blows, that
were only averted by the older warriors at the
expense of some of their own blood shed in the
struggle, which was, for a moment, as fiercely
waged over the prisoner, as the conflict of enraged
hounds over the body of a disabled panther, that
all are emulous to worry and tear. One instant
of dreadful confusion, of shrieks, blows, and
maledictions
,
and the Virginian was snatched up in the
arms of two or three of the strongest men, and
dragged from the hut; but only to find himself
surrounded
by a herd of villagers, men, women, and
children, who fell upon him with as much fury as
the young warriors had done, beating him with
bludgeons, wounding him with their knives, so that
it seemed impossible the older braves could
protect
him much longer. But others ran to their
assistance
;
and forming a circle around him, so as
to exclude the mob, he was borne onwards, in
temporary security, but destined to a fate to which
murder on the spot would have been gentleness
and mercy.
The tumult had roused Edith also from her
painful slumbers; and the more necessarily, since,
although removed from the tent in which she was
first imprisoned, she was still confined in
Wenonga's
wigwam. It was the scream of the hag, the
chieftain's wife, who had discovered his body,
that first gave the alarm; and the villagers all
rushing to the cabin, and yelling their
astonishment
and terror, there arose an uproar, almost in
her ears, that was better fitted to fright her to
death, than to lull her to repose. She started from
her couch, and, with a woman's weakness,
cowered
away in the furthest corner of the lodge,
to escape the pitiless foes, whom her fears
represented
as already seeking her life. Nor was
this chimera banished from her mind, when a
man, rushing in, snatched her from her
ineffectual
concealment, and hurried her towards the
door. But her terrors ran in another channel,
when the ravisher, conquering the feeble
resistance
she attempted, replied to her wild
entreaties
`not to kill her,' in the well-remembered voice
of Braxley:
Kill you indeed! he muttered, but with
agitated
tones;I come to save you; even
you
are in danger from the maddened villains: they
are murdering all! We must fly,ay, and fast.
My horse is saddled,the woods are openI
will yet save you.
Spare me!for my uncle's sake, who was
your benefactor, spare me! cried Edith,
struggling
to free herself from his grasp. But she
struggled in vain. I struggle to save you,
cried Braxley; and without uttering another word,
bore her from the hut; and, still grasping her
with an arm of iron, sprang upon a saddled
horse,the identical animal that had once
sustained
the weight of the unfortunate Pardon
Dodge,which stood under the elm-tree,
trembling
with fright at the scene of horror then
represented
on the square.
Upon this vacant space was now assembled the
whole population of the village, old and young,
the strong and the feeble, all agitated alike by
those passions, which, when let loose in a mob,
whether civilized or savage, almost enforce the
conviction that there is something essentially
demoniac
in the human character and composition;
as if, indeed, the earth of which man is framed,
had been gathered only after it had been trodden
by the foot of the Prince of Darkness.
Even Edith forgot for a moment her fears of
Braxley,nay, she clung to him for protection,
when her eye fell upon the savage herd, of whom
the chief number were crowded together in the
centre of the square, surrounding some object
rendered invisible by their bodies, while others
were rushing tumultuously hither and thither,
driven
by causes she could not divine, brandishing
weapons, and uttering howls without number.
One large party was passing from the wigwam
itself, their cries not less loud or ferocious than
the others, but changing occasionally into piteous
lamentations. They bore in their arms the body
of the murdered chief,an object of such horror,
that when Edith's eyes had once fallen upon it, it
seemed as if her enthralled spirit would never
have recovered strength to remove them.
But there was a more fearful spectacle yet to
be seen. The wife of Wenonga suddenly rushed
from the lodge, bearing a fire-brand in her hand.
She ran to the body of the chief, eyed it for a
moment, with such a look as a tigress might cast
upon her slaughtered cub; and then, uttering a
scream that was heard over the whole square, and
whirling the brand round her head, until it was
in a flame, fled with frantic speed towards the
centre of the area, the mob parting before her,
and replying to her shrieks, which were uttered
at every step, with outcries scarce less wild and
thrilling. As they parted thus, opening a vista to
the heart of the square, the object which seemed
the centre of attraction to all, was fully revealed
to the maiden's eyes. Chained to two strong posts
near the Council-house, their arms drawn high
above their heads, a circle of brush-wood,
prairie-grass
,
and other combustibles heaped around
them, were two wretched captives,white-men,
from whose persons a dozen savage hands were
tearing their garments, while as many more were
employed heaping additional fuel on the pile. One
of these men, as Edith could see full well, for the
spectacle was scarce an hundred paces removed,
was Roaring Ralph, the captain of horse-thieves.
The otherand
that
was a sight to rend her
eyeballs
from their sockets,was her unfortunate
kinsman,the playmate of her childhood, the
friend and lover of maturer years,her cousin,
brother,her all,Roland Forrester. It was
no error of sight, no delusion of mind; the
spectacle
was too palpable to be doubted: it was
Roland
Forrester whom she saw, chained to the
stake, surrounded by yelling and pitiless
barbarians
,
impatient for the commencement of their
infernal pastime, while the wife of the chief,
kneeling
at the pile, was already endeavouring with
her brand, to kindle it into flame.
The shriek of the wretched maiden, as she
beheld
the deplorable, the maddening sight, might
have melted hearts of stone, had there been even
such among the Indians. But Indians, engaged in
the delights of torturing a prisoner, are, as the
dead chief had boasted himself,
without
heart.
Pity, which the Indian can feel at another
moment
,
as deeply, perhaps, and benignly as a
white-man
,
seems then, and is, entirely unknown, as
much so, indeed, as if it had never entered into
his nature. His mind is then voluntarily given up
to the drunkenness of passion; and cruelty, in its
most atrocious and fiendish character, reigns
predominant
.
The familiar of a Spanish Inquisition
has sometimes moistened the lips of a heretic
stretched upon the rack,the Buccaneer of the
tropics has relented over the contumacious
prisoner
gasping to death under his lashes and heated
pincers; but we know of no instance where an
Indian
,
torturing a prisoner at the stake, the torture
once begun, has ever been moved to
compassionate
,
to regard with any feelings but those of
exultation
and joy, the agonies of the
thrice-wretched
victim.
The shriek of the maiden was unheard, or
unregarded
;
and Braxley,himself so horrified by
the spectacle, that, while pausing to give it a
glance, he forgot the delay was also disclosing it
to Edith,grasping her tighter in his arms, from
which she had half leaped in her phrensy, turned
his horse's head to fly, without seeming to be
regarded
or observed by the savages, which was
perhaps in part owing to his having resumed his
Indian attire. But, as he turned, he could not
resist
the impulse to snatch one more look at his
doomed rival. A universal yell of triumph
sounded
over the square; the flames were already
bursting from the pile, and the torture was begun.
The torture was begun,but it was not destined
long to endure. The yell of triumph was yet
resounding
over the square and awaking responsive
echoes among the surrounding hills, when the
explosion
of at least fifty rifles, sharp, rattling, and
deadly, like the war-note of the rattle-snake,
followed
by a mighty hurrah of Christian voices,
and the galloping of horse into the village from
above, converted the whole scene into one of
amazement and terror. The volley was repeated,
and by as many more guns; and in an instant
there was seen rushing into the square a body of
at least an hundred mounted white-men, their
horses covered with foam and staggering with
exhaustion, yet spurred on by their riders with
furious ardour; while twice as many footmen
were beheld rushing after, in mad rivalry,
cheering
and shouting, in reply to their leader, whose
voice was heard in front of the horsemen,
thundering
out,Small change for the Blue Licks!
Charge 'em, the brutes! give it to 'em
handsome
!
The yells of dismay of the savages, taken thus
by surprise, and, as it seemed, by a greatly
superior
force, whose approach, rapid and
tumultuous
as it must have been, their universal
devotion
to the Saturnalia of blood had rendered them
incapable of perceiving; the shouts of the
mounted
assailants, as they dashed into the square and
among the mob, shooting as they came, or
handling
their rifles like maces and battle-axes; the
trampling and neighing of the horses; and the
thundering hurrahs of the footmen charging into
the town with almost the speed of the horse;
made a din too horrible for description. The
shock of the assault was not resisted by the
Indians
even for a moment. Some rushed to the
neighbouring wigwams for their guns; but the
majority, like the women and children, fled to seek
refuge among the rocks and bushes of the
overhanging
hill; from which, however, as they
approached
it, a deadly volley was shot upon them
by foemen who already occupied its tangled sides.
Others again fled towards the meadows and
cornfields
,
where, in like manner, they were
intercepted
by bands of mounted Long-knives, who
seemed
pouring into the valley from every hill. In
short, it was soon made apparent that the village
of the Black-Vulture was assailed from all sides,
VOL. II.19
and by such an army of avenging white-men as
had never before penetrated into the Indian
territory
.
All the savages,all, at least, who were not
shot or struck down in the square,fled from the
village; and among the foremost of them was
Braxley, who, as much astounded as his Indian
confederates, but better prepared for flight, struck
the spurs into his horse, and still retaining his
helpless prize, dashed across the river, to escape
as he might.
In the meanwhile, the victims at the stake,
though roused to hope and life by the sudden
appearance
of their countrymen, were neither
released
from bonds nor perils. Though the
savages
fled, as described, from the charge of the
white-men, there were some who remembered the
prisoners, and were resolved that they should
never taste the sweets of liberty. The beldam,
who was still busy kindling the pile, roused from
her toil by the shouts of the enemy and the shrieks
of her flying people, looked up a moment; and
then snatching at a knife dropped by some
fugitive
,
rushed upon Stackpole, who was nearest her,
with a wild scream of revenge. The horse-thief,
avoiding the blow as well as he could, saluted the
hag with a furious kick, his feet being entirely at
liberty; and such was its violence that the woman
was tossed into the air, as if from the horns of a
bull, and then fell, stunned and apparently lifeless,
to perish in the flames she had kindled with her
own breath.
A tall warrior, hatchet in hand, with a dozen
more at his back, rushed upon the Virginian. But
before he could strike, there came leaping with
astonishing bounds over the bodies of the
wounded
and dying, and into the circle of fire, a
figure that might have filled a better and braver
warrior with dread. It was the medicine-man,
and former captive, the Indian habiliments and
paint still on his body and visage, though both
were flecked and begrimed with blood. In his
left hand was a bundle of scalps, the same he had
taken from the tent of Wenonga; the grizzled
scalp-lock of the chief, known by the vulture
feathers
,
beak, and talons, still attached to it, was
hanging to his girdle; while the steel battle-axe
so often wielded by Wenonga, was gleaming aloft
in his right hand.
The savage recoiled, and with loud yells of
The Jibbenainosay! the Jibbenainosay! turned
to fly, while even those behind him staggered back
at the apparition of the destroyer, thus tangibly
presented to their eyes;nor was their awe
lessened
,
when the supposed fiend, taking one step after
the retreating leader of the gang, drove the fatal
hatchet into his brain, with as lusty a whoop of
victory as ever came from the lungs of a warrior.
At the same moment, he was hidden from their
eyes by a dozen horsemen that came rushing up,
with tremendous huzzas, some darting against
the band, while others sprung from their horses
to liberate the prisoners. But this duty had been
already rendered, at least in the case of Captain
Forrester. The axe of Wenonga, dripping with
blood to the hilt, divided the rope at a single blow;
and then Roland's fingers were crushed in the
grasp of his preserver, as the latter exclaimed,
with a strange, half-frantic chuckle of triumph
and delight,
Thee sees, friend! Thee thought I had
deserted
thee? Truly, truly, thee was mistaken!
Hurrah for old Bloody Nathan! I'll never say
Q to a quaker agin, as long as I live! exclaimed
another voice, broken, feeble, and vainly aiming
to raise a huzza; and the speaker, seizing Nathan
with one hand, while the other grasped
tremulously
at Captain Forrester's, displayed to the
latter's
eyes the visage of Tom Bruce the younger,
pale, sickly, emaciated, his once gigantic
proportions
wasted away, and his whole appearance
indicating
any thing but fitness for a field of battle.
Strannger! cried the youth, pressing the
soldier's
hand with what strength he could, and
laughing faintly, we 've done the handsome
thing by you, me and dad, thar's no denying! But
we went your security agin all sorts of danngers,
in our beat; and thar's just the occasion. But
h'yar's dad to speak for himself: as for me I rather
think breath's too short for wasting.
Hurrah for Kentucky! roared the Colonel of
the Station, as he sprang from his horse, and
seized
the hand his son had released, wringing and
twisting it with a fury of friendship and
gratulation
,
which, at another moment, would have
caused
the soldier to grin with pain. H'yar we are,
captain! he cried; picked you out of the
yambers
!Swore
to foller you and young madam to
the end of creation,beat up for recruits, sung
out `Blue Lick' to the people, roused the General
from the Falls,whole army, a thousand men:
double quick-step;found Bloody Nathan in the
woodswhar's the creatur'? told of your fixin';
beat to arms, flew ahead, licked the enemy,and
ha'n't we exterminated 'em?
With these hurried, half incoherent expressions,
the gallant Kentuckian explained, or endeavoured
to explain, the mystery of his timely and most
happy appearance; an explanation, however, of
which the soldier, bewildered by the whirl of
events, the tumult of his own feelings, and not
less by the uproareous congratulations of his
friends, of whom the captain of horse-thieves,
released
from his post of danger, was not the least
noisy or affectionate, heard, or understood, not a
word. To these causes of confusion were to be
added the din and tumult of conflict, the screams
of the flying Indians and the shouts of pursuing
and opposing white-men, rising from every point
of the compass; for from every point they seemed
rushing in upon the foe, whom they appeared to
have completely environed. Was there no other
cause for the distraction of mind which left the
young soldier, while thus beset by friendly hands
and voices, incapable of giving them his whole
attention? His thoughts were upon his
kinswoman
,
of whose fate he was still in ignorance.
But before he could ask the question prompted by
his anxieties, it was answered by a cheery
hurrah
from Bruce's youngest son, Richard, who
came galloping into the square and up to the place
of torture, whirling his cap into the air, in a phrensy
of boyish triumph and rapture. At his heels, and
mounted upon the steed so lately bestridden by
Braxley, the very animal, which, notwithstanding
its uncommon swimming virtues, had left its
master
,
Pardon Dodge at the bottom of Salt River,
wascould Roland believe his eyes?the
identical
Pardon Dodge himself, looking a hero, he was
so begrimed with blood and gunpowder, and
whooping and hurrahing, as he came, with as much
spirit as if he had been born on the border, and
accustomed all his life to fighting Indians. But
Roland did not admire long at the unlooked-for
resurrection of his old ally of the ruin. In his
arms, sustained with an air of infinite pride and
exultation, was an apparition that blinded the
Virginian's
eyes to every other object;it was
19*
Edith Forrester; who, extending her own arms,
as the soldier sprang to meet her, leaped to his
embrace with such wild cries of delight, such
abandonment of spirit to love and happiness, as
stirred up many a womanish emotion in the breast
of the surrounding Kentuckians.
There! cried Dodge, there, capting! Seed
the everlasting Injun feller carrying her off on the
hoss; knowed the crittur at first sight; took atter,
and brought the feller to: seed it was the young
lady, and was jist as glad to find her as to find my
hoss,if I wa' n't, it a'n't no matter.
Thar, dad! cried Tom Bruce, grasping his
father's arm, and pointing, but with unsteady
finger, and glistening eye, at the two cousins,
that, that's a sight worth dying for! with which
words, he fell suddenly to the earth.
Dying, you brute! cried the father, in surprise
and concern: you ar'n't had a hit, Tom?
Not an iota, replied the youth, faintly, except
them etarnal slugs I fetched from old Salt; but, I
reckon, they've done for me: I felt 'em a dropping,
a dropping inside, all night. And so, father, if
you'll jist say I've done as much as my duty, I'll
not make no fuss about going.
Going, you brute! iterated the father, clasping
the hand of his son, while the others, startled by
the young man's sudden fall, gathered around, to
offer help, or to gaze with alarm on his fast
changing countenance; why, Tom, my boy, you
don't mean to make a die of it?
Ifif you think I've done my duty to the
strannger
and the young lady, said the young man; and
added, feebly pressing the father's hand,and to
you
, dad,to you and mother, and the rest of
'em.
You have, Tom, said the colonel, with
somewhat
a husky voice,to the travelling strannger,
to mother, father, and all.
And to Kentucky? murmured the dying
youth.
To Kentucky, replied the father.
Well, then, it's no great matterYou'll jist
put Dick in my place: he's the true grit; thar'll be
no mistake in Dick, for all he's only a young
blubbering
boy; and then it'll be jist all right, as
before
.
And it's my notion, father
Well, Tom, what is it? demanded Bruce, as
the young man paused, as if from mingled
exhaustion
and hesitation.
I don't mean no offence, father, said he,
but it's my notion, if you'll never let a poor
traveller go into the woods without some
dependable
body to take care of him
You're right, Tom; and I an't mad at you for
saying so; and I won't.
And don't let the boys abuse Bloody Nathan,
for, I reckon, he'll fight, if you let him take it in
his own way.And,and, father, don't mind
captain
Ralph's stealing a hoss or two out of our
pound!
He may steal the lot of 'em, the villian! said
Bruce, shaking his head to dislodge the tears that
were starting in his eyes; and he shall be none
the wuss of it.
Well, father,-- the young man spoke with
greater animation, and with apparently reviving
strength,and you think we have pretty
considerably
licked the Injuns h'yar, jist now?
We have, Tom,thar's no doubting it. And
we'll lick'em over and over again, till they've had
enough of it.
Hurrah for Kentucky! cried the young man,
exerting his remaining strength to give energy to
the cry, so often uplifted, in succeeding years,
among the wild woodlands around. It was the
last effort of his sinking powers. He fell back,
pressed his father's and his brother's hands, and
almost immediately expired,a victim not so much
of his wounds, which were not in themselves
necessarily
fatal, nor perhaps even dangerous, had
they been attended to, as of the heroic efforts, so
overpowering and destructive in his disabled
condition
,
which he had made to repair his father's
fault; for such he evidently esteemed the
dismissing
the travellers from the Station, without
sufficient
guides and protection.
CHAPTER XVII.
Thus
fell the young Kentuckian,a youth
endeared
to all who knew him, by his courage and
good humour; and whose fall would, at a moment
of less confusion, have created a deep and
melancholy
sensation. But he fell amid the roar and
tempest of battle, when there was occasion for
other thoughts and other feelings than those of
mere individual grief.
The Indians had been driven from their village
as described, aiming not to fight but to fly; but
being intercepted at all points by the assailants,
and met, here by furious volleys poured from the
bushy sides of the hill, there by charges of
horsemen
,
galloping through the meadows and
cornfields
,
they were again driven back into the town,
where, in sheer desperation, they turned upon their
foes to sell their lives as dearly as they might.
They were met at the edge of the village by the
party of horse and footmen that had first dislodged
them, with whom, being driven pell-mell among
them by the shock of the intercepting bands, they
waged a fierce and bloody, but brief conflict; and
still urged onwards by the assailants behind,
fought their way back to the square, which,
deserted
almost entirely at the period of young
Bruce's fall, was now suddenly seen, as he drew
his last gasp, scattered over with groups of men
flying for their lives, or struggling together in
mortal combat; while the screams of terror-struck
women and children gave a double horror to the
din.
The return of the battle to their own immediate
vicinity produced its effects upon the few who had
remained by the dying youth. It fired, in especial,
the blood of Captain Ralph, who, snatching up a
fallen axe, rushed towards the nearest combatants,
roaring, by way of consolation, or sympathy, to the
bereaved father, Don't take it hard, Cunnel,I'll
have a scalp for Tom's sake, in no time! As for
Bloody Nathan, he had disappeared long before,
with most of the horsemen, who had galloped up
to the stake with the younger Bruce and his father,
being evidently too fiercely excited to remain idle
any longer. The father and brother of the
deceased
,
the two cousins, and Pardon Dodge, who
lingered by the latter, still on his horse, as if old
companionship with the soldier, and the service
just rendered the maid, had attached him to all
their interests, were all that remained on the spot.
But all were driven from a contemplation of the
dead, as the surge of battle again tossed its bloody
spray into the square.
Thar's no time for weeping, muttered Bruce,
softly laying the body of the youth (for Tom had
expired in his arms,) upon the earth: he died like
a man, and thar's the eend of it.Up, Dick, and
stand by the ladyThar's more work for us.
Everlasting bad work, Cunnel! cried Dodge;
they're a killing the squaws! hark, dunt you
hear 'em squeaking? Now, cunnel, I can kill
your tarnal
man
fellers, for they've riz my
ebenezer
,
and I've kinder got my hand in; but, I
rather calkilate, I han't no disposition to kill
wimming
!
Close round the lady! shouted Bruce, as a
sudden movement in the mass of combatants, and
the parting from it of a dozen or more wild
Indian
figures, flying in their confusion, for they
were pursued by thrice their number of
white-men
,
right towards the little party at the stake,
threatened the latter with unexpected danger.
I'm the feller for 'em, now that my hand's in!
cried Pardon Dodge; and taking aim with his
rifle,the only one in the group that was charged,
at the foremost of the Indians, he shot him dead
on the spot,a feat that instantly removed all
danger from the party; for the savages, yelling at
the fall of their leader, and the discovery of
antagonists
thus drawn up in front, darted off to the
right hand at the wildest speed, as wildly pursued
by the greater number of Kentuckians.
And now it was, that, as the wretched and
defeated
barbarians, scattering at Dodge's fire, fled
from the spot, the party at the stake beheld a
sight well fitted to turn the alarm they had for a
moment felt on their own account, into horror and
pity. The savage shot down by Dodge was
instantly
scalped by one of the pursuers, of whom
five or six others rushed upon another manfor a
second of the fugitives had fallen at the same
moment
,
but only wounded,attacking him furiously
with knives and hatchets, while the poor wretch
was seen with raised arms vainly beseeching for
quarter. As if this spectacle was not in itself
sufficiently pitiable, there was seen a girlish figure
at the man's side, struggling with the assailants,
as if to throw herself between them and their
prey, and uttering the most heart-piercing shrieks.
It is Telie Doe! shouted Forrester, leaping
from his kinswoman's side, and rushing with the
speed of light, to her assistance.He was followed,
at almost as fleet a step, by colonel Bruce, who
recognised the voice at the same instant, and
knew, by the ferocious cries of the men,Kill
the cursed tory! kill the renegade villain! that it
was the girl's apostate father, Abel Doe, who was
dying under their vengeful weapons.
Hold, friends, hold! cried Roland, as he sprang
amid the infuriated Kentuckians. His interposition
was for a moment successful: surprise arrested
the impending weapons; and Doe, taking
advantage
of the pause, leaped to his feet, ran a few
yards, and then fell again to the ground.
No quarter for turn-coats and traitors! no
mercy for white Injuns! cried the angry men,
running again at their prey. But Roland was
before
them; and as he bestrode the wounded man,
the gigantic Bruce rushed up, and catching the
phrensied daughter in his arms, exclaimed, with
tones of thunder, Off, you perditioned brutes!
would you kill the man before the eyes of his own
natteral-born daughter? Kill Injuns, you brutes,
thar's the meat for you!
Hurrah for cunnel Tom Bruce! shouted the
men in reply; and satisfying their rage with
direful
execrations, invoked upon all white Injuns
and Injun white-men, they rushed away in
pursuit
of more legitimate objects of hostility, if such
were still to be found,a thing not so certain, for
few Indian whoops were now mingled with the
white-man's cry of victory.
In the meanwhile, Roland had endeavoured to
raise the bleeding and mangled renegade to his
feet; but in vain, though assisted by the efforts of
the unhappy wretch himself; who, raising his
hands, as if still to avert the blows of an
unrelenting
enemy, ejaculated wildly,It a'n't nothing,
it's only for the galDon't murder a father
before
his own child!
You are safe,fear nothing, said Roland
and at the same moment, poor Telie herself
rushed
into the dying man's arms, crying, with tones
that went to the Virginian's heart,They're
gone, father, they're gone!Now get up, father,
and they won't hurt you no more: the good
captain
has saved you, father; they won't hurt you,
they won't hurt you no more!
Is it the captain? cried Doe, struggling again
to rise, while Bruce drew the girl gently from his
arms; Is it the captain? he repeated, bending
his eager looks and countenance ghastly with
wounds upon the Virginian. They han't
murdered
you then? I'm glad on it, captain;I'll
die the easier, captain! And the gal too? he
exclaimed, as his eyes fell upon Edith, who scarce
knowing in her horror what she did, but
instinctively
seeking the protection of her kinsman, had
crept up to the group now around the dying
wretchIt's all right, captain!But where 's
Dick? where's Dick Braxley? You han't killed
him among you?
Think not of the villain, said Roland: I
know naught of him.
I'm a dying man, captain, exclaimed Doe;
I know'd this would be the end of it. If Dick's
a prisoner, jist bring him up and let me speak
with him. It will be for your good, captain.
I know nothing of the scoundrelThink of
yourself, said the Virginian.
Why, there, don't I see his red han'kercher!
cried Doe, pointing to Dodge, who from his horse,
which he had not yet deserted, perhaps, from fear
of again losing him, sat looking with soldier-like
composure on the expiring renegade, until made
conscious that the shawl which he had tied round
his waist somewhat in manner of an officer's sash,
VOL. II.20
had become an object of interest to Doe and all
others present.
I took it from the Injun feller, said he, with
great self-complacency, the everlasting big
rascal
that was a carrying off madam on my own
hoss, and madam was jist as dead as a piece of
rock. I know'd the crittur, and sung out to the
feller to stop, and he would 'nt; and so I jist
blazed
away at him, right bang at his back,knocked
him over jist like a streak o' lightening, and had
the scalp off his 'tarnal ugly head, afore you could
say John Robinson!and all the while, madam
was jist as dead as a piece of rock. Here's the
top-knot, and an ugly dirty top-knot it is! With
which words, the valiant Dodge displayed his
trophy, a scalp of black hair, yet reeking with
blood.
A shiver passed through Edith's frame, she
grasped her cousin's arm to avoid falling, and
with a countenance as white and ghastly as
countenance
could be, exclaimed,
It was Braxley!It was he carried me off
But I knew nothingIt was he! Yes, it was
he!
It war'n't a white-man? cried Dodge,
dropping
his prize in dismay; while even Roland
staggered with horror at the thought of a fate so
sudden and dreadful overtaking his rival and
enemy.
Ha, ha! cried the renegade, with a
hideous
attempt at laughter; I told Dick the devil
would have us; but I had no idea Dick would be
the first afore him! Shot,scalpedsarved like
a mere dog of an Injun! Well, the game's up
at last, and we've both made our fortun's!
Captain
,
I've been a rascal all my life, and I die no
better. You would 'nt take my offer, captain
It's no matter. He fumbled in his breast; and
presently drew to light the will, with which he so
vainly strove the preceding night to effect his
object
with Roland: it was stained deeply with his
blood. Take it, captain, he cried, take it; I
give it to you without axing tarms: I leave it to
yourself, captain. But you'll remember her,
captain
?
The gal, captain! the gal! I leave it to
yourself
She shall never want friend or protector,
said Roland.
Captain, murmured the renegade with his
last breath, and grasping the soldier's hand with
his last convulsive effortyou 're an honest
feller
:
I'llyes, captain, I'll trust you!
These were the renegade's last words; and
before
Bruce, who muttered, half in reproach, half
in kindness, The gal never wanted friend or
protector
,
till she fled from me, who was as a father
to her, could draw the sobbing daughter away,
the wretched instrument of a still more wretched
principal in villany had followed his employer to
his last account.
In the meanwhile, the struggle was over, the
battle was fought and won. The army,for such
it was, being commanded in person by the hero of
Kaskaskias,
[2]
[2]
Gen. George Rogers Clark.
the great protector, and almost
founder of the West,summoned in haste to
avenge the slaughter at the Blue Licksa
lamentable
disaster, to which we have several times
alluded, although it was foreign to our purpose to
venture more than an allusion,and conducted
with unexampled speed against the Indian towns
on the Miami, had struck a blow which was
destined
long to be remembered by the Indians, thus
for the first time assailed in their own territory.
Consisting of volunteers well acquainted with the
woods, all well mounted and otherwise equipt, all
familiar with battle, and all burning for revenge,
it had reached within but ten or twelves miles of
Wenonga's town, and within still fewer of a
smaller village, which it was the object of the
troops first to attack, at sunset of the previous
day, and encamped in the woods to allow man
and horse, both well nigh exhausted, a few hours
refreshment, previous to marching upon the
neighbouring
village; when Nathan, flying with the
scalp and arms of Wenonga in his hand, and
looking
more like an infuriated madman than the
inoffensive
man of peace he had been so long
esteemed
,
suddenly appeared amidst the vanguard,
commanded by the gallant Bruce, whom he
instantly
apprised of the condition of the captives
at Wenonga's town, and urged to attempt their
deliverance.
This was done, and with an effect which has
been already seen. The impetuosity of Bruce's
men, doubly inflamed by the example of the
father
and his eldest son, to whom the rescue of their
late guests was an object of scarce inferior
magnitude
even compared with the vengeance for
which they burned in common with all others, had
in some measure defeated the hopes of the
General
,
who sought, by a proper disposition of his
forces, completely to invest the Indian village, so
as to insure the destruction or capture of every
inhabitant. As it was, however, very few
escaped
;
many were killed, and more, including all the
women and children, (who, honest Dodge's
misgivings
to the contrary notwithstanding, were in
no instance designedly injured) taken prisoners.
And this, too, at an expense of but very few lives
lost on the part of the victors; the Indians
attempting
resistance only when the fall of more
than half their numbers, and the presence of foes
on every side, convinced them that flight was
wholly impracticable.
The victory was, indeed, so complete, andas
it appeared that several bands of warriors from
more distant villages were in the town at the time
of attackthe blow inflicted upon the tribe so
much severer than was anticipated even from a
series of attacks upon several different towns, as
was at first designed, that the victors, satisfied that
they had done enough to convince the red-man of
the irresistible superiority of the Long-knife,
satisfied
,
too, perhaps, that the cheapness of the
victory
rendered it more valuable than a greater
triumph achieved at a greater loss, gave up at
once their original design of carrying the war
into other villages, and resolved to retrace their
march to the Settlements.
But the triumph was not completed, until the
village
,
with its fields of standing corn, had been
entirely
destroyeda work of cruel vengeance, yet
not so much of vengeance as of policy; since the
destruction of their fields, by driving the savages
to seek a winter's subsistence for their families in
the forest, necessarily prevented their making
warlike inroads upon their white neighbours,
during
that season. The maize-stalks, accordingly,
soon fell before the knives and hatchets of the
Kentuckians; while the wigwams were given to
the flames. When the last of the rude habitations
had fallen, crashing, to the earth, the victors
began
their retreat towards the frontier; so that
within a very few hours after they first appeared,
as if bursting from the earth, amid the amazed
barbarians, nothing remained upon the place of
20*
conflict and site of a populous village, save
scattered
ruins and mangled corses.
Their own dead the invaders bore to a
distance
,
and interred in the deepest dens of the
forest
;
and then, with their prisoners, carried with
them as the surest means of inducing the tribe to
beg for peace, in order to effect their
deliverance
,
they resumed the path, which, in good
time, led them again to the Settlements.
CHAPTER XVIII.
With
the battle at the Black-Vulture's town, the
interest of our story ceases; and there it may be
said to have its end. The deliverance of the
cousins
,
the one from captivity and death, the other
from a fate to her more dreadful than death; the
restoration of the will of their uncle; and the fall of
the daring and unprincipled villain, to whose
machinations
they owed all their calamities, had
changed the current of their fortunes, which was
now to flow in a channel where the eye could no
longer trace obstructions. The last peal of
thunder
had dissipated the clouds of adversity, and the
star of their destiny shone out with all its
original
lustre. The future was no longer one of
mere hope; it presented all the certainty of
happiness
of which human existence is capable.
Such being the case, and our story having
actually
arrived at its end, it would be a superfluous
and unprofitable task to pursue it further, were it
not that other individuals, whose interests were so
long intermingled with those of the cousins, have
a claim upon our notice.And first, before
speaking
of the most important of all, the warlike man
of peace, the man-slaying hater of blood, the
redoubtable
Nathan Slaughter,let us bestow a word
upon honest Pardon Dodge, whose sudden
re-appearance
on the stage of life so greatly astonished
the young Virginian.
This resuscitation, however, as explained by
Dodge himself, was, after all, no such wonderful
matter. Swept from his horse by the violence of
the flood, in the memorable flight from the ruin, a
happy accident had flung him upon the raft of
timber, that bordered the fatal
chute;
where, not
doubting that, from the fury of the current, all
his companions had perished, and that he was left
to contend alone against the savages, he
immediately
sought a concealment among the logs, in
which he remained during the remainder of the
night and the greater part of the following day, until
pretty well assured the Indians were no longer in
his vicinity. Then, scaling the cliffy banks of the
river, and creeping through the woods, it was his
good fortune at last to stumble upon the clearings
around Bruce's Station, at which he arrived soon
after the defeated Regulators had effected their
return
.
Here,having now lost his horse, arms,
every thing but life, having battled away also in
the midnight siege some of those terrors that made
Indians and border life so hateful to his
imagination
,
and being perhaps seduced by the hope of
repairing
his losses and revenging the injuries he had
suffered, he was easily persuaded to follow Colonel
Bruce, and the army of Kentuckians, to the Indian
territory, where Fate, through his arm, struck a
blow so dreadfully yet retributively just, at the
head of the long-prospering villain, the
unprincipled
and unremorseful Braxley.
It was mentioned, that when Nathan first burst
upon the astonished Bruce, where he lay with his
vanguard, encamped in the woods, his appearance
and demeanour were rather those of a truculent
madman, than of the simple-minded, inoffensive
creature he had so long appeared to the eyes of
all who knew him. His Indian garments and
decorations
contributed somewhat to this effect; but
the man, it was soon seen, was more changed in
spirit than in outward attire. The bundle of scalps
in his hand, the single one, yet reeking with blood,
at his belt, and the axe of Wenonga, gory to the
helve, and grasped with a hand not less
blood-stained
,
were not more remarkable evidences of
transformation than were manifested in his
countenance
,
deportment, and expressions. His eye
beamed with a wild excitement, with exultation
mingled with fury: his step was fierce, active,
firm, and elastic, like that of a warrior leaping
through the measures of the war-dance; and
when he spoke, his words were of battle and
bloodshed. He flourished the axe of Wenonga,
pointed grimly toward the village, and while
recounting
the number of warriors who lay therein
waiting to be knocked on the head, he seemed,
judging his thoughts from his gestures, to be
employed
in imagination in despatching them with
his own hands.
When the march, after a hasty consultation,
was agreed upon and resumed, he, although on
foot, maintained a position at the head of the
army, guiding it along with a readiness and
precision
which argued extraordinary familiarity
with all the approaches to the village; and when
the assault was actually commenced, he was still
among the foremost, as the reader has seen, to
enter the village and the square. To cut the
bonds of the Virginian, and utter a fervent
expression
of delight at his rescue, was not enough
to end the ferment in Nathan's mind. Leaving
the Virginian immediately to the protection of the
younger Bruce, he rushed after the flying Indians,
among whom he remained fighting wherever the
conflict was hottest, until there remained no more
enemies to encounter, achieving such exploits as
filled all who beheld him with admiration and
amazement.
Nor did the fervour of his fury end altogether
even with the battle. He was among the most
zealous in destroying the Indian village, applying
the fire with his own hands to at least a dozen
different
wigwams, shouting with the most savage
exultation, as each burst into flames.
It was not indeed until the work of destruction
was completed, the retreat commenced, and the
army once more buried in the woods, that the
demon
which had thus taken possession of his spirit,
seemed inclined to relax its hold, and restore him
once more to his wits. It was then, however, that
the remarks which all had now leisure to make
on his extraordinary transformation, the mingled
jests and commendations of which he found
himself
the theme, began to make an impression on
his mind, and gradually wake him as from a
dream that had long mastered and distracted his
faculties. The fire of military enthusiasm flashed
no more from his eyes, his step lost its bold spring
and confidence, he eyed those who so liberally
heaped praise on his lately acquired courage and
heroic actions, with uneasiness, embarrassment,
and dismay; and cast his troubled eyes around,
as if in search of some friend capable of giving
counsel and comfort in such case made and
provided
.
His looks fell upon little Peter, who had
kept ever at his side from the moment of his
escape
from the village, and now trotted along with
the deferential humility which became him, while
surrounded by so gallant and numerous an
assemblage
;
but even little Peter could not relieve him
from the weight of eulogy heaped on his head, nor
from the prickings of the conscience, while every
word of praise and every encomiastic huzza
seemed
stirring up his breast.
In this exigency, he caught sight of the
Virginian
,mounted
once more upon his own trusty
Briareus, which the younger Bruce had brought
with him to the field of battle,and remembered
on the sudden that he had not yet made him
acquainted
with the important discovery of the will,
which he had so unexpectedly made in the village.
The young soldier was riding side by side with his
cousin, for whom a palfry had been easily
provided
from the Indian pound, and indulging with her
many a joyous feeling that their deliverance was
so well suited to inspire; but his eye gleamed with
double satisfaction, as he marked the approach of
his trusty associate and deliverer.
We owe you life, fortune, every thing, he
cried, extending his hand; and be assured neither
Edith nor myself will forget itBut how is this,
Nathan? he added, with a smile, as he perceived
the bundle of scalps, which Nathan, in the
confusion
or absence of his mind, yet dangled in his
hands,you were not used so freely to display
the proofs of your prowess!
Friend, said Nathan, giving one look, ghastly
with sorrow and perturbation, to the shaking
ringlets
,
another to the youth, thee looks upon locks
that was once on the heads of my children!He
thrust the bundle into his bosom, and pointed with
a look of inexpressible triumph to that of Wenonga,
hanging to his belt. And here, he muttered, is
the scalp of him that slew them!It is enough,
friend: thee has had my story,thee will not
censure
me.But, friend, he added, hastily, as if
anxious to revert to another subject; I have a
thing to say to thee, which it concerns thee, and
the fair maid, thee cousin, to know. There was a
will, friend,a true and lawful last will and
testament
of thee deceased uncle, in which theeself and
thee cousin was made the sole heirs of the same.
Truly, friend, I did take it from the breast of the
villain that plotted thee ruin; but, truly, it was taken
from me again, I know not how.
I have it safe, said Roland, displaying it for
a moment, with great satisfaction, to Nathan's
eyes. It makes me master of wealth, which
you, Nathan, shall be the first to share. You must
leave this wild life of the border, go with me to
Virginia,
I, friend! exclaimed Nathan, with a
melancholy
shake of the head; thee would not have
me back in the Settlements, to scandalize them
that is of my faith? No, friend; my lot is cast
in the woods, and thee must not ask me again to
leave them. And friend, thee must not think I
have served thee for the lucre of money or gain:
for, truly, these things is now to me as nothing.
The meat that feeds me, the skins that cover, the
leaves that make my bed, are all in the forest
around me, to be mine when I want them; and
what more can I desire? Yet, friend, if thee
thinks theeself obliged by whatever I have done
for thee, I would ask of thee one favour, that thee
can grant.
An hundred! said the Virginian, warmly.
Nay, friend, muttered Nathan, with both a
warning and beseeching look, all that I ask is,
that thee shall say nothing of me that should
scandalize
and disparage the faith to which I was
born.
I understand you, said Roland, and will
remember
your wish.
And now, friend, continued Nathan, do thee
take theeself to the haunts of thee fellows, the
habitations
of them that is honest and peaceful,
thee, and the good maiden, thee cousin; for, truly,
it is not well, neither for thee nor for her,and
especially for her, that is feeble and fearful,to
dwell nigh to where murdering Injuns abound.
Yet go with us, good Nathan, said Edith,
adding her voice to the entreaties of her
kinsman
:
there shall be none to abuse or find fault
with you.
Thee is a good maid, said Nathan,
surveying
her with an interest that became mournful as
he spoke. When thee goes back to thee father's
house, thee will find them that will gladden at thee
coming,and hearts will yearn with joy over thee
young and lovely looks. Thee will smile upon
them, and they will be happy.Such, he added,
with deep emotion, such might have been
my
fate, had the Injun axe spared me but a single
child. But it is not so; there is none left to
look upon me with smiles and rejoicing,none to
welcome me from the field and the forest with the
voice of loveno, truly, truly,--there is not one,
not one. And as he spoke, his voice faltered,
his lip quivered, and his whole countenance
betrayed
the workings of a bereaved and mourning
spirit.
Think not of this, said Roland, deeply
affected
,
as well as his cousin, by this unexpected
display of feeling in the rude wanderer; the
gratitude
of those you have so well served, shall be
to you in place of a child's affection. We will
never forget our obligations. Come with us,
Nathan
,come
with us.
But Nathan, ashamed of the weakness which he
could not resist, had turned away to conceal his
emotion; and stalking silently off, with the
everfaithful
VOL. II.21
Peter at his heels, was soon hidden from
their eyes.
I will find some way yet to bring him round,
said Roland. A braver heart, a truer friend,
never served man in time of need. I shall never
enjoy ease of mind, if I find not some way to
reward
him; and some way I will.
But the Virginian never saw his wild comrade
again. Neither Nathan's habits nor inclinations
carried him often into the society of his
fellowmen
,
where reproaches and abuse were sure to
meet him. Insult and contumely were, indeed, no
longer to be dreaded by the unresisting
wanderer
,
after the extraordinary proofs of courage
which he had that day given. But, apparently,
he now found as little to relish in encomiums
passed
on his valour as in the invectives to which he
had been formerly exposed. He stole away,
therefore, into the woods, abandoning the army
altogether, and was no more seen during the
march.
But Roland did not doubt he should behold him
again at Bruce's Station, where he soon found
himself, with his kinswoman, in safety; and
where,now happily able to return to the land
of his birth and the home of his ancestors,he
remained during a space of two or three weeks,
waiting the arrival of a strong band of Virginia
rangers, who, (their term of military service on
the frontier having expired,) were on the eve of
returning to Virginia, and with whom he designed
seeking protection for his own little party. During
all this period he impatiently awaited the
re-appearance
of Nathan, but in vain; and as he was
informed, and indeed, from Nathan's own
admissions
,
knew, that the latter had no fixed place of
abode, he saw that it was equally vain to attempt
hunting him up in the forest. In short, he was
compelled to depart on his homeward journey,a
journey happily accomplished in safety,without
again seeing him; but not until he had left with
the commander of the Station a goodly store
of such articles of comfort and necessity as he
thought would prove acceptable to his solitary
friend.
Nor did he depart without making others of his
late associates acquainted with his bounty. The
pledge he had given the dying renegade, he offered
to redeem to the daughter, by bearing her with
him to Virginia, and providing her a secure
home, under the protection of his cousin; and
Telie preferring rather to remain in the family of
colonel Bruce, who seemed to entertain for her a
truly parental affection, he took such steps as
speedily converted the poor dependent orphan into
a person of almost wealth and consequence. His
bounty-grants and land-warrants he left in the
hands of Bruce, with instructions to locate them to
the best advantage in favour of the girl, to whom
he assigned them with the proper legal formalities;
a few hundred acres, however, being conveyed to
captain Ralph, and the worthy Dodge,of whom
the latter had given over all thought of returning
to the Bay-state, having, as he said, `got his hand
in to killing Injuns, and not caring a four-pence
ha'penny for the whole everlasting set of them.'
Thus settling up his accounts of gratitude, he
joyously, and with Edith still more joyous at his
side, turned his face towards the East and
Virginia
,towards
Fell-hallow and home; to enjoy
a fortune of happiness, to which the memory of
the few weeks of anguish and gloom passed in the
desert, only served to impart additional zest.
Nor did he, even in the tranquil life of
enjoyment
which he was now enabled to lead, lose his
interest in the individuals who had shared his perils
and sufferings. His inquiries, made wherever, and
whenever, intelligence could be obtained, were
continued for many years, until, in fact, the
District
and Wilderness of Kentucky existed no more,
but were both merged in a State, too great and
powerful to be longer exposed to the inroads of
savages. The information which he was able to
glean in relation to the several parties, was,
however
,
uncertain and defective, the means of
intelligence
being, at that early period, far from
satisfactory
:
but such as it was, we hasten to lay it
before the reader.
The worthy colonel Bruce continued to live and
flourish with his Station, which soon grew into a
town of considerable note. The colonel himself,
when last heard from, was no longer a colonel,
his good stars, his military services, and perhaps
the fervent prayers of his wife, having transformed
him, one happy day, into a gallant Brigadier. His
son Dick trode in the footsteps, and grew into the
likeness of his brother Tom, being as brave and
good-humoured, and far more fortunate; and
Roland
heard, a few years after his own departure
from Kentucky, with much satisfaction, that the
youth was busily occupied, during such intervals
of peace as the Indians allowed, in clearing and
cultivating the lands bestowed on Telie Doe, whom
he had, though scarce yet out of his teens, taken
to wife.
No very certain information was ever obtained
in regard to the fate of Pardon Dodge; but there
was every reason to suppose he remained in
Kentucky
,
fighting Indians to the last, having got so
accustomed to that species of pastime, as to feel
easy while practising it. We are the more
inclined
to think that such was the case, as the name
is not yet extinct on the frontier, and one
individual
bearing it, has very recently, in one of the
fiercest, though briefest of Indian wars, covered
it with immortal lustre.
Of Ralph Stackpole, the invader of Indian
horse-pounds, it was Captain Forrester's fortune
to obtain more minute, though, we are sorry to
say, scarce more satisfactory intelligence. The
luck, good and bad together, which had
distinguished
Roaring Ralph in all his relations with
Roland, never, it seems, entirely deserted him.
His improvident, harum-scarum habits had very
soon deprived him of all the advantages that
might have resulted from the soldier's munificent
gift, and left him a landless, good-for-nothing,
yet contented, vagabond as before. With poverty,
returned sundry peculiar propensities, which he
had manifested in former days; so that Ralph
again lost savour in the nostrils of his
acquaintance
;
and the last time that Forrester heard of
him, he had got into a difficulty, in some respects
similar to that in the woods of Salt River, from
which Roland, at Edith's intercession, had saved
him. In a word, he was one day arraigned before
a county-court in Kentucky, on a charge of
horse-stealing
,
and matters went hard against him, his
many offences in that line having steeled the
hearts of all against him, and the proofs of guilt
in this particular instance, being both strong and
manifold. Many an angry and unpitying eye was
bent upon the unfortunate fellow, when his
counsel
rose to attempt a defence;which he did in
the following terms: Gentlemen of the Jury,
said the man of law,here is a man, Captain
Ralph Stackpole, indicted before you on the charge
of stealing a horse; and the affa'r is pretty
considerably
VOL. II.22
proved on him.Here there was a
murmur heard throughout the court, evincing
much approbation of the counsel's frankness.
Gentlemen of the Jury, continued the orator,
elevating his voice, what I have to say in reply,
is, first, that that man thar', Captain Ralph
Stackpole
,
did, in the year seventeen seventy-nine,
when this good State of Kentucky, and
particularly
those parts adjacent to Bear's Grass and the
mouth thereof, where now stands the town of
Louisville, were overrun with yelping
Injun-savages
,did,
I say, gentlemen, meet two
Injun-savages
in the woods on Bear's Grass, and take
their scalps, single-handeda feat, gentlemen of
the jury, that an't to be performed every day,
even in Kentucky!Here there was
considerable
tumult in the court, and several persons began
to swear.Secondly, gentlemen of the jury,
exclaimed the attorney at law, with a still louder
voice, what I have to say
secondly
, gentlemen of
the jury, is, that this same identical prisoner at
the bar, Captain Ralph Stackpole, did, on another
occasion, in the year seventeen eighty-two, meet
another Injun-savage in the woods,a savage
armed with rifle, knife, and tomahawk,and met
him withyou suppose, gentlemen, with gun, axe,
and scalper, in like manner?No, gentlemen of
the jury!with his
fists
, and (with a voice of
thunder) licked him to death in the natural way!
Gentlemen of the jury, pass upon the prisoner,
guilty, or not guilty? The attorney resumed
his seat: his arguments were irresistible. The
jurors started up in their box, and roared out, to a
man,
Not guilty!
From that moment, it may
be supposed, Roaring Ralph could steal horses at
his pleasure. Nevertheless, it seems, he
immediately
lost his appetite for horse-flesh; and leaving
the land altogether, he betook himself to a more
congenial element, launched his broad-horn on the
narrow bosom of the Salt, and was soon
afterwards
transformed into a Mississippi alligator; in
which amphibious condition, we presume, he
roared
on till the day of his death.
As for the valiant Nathan Slaughterthe last
of the list of worthies, after whom the young
Virginian
so often inquiredless was discovered in
relation to his fate than that of the others. A
month, or more perhaps, after Roland's departure,
he re-appeared at Bruce's Station, where he was
twice or thrice again seen. Butwhether it was
that, as we have once before hinted, he found the
cheers and hearty hurrahs, in token of respect for
his valiant deeds at Wenonga's town, with which
Bruce's people received him, more embarrassing
and offensive than the flings and sarcasms with
which they used in former days to greet his
appearance
,
or whether he had some still more
stirring
reason for deserting the neighbourhood, it is
certain that he, in a short time, left the vicinity of
Salt River altogether, going no man knew
whither
.
He went, and with him his still inseparable
friend, little dog Peter.
From that moment, the Jibbenainosay ceased to
frequent his accustomed haunts in the forest;
the phantom Nick of the Woods was never more
beheld stalking through the gloom; nor was his
fearful cross ever again seen traced on the breast
of a slaughtered Indian.
THE END.